
Chapter 1
The house stood on a slight rise just on the edge of the village. It stood on
its own and looked over a broad spread of West Country farmland. Not a
remarkable house by any means – it was about thirty years old, squattish,
squarish, made of brick, and had four windows set in the front of a size and
proportion which more or less exactly failed to please the eye.
The only person for whom the house was in any way special was Arthur
Dent, and that was only because it happened to be the one he lived in. He
had lived in it for about three years, ever since he had moved out of London
because it made him nervous and irritable. He was about thirty as well,
dark haired and never quite at ease with himself. The thing that used to
worry him most was the fact that people always used to ask him what he
was looking so worried about. He worked in local radio which he always used
to tell his friends was a lot more interesting than they probably thought. It
was, too – most of his friends worked in advertising.
On Wednesday night it had rained very heavily, the lane was wet and
muddy, but the Thursday morning sun was bright and clear as it shone on
Arthur Dent’s house for what was to be the last time
It hadn’t properly registered with Arthur that the council wanted to
knock down his house and build an bypass instead.
At eight o’clock on Thursday morning Arthur didn’t feel very good. He
woke up blearily, got up, wandered blearily round his room, opened a window,
saw a bulldozer, found his slippers, and stomped off to the bathroom to wash.
Toothpaste on the brush – so. Scrub.
Shaving mirror – pointing at the ceiling. He adjusted it. For a moment
it reflected a second bulldozer through the bathroom window. Properly adjusted,
it reflected Arthur Dent’s bristles. He shaved them off, washed, dried,
and stomped off to the kitchen to find something pleasant to put in his mouth.
Kettle, plug, fridge, milk, coffee. Yawn.
The word bulldozer wandered through his mind for a moment in search
4
of something to connect with.
The bulldozer outside the kitchen window was quite a big one.
He stared at it. ”Yellow,” he thought and stomped off back to his bedroom
to get dressed.
Passing the bathroom he stopped to drink a large glass of water, and
another. He began to suspect that he was hung over. Why was he hung
over? Had he been drinking the night before? He supposed that he must
have been. He caught a glint in the shaving mirror. ”Yellow,” he thought
and stomped on to the bedroom.
He stood and thought. The pub, he thought. Oh dear, the pub. He
vaguely remembered being angry, angry about something that seemed important.
He’d been telling people about it, telling people about it at great
length, he rather suspected: his clearest visual recollection was of glazed
looks on other people’s faces. Something about a new bypass he had just
found out about. It had been in the pipeline for months only no one seemed
to have known about it. Ridiculous. He took a swig of water. It would sort
itself out, he’d decided, no one wanted a bypass, the council didn’t have a
leg to stand on. It would sort itself out.
God what a terrible hangover it had earned him though. He looked
at himself in the wardrobe mirror. He stuck out his tongue. ”Yellow,” he
thought. The word yellow wandered through his mind in search of something
to connect with.
Fifteen seconds later he was out of the house and lying in front of a big
yellow bulldozer that was advancing up his garden path.
Mr. L. Prosser was, as they say, only human. In other words he was a
carbon-based life form descended from an ape. More specifically he was forty,
fat and shabby and worked for the local council. Curiously enough, though
he didn’t know it, he was also a direct male-line descendant of Genghis Khan,
though intervening generations and racial mixing had so juggled his genes
that he had no discernible Mongoloid characteristics, and the only vestiges
left in Mr. L. Prosser of his mighty ancestry were a pronounced stoutness
about the tum and a predilection for little fur hats.
He was by no means a great warrior: in fact he was a nervous worried
man. Today he was particularly nervous and worried because something had
gone seriously wrong with his job – which was to see that Arthur Dent’s
house got cleared out of the way before the day was out.
”Come off it, Mr. Dent,”, he said, ”you can’t win you know. You can’t lie
in front of the bulldozer indefinitely.” He tried to make his eyes blaze fiercely
but they just wouldn’t do it.
Arthur lay in the mud and squelched at him.
5
”I’m game,” he said, ”we’ll see who rusts first.”
”I’m afraid you’re going to have to accept it,” said Mr. Prosser gripping
his fur hat and rolling it round the top of his head, ”this bypass has got to
be built and it’s going to be built!”
”First I’ve heard of it,” said Arthur, ”why’s it going to be built?”
Mr. Prosser shook his finger at him for a bit, then stopped and put it
away again.
”What do you mean, why’s it got to be built?” he said. ”It’s a bypass.
You’ve got to build bypasses.”
Bypasses are devices which allow some people to drive from point A to
point B very fast whilst other people dash from point B to point A very fast.
People living at point C, being a point directly in between, are often given
to wonder what’s so great about point A that so many people of point B are
so keen to get there, and what’s so great about point B that so many people
of point A are so keen to get there. They often wish that people would just
once and for all work out where the hell they wanted to be.
Mr. Prosser wanted to be at point D. Point D wasn’t anywhere in particular,
it was just any convenient point a very long way from points A, B and
C. He would have a nice little cottage at point D, with axes over the door,
and spend a pleasant amount of time at point E, which would be the nearest
pub to point D. His wife of course wanted climbing roses, but he wanted
axes. He didn’t know why – he just liked axes. He flushed hotly under the
derisive grins of the bulldozer drivers.
He shifted his weight from foot to foot, but it was equally uncomfortable
on each. Obviously somebody had been appallingly incompetent and he
hoped to God it wasn’t him.
Mr. Prosser said: ”You were quite entitled to make any suggestions or
protests at the appropriate time you know.”
”Appropriate time?” hooted Arthur. ”Appropriate time? The first I
knew about it was when a workman arrived at my home yesterday. I asked
him if he’d come to clean the windows and he said no he’d come to demolish
the house. He didn’t tell me straight away of course. Oh no. First he wiped
a couple of windows and charged me a fiver. Then he told me.”
”But Mr. Dent, the plans have been available in the local planning office
for the last nine month.”
”Oh yes, well as soon as I heard I went straight round to see them, yesterday
afternoon. You hadn’t exactly gone out of your way to call attention
to them had you? I mean like actually telling anybody or anything.”
”But the plans were on display . . . ”
”On display? I eventually had to go down to the cellar to find them.”
”That’s the display department.”
6
”With a flashlight.”
”Ah, well the lights had probably gone.”
”So had the stairs.”
”But look, you found the notice didn’t you?”
”Yes,” said Arthur, ”yes I did. It was on display in the bottom of a
locked filing cabinet stuck in a disused lavatory with a sign on the door
saying Beware of the Leopard.”
A cloud passed overhead. It cast a shadow over Arthur Dent as he lay
propped up on his elbow in the cold mud. It cast a shadow over Arthur
Dent’s house. Mr. Prosser frowned at it.
”It’s not as if it’s a particularly nice house,” he said.
”I’m sorry, but I happen to like it.”
”You’ll like the bypass.”
”Oh shut up,” said Arthur Dent. ”Shut up and go away, and take your
bloody bypass with you. You haven’t got a leg to stand on and you know
it.”
Mr. Prosser’s mouth opened and closed a couple of times while his mind
was for a moment filled with inexplicable but terribly attractive visions of
Arthur Dent’s house being consumed with fire and Arthur himself running
screaming from the blazing ruin with at least three hefty spears protruding
from his back. Mr. Prosser was often bothered with visions like these and
they made him feel very nervous. He stuttered for a moment and then pulled
himself together.
”Mr. Dent,” he said.
”Hello? Yes?” said Arthur.
”Some factual information for you. Have you any idea how much damage
that bulldozer would suffer if I just let it roll straight over you?”
”How much?” said Arthur.
”None at all,” said Mr. Prosser, and stormed nervously off wondering
why his brain was filled with a thousand hairy horsemen all shouting at him.
By a curious coincidence, ”None at all” is exactly how much suspicion
the ape-descendant Arthur Dent had that one of his closest friends was not
descended from an ape, but was in fact from a small planet in the vicinity of
Betelgeuse and not from Guildford as he usually claimed.
Arthur Dent had never, ever suspected this.
This friend of his had first arrived on the planet some fifteen Earth years
previously, and he had worked hard to blend himself into Earth society –
with, it must be said, some success. For instance he had spent those fifteen
years pretending to be an out of work actor, which was plausible enough.
7
He had made one careless blunder though, because he had skimped a bit
on his preparatory research. The information he had gathered had led him
to choose the name ”Ford Prefect” as being nicely inconspicuous.
He was not conspicuously tall, his features were striking but not conspicuously
handsome. His hair was wiry and gingerish and brushed backwards
from the temples. His skin seemed to be pulled backwards from the nose.
There was something very slightly odd about him, but it was difficult to say
what it was. Perhaps it was that his eyes didn’t blink often enough and
when you talked to him for any length of time your eyes began involuntarily
to water on his behalf. Perhaps it was that he smiled slightly too broadly
and gave people the unnerving impression that he was about to go for their
neck.
He struck most of the friends he had made on Earth as an eccentric, but
a harmless one – an unruly boozer with some oddish habits. For instance he
would often gatecrash university parties, get badly drunk and start making
fun of any astrophysicist he could find till he got thrown out.
Sometimes he would get seized with oddly distracted moods and stare
into the sky as if hypnotized until someone asked him what he was doing.
Then he would start guiltily for a moment, relax and grin.
”Oh, just looking for flying saucers,” he would joke and everyone would
laugh and ask him what sort of flying saucers he was looking for.
”Green ones!” he would reply with a wicked grin, laugh wildly for a
moment and then suddenly lunge for the nearest bar and buy an enormous
round of drinks.
Evenings like this usually ended badly. Ford would get out of his skull
on whisky, huddle into a corner with some girl and explain to her in slurred
phrases that honestly the colour of the flying saucers didn’t matter that much
really.
Thereafter, staggering semi-paralytic down the night streets he would often
ask passing policemen if they knew the way to Betelgeuse. The policemen
would usually say something like, ”Don’t you think it’s about time you went
off home sir?”
”I’m trying to baby, I’m trying to,” is what Ford invariably replied on
these occasions.
In fact what he was really looking out for when he stared distractedly into
the night sky was any kind of flying saucer at all. The reason he said green
was that green was the traditional space livery of the Betelgeuse trading
scouts.
Ford Prefect was desperate that any flying saucer at all would arrive soon
because fifteen years was a long time to get stranded anywhere, particularly
somewhere as mindboggingly dull as the Earth.
8
Ford wished that a flying saucer would arrive soon because he knew how
to flag flying saucers down and get lifts from them. He knew how to see the
Marvels of the Universe for less than thirty Altairan dollars a day.
In fact, Ford Prefect was a roving researcher for that wholly remarkable
book The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy.
Human beings are great adaptors, and by lunchtime life in the environs
of Arthur’s house had settled into a steady routine. It was Arthur’s accepted
role to lie squelching in the mud making occasional demands to see his lawyer,
his mother or a good book; it was Mr. Prosser’s accepted role to tackle
Arthur with the occasional new ploy such as the For the Public Good talk,
the March of Progress talk, the They Knocked My House Down Once You
Know, Never Looked Back talk and various other cajoleries and threats; and
it was the bulldozer drivers’ accepted role to sit around drinking coffee and
experimenting with union regulations to see how they could turn the situation
to their financial advantage.
The Earth moved slowly in its diurnal course.
The sun was beginning to dry out the mud Arthur lay in.
A shadow moved across him again.
”Hello Arthur,” said the shadow.
Arthur looked up and squinting into the sun was startled to see Ford
Prefect standing above him.
”Ford! Hello, how are you?”
”Fine,” said Ford, ”look, are you busy?”
”Am I busy?” exclaimed Arthur. ”Well, I’ve just got all these bulldozers
and things to lie in front of because they’ll knock my house down if I don’t,
but other than that . . . well, no not especially, why?”
They don’t have sarcasm on Betelgeuse, and Ford Prefect often failed to
notice it unless he was concentrating. He said, ”Good, is there anywhere we
can talk?”
”What?” said Arthur Dent.
For a few seconds Ford seemed to ignore him, and stared fixedly into the
sky like a rabbit trying to get run over by a car. Then suddenly he squatted
down beside Arthur.
”We’ve got to talk,” he said urgently.
”Fine,” said Arthur, ”talk.”
”And drink,” said Ford. ”It’s vitally important that we talk and drink.
Now. We’ll go to the pub in the village.”
He looked into the sky again, nervous, expectant.
”Look, don’t you understand?” shouted Arthur. He pointed at Prosser.
”That man wants to knock my house down!”
9
Ford glanced at him, puzzled. ”Well he can do it while you’re away can’t
he?” he asked.
”But I don’t want him to!”
”Ah.”
”Look, what’s the matter with you Ford?” said Arthur.
”Nothing. Nothing’s the matter. Listen to me – I’ve got to tell you the
most important thing you’ve ever heard. I’ve got to tell you now, and I’ve
got to tell you in the saloon bar of the Horse and Groom.”
”But why?”
”Because you are going to need a very stiff drink.”
Ford stared at Arthur, and Arthur was astonished to find that his will
was beginning to weaken. He didn’t realize that this was because of an old
drinking game that Ford learned to play in the hyperspace ports that served
the madranite mining belts in the star system of Orion Beta.
The game was not unlike the Earth game called Indian Wrestling, and
was played like this:
Two contestants would sit either side of a table, with a glass in front of
each of them.
Between them would be placed a bottle of Janx Spirit (as immortalized
in that ancient Orion mining song ”Oh don’t give me none more of that Old
Janx Spirit/ No, don’t you give me none more of that Old Janx Spirit/ For
my head will fly, my tongue will lie, my eyes will fry and I may die/ Won’t
you pour me one more of that sinful Old Janx Spirit”).
Each of the two contestants would then concentrate their will on the
bottle and attempt to tip it and pour spirit into the glass of his opponent –
who would then have to drink it.
The bottle would then be refilled. The game would be played again. And
again.
Once you started to lose you would probably keep losing, because one of
the effects of Janx spirit is to depress telepsychic power.
As soon as a predetermined quantity had been consumed, the final loser
would have to perform a forfeit, which was usually obscenely biological.
Ford Prefect usually played to lose.
Ford stared at Arthur, who began to think that perhaps he did want to
go to the Horse and Groom after all.
”But what about my house . . . ?” he asked plaintively.
Ford looked across to Mr. Prosser, and suddenly a wicked thought struck
him.
”He wants to knock your house down?”
”Yes, he wants to build . . . ”
10
”And he can’t because you’re lying in front of the bulldozers?”
”Yes, and . . . ”
”I’m sure we can come to some arrangement,” said Ford. ”Excuse me!”
he shouted.
Mr. Prosser (who was arguing with a spokesman for the bulldozer drivers
about whether or not Arthur Dent constituted a mental health hazard, and
how much they should get paid if he did) looked around. He was surprised
and slightly alarmed to find that Arthur had company.
”Yes? Hello?” he called. ”Has Mr. Dent come to his senses yet?”
”Can we for the moment,” called Ford, ”assume that he hasn’t?”
”Well?” sighed Mr. Prosser.
”And can we also assume,” said Ford, ”that he’s going to be staying here
all day?”
”So?”
”So all your men are going to be standing around all day doing nothing?”
”Could be, could be . . . ”
”Well, if you’re resigned to doing that anyway, you don’t actually need
him to lie here all the time do you?”
”What?”
”You don’t,” said Ford patiently, ”actually need him here.”
Mr. Prosser thought about this.
”Well no, not as such . . . ”, he said, ”not exactly need . . . ”
Prosser was worried. He thought that one of them wasn’t making a lot
of sense.
Ford said, ”So if you would just like to take it as read that he’s actually
here, then he and I could slip off down to the pub for half an hour. How does
that sound?”
Mr. Prosser thought it sounded perfectly potty.
”That sounds perfectly reasonable,” he said in a reassuring tone of voice,
wondering who he was trying to reassure.
”And if you want to pop off for a quick one yourself later on,” said Ford,
”we can always cover up for you in return.”
”Thank you very much,” said Mr. Prosser who no longer knew how to
play this at all, ”thank you very much, yes, that’s very kind . . . ” He frowned,
then smiled, then tried to do both at once, failed, grasped hold of his fur hat
and rolled it fitfully round the top of his head. He could only assume that
he had just won.
”So,” continued Ford Prefect, ”if you would just like to come over here
and lie down . . . ”
”What?” said Mr. Prosser.
11
”Ah, I’m sorry,” said Ford, ”perhaps I hadn’t made myself fully clear.
Somebody’s got to lie in front of the bulldozers haven’t they? Or there won’t
be anything to stop them driving into Mr. Dent’s house will there?”
”What?” said Mr. Prosser again.
”It’s very simple,” said Ford, ”my client, Mr. Dent, says that he will stop
lying here in the mud on the sole condition that you come and take over from
him.”
”What are you talking about?” said Arthur, but Ford nudged him with
his shoe to be quiet.
”You want me,” said Mr. Prosser, spelling out this new thought to himself,
”to come and lie there . . . ”
”Yes.”
”In front of the bulldozer?”
”Yes.”
”Instead of Mr. Dent.”
”Yes.”
”In the mud.”
”In, as you say it, the mud.”
As soon as Mr. Prosser realized that he was substantially the loser after
all, it was as if a weight lifted itself off his shoulders: this was more like the
world as he knew it. He sighed.
”In return for which you will take Mr. Dent with you down to the pub?”
”That’s it,” said Ford. ”That’s it exactly.”
Mr. Prosser took a few nervous steps forward and stopped.
”Promise?” he said.
”Promise,” said Ford. He turned to Arthur.
”Come on,” he said to him, ”get up and let the man lie down.”
Arthur stood up, feeling as if he was in a dream.
Ford beckoned to Prosser who sadly, awkwardly, sat down in the mud. He
felt that his whole life was some kind of dream and he sometimes wondered
whose it was and whether they were enjoying it. The mud folded itself round
his bottom and his arms and oozed into his shoes.
Ford looked at him severely.
”And no sneaky knocking down Mr. Dent’s house whilst he’s away, alright?”
he said.
”The mere thought,” growled Mr. Prosser, ”hadn’t even begun to speculate,”
he continued, settling himself back, ”about the merest possibility of
crossing my mind.”
He saw the bulldozer driver’s union representative approaching and let his
head sink back and closed his eyes. He was trying to marshal his arguments
for proving that he did not now constitute a mental health hazard himself.
12
He was far from certain about this – his mind seemed to be full of noise,
horses, smoke, and the stench of blood. This always happened when he felt
miserable and put upon, and he had never been able to explain it to himself.
In a high dimension of which we know nothing the mighty Khan bellowed
with rage, but Mr. Prosser only trembled slightly and whimpered. He began
to fell little pricks of water behind the eyelids. Bureaucratic cock-ups, angry
men lying in the mud, indecipherable strangers handing out inexplicable
humiliations and an unidentified army of horsemen laughing at him in his
head – what a day.
What a day. Ford Prefect knew that it didn’t matter a pair of dingo’s
kidneys whether Arthur’s house got knocked down or not now.
Arthur remained very worried.
”But can we trust him?” he said.
”Myself I’d trust him to the end of the Earth,” said Ford.
”Oh yes,” said Arthur, ”and how far’s that?”
”About twelve minutes away,” said Ford, ”come on, I need a drink.”
13
Chapter 2
Here’s what the Encyclopedia Galactica has to say about alcohol. It says that
alcohol is a colourless volatile liquid formed by the fermentation of sugars and
also notes its intoxicating effect on certain carbon-based life forms.
The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy also mentions alcohol. It says that
the best drink in existence is the Pan Galactic Gargle Blaster.
It says that the effect of a Pan Galactic Gargle Blaster is like having your
brains smashed out by a slice of lemon wrapped round a large gold brick.
The Guide also tells you on which planets the best Pan Galactic Gargle
Blasters are mixed, how much you can expect to pay for one and what
voluntary organizations exist to help you rehabilitate afterwards.
The Guide even tells you how you can mix one yourself.
Take the juice from one bottle of that Ol’ Janx Spirit, it says.
Pour into it one measure of water from the seas of Santraginus V – Oh
that Santraginean sea water, it says. Oh, those Santraginean fish!
Allow three cubes of Arcturan Mega-gin to melt into the mixture (it must
be properly iced or the benzine is lost).
Allow four litres of Fallian marsh gas to bubble through it, in memory of
all those happy Hikers who have died of pleasure in the Marshes of Fallia.
Over the back of a silver spoon float a measure of Qualactin Hypermint
extract, redolent of all the heady odours of the dark Qualactin Zones, subtle
sweet and mystic.
Drop in the tooth of an Algolian Suntiger. Watch it dissolve, spreading
the fires of the Algolian Suns deep into the heart of the drink.
Sprinkle Zamphuor.
Add an olive.
Drink . . . but . . . very carefully . . .
The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy sells rather better than the Encyclopedia
Galactica.
”Six pints of bitter,” said Ford Prefect to the barman of the Horse and
Groom. ”And quickly please, the world’s about to end.”
14
The barman of the Horse and Groom didn’t deserve this sort of treatment,
he was a dignified old man. He pushed his glasses up his nose and blinked at
Ford Prefect. Ford ignored him and stared out of the window, so the barman
looked instead at Arthur who shrugged helplessly and said nothing.
So the barman said, ”Oh yes sir? Nice weather for it,” and started pulling
pints.
He tried again. ”Going to watch the match this afternoon then?”
Ford glanced round at him.
”No, no point,” he said, and looked back out of the window.
”What’s that, foregone conclusion then you reckon sir?” said the barman.
”Arsenal without a chance?”
”No, no,” said Ford, ”it’s just that the world’s about to end.”
”Oh yes, sir, so you said,” said the barman, looking over his glasses this
time at Arthur. ”Lucky escape for Arsenal if it did.”
Ford looked back at him, genuinely surprised.
”No, not really,” he said. He frowned.
The barman breathed in heavily. ”There you are sir, six pints,” he said.
Arthur smiled at him wanly and shrugged again. He turned and smiled
wanly at the rest of the pub just in case any of them had heard what was
going on.
None of them had, and none of them could understand what he was
smiling at them for.
A man sitting next to Ford at the bar looked at the two men, looked at
the six pints, did a swift burst of mental arithmetic, arrived at an answer he
liked and grinned a stupid hopeful grin at them.
”Get off,” said Ford, ”They’re ours,” giving him a look that would have
an Algolian Suntiger get on with what it was doing.
Ford slapped a five-pound note on the bar. He said, ”Keep the change.”
”What, from a fiver? Thank you sir.”
”You’ve got ten minutes left to spend it.”
The barman simply decided to walk away for a bit.
”Ford,” said Arthur, ”would you please tell me what the hell is going
on?”
”Drink up,” said Ford, ”you’ve got three pints to get through.”
”Three pints?” said Arthur. ”At lunchtime?”
The man next to ford grinned and nodded happily. Ford ignored him.
He said, ”Time is an illusion. Lunchtime doubly so.”
”Very deep,” said Arthur, ”you should send that in to the Reader’s Digest.
They’ve got a page for people like you.”
”Drink up.”
”Why three pints all of a sudden?”
15
”Muscle relaxant, you’ll need it.”
”Muscle relaxant?”
”Muscle relaxant.”
Arthur stared into his beer.
”Did I do anything wrong today,” he said, ”or has the world always been
like this and I’ve been too wrapped up in myself to notice?”
”All right,” said Ford, ”I’ll try to explain. How long have we known each
other?”
”How long?” Arthur thought. ”Er, about five years, maybe six,” he said.
”Most of it seemed to make some sense at the time.”
”All right,” said Ford. ”How would you react if I said that I’m not from
Guildford after all, but from a small planet somewhere in the vicinity of
Betelgeuse?”
Arthur shrugged in a so-so sort of way.
”I don’t know,” he said, taking a pull of beer. ”Why – do you think it’s
the sort of thing you’re likely to say?”
Ford gave up. It really wasn’t worth bothering at the moment, what with
the world being about to end. He just said: ”Drink up.”
He added, perfectly factually: ”The world’s about to end.”
Arthur gave the rest of the pub another wan smile. The rest of the pub
frowned at him. A man waved at him to stop smiling at them and mind his
own business.
”This must be Thursday,” said Arthur musing to himself, sinking low over
his beer, ”I never could get the hang of Thursdays.”
16
Chapter 3
On this particular Thursday, something was moving quietly through the ionosphere
many miles above the surface of the planet; several somethings in fact,
several dozen huge yellow chunky slablike somethings, huge as office buildings,
silent as birds. They soared with ease, basking in electromagnetic rays
from the star Sol, biding their time, grouping, preparing.
The planet beneath them was almost perfectly oblivious of their presence,
which was just how they wanted it for the moment. The huge yellow
somethings went unnoticed at Goonhilly, they passed over Cape Canaveral
without a blip, Woomera and Jodrell Bank looked straight through them –
which was a pity because it was exactly the sort of thing they’d been looking
for all these years.
The only place they registered at all was on a small black device called a
Sub-Etha Sens-O-Matic which winked away quietly to itself. It nestled in the
darkness inside a leather satchel which Ford Prefect wore habitually round
his neck. The contents of Ford Prefect’s satchel were quite interesting in fact
and would have made any Earth physicist’s eyes pop out of his head, which
is why he always concealed them by keeping a couple of dog-eared scripts
for plays he pretended he was auditioning for stuffed in the top. Besides
the Sub-Etha Sens-O-Matic and the scripts he had an Electronic Thumb –
a short squat black rod, smooth and matt with a couple of flat switches
and dials at one end; he also had a device which looked rather like a largish
electronic calculator. This had about a hundred tiny flat press buttons and a
screen about four inches square on which any one of a million ”pages” could
be summoned at a moment’s notice. It looked insanely complicated, and this
was one of the reasons why the snug plastic cover it fitted into had the words
Don’t Panic printed on it in large friendly letters. The other reason was
that this device was in fact that most remarkable of all books ever to come
out of the great publishing corporations of Ursa Minor – The Hitchhiker’s
Guide to the Galaxy. The reason why it was published in the form of a micro
sub meson electronic component is that if it were printed in normal book
17
form, an interstellar hitchhiker would require several inconveniently large
buildings to carry it around in.
Beneath that in Ford Prefect’s satchel were a few biros, a notepad, and
a largish bath towel from Marks and Spencer.
The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy has a few things to say on the
subject of towels.
A towel, it says, is about the most massively useful thing an interstellar
hitchhiker can have. Partly it has great practical value – you can wrap it
around you for warmth as you bound across the cold moons of Jaglan Beta;
you can lie on it on the brilliant marble-sanded beaches of Santraginus V, inhaling
the heady sea vapours; you can sleep under it beneath the stars which
shine so redly on the desert world of Kakrafoon; use it to sail a mini raft
down the slow heavy river Moth; wet it for use in hand-tohand-combat; wrap
it round your head to ward off noxious fumes or to avoid the gaze of the
Ravenous Bugblatter Beast of Traal (a mindboggingly stupid animal, it assumes
that if you can’t see it, it can’t see you – daft as a bush, but very
ravenous); you can wave your towel in emergencies as a distress signal, and
of course dry yourself off with it if it still seems to be clean enough.
More importantly, a towel has immense psychological value. For some
reason, if a strag (strag: non-hitchhiker) discovers that a hitchhiker has his
towel with him, he will automatically assume that he is also in possession of
a toothbrush, face flannel, soap, tin of biscuits, flask, compass, map, ball of
string, gnat spray, wet weather gear, space suit etc., etc. Furthermore, the
strag will then happily lend the hitchhiker any of these or a dozen other items
that the hitchhiker might accidentally have ”lost”. What the strag will think
is that any man who can hitch the length and breadth of the galaxy, rough it,
slum it, struggle against terrible odds, win through, and still knows where his
towel is is clearly a man to be reckoned with.
Hence a phrase which has passed into hitchhiking slang, as in ”Hey, you
sass that hoopy Ford Prefect? There’s a frood who really knows where his
towel is.” (Sass: know, be aware of, meet, have sex with; hoopy: really together
guy; frood: really amazingly together guy.)
Nestling quietly on top of the towel in Ford Prefect’s satchel, the SubEtha
Sens-O-Matic began to wink more quickly. Miles above the surface of
the planet the huge yellow somethings began to fan out. At Jodrell Bank,
someone decided it was time for a nice relaxing cup of tea.
”You got a towel with you?” said Ford Prefect suddenly to Arthur.
Arthur, struggling through his third pint, looked round at him.
18
”Why? What, no . . . should I have?” He had given up being surprised,
there didn’t seem to be any point any longer.
Ford clicked his tongue in irritation.
”Drink up,” he urged.
At that moment the dull sound of a rumbling crash from outside filtered
through the low murmur of the pub, through the sound of the jukebox,
through the sound of the man next to Ford hiccupping over the whisky Ford
had eventually bought him.
Arthur choked on his beer, leapt to his feet.
”What’s that?” he yelped.
”Don’t worry,” said Ford, ”they haven’t started yet.”
”Thank God for that,” said Arthur and relaxed.
”It’s probably just your house being knocked down,” said Ford, drowning
his last pint.
”What?” shouted Arthur. Suddenly Ford’s spell was broken. Arthur
looked wildly around him and ran to the window.
”My God they are! They’re knocking my house down. What the hell am
I doing in the pub, Ford?”
”It hardly makes any difference at this stage,” said Ford, ”let them have
their fun.”
”Fun?” yelped Arthur. ”Fun!” He quickly checked out of the window
again that they were talking about the same thing.
”Damn their fun!” he hooted and ran out of the pub furiously waving a
nearly empty beer glass. He made no friends at all in the pub that lunchtime.
”Stop, you vandals! You home wreckers!” bawled Arthur. ”You half
crazed Visigoths, stop will you!”
Ford would have to go after him. Turning quickly to the barman he asked
for four packets of peanuts.
”There you are sir,” said the barman, slapping the packets on the bar,
”twenty-eight pence if you’d be so kind.”
Ford was very kind – he gave the barman another five-pound note and
told him to keep the change. The barman looked at it and then looked at
Ford. He suddenly shivered: he experienced a momentary sensation that he
didn’t understand because no one on Earth had ever experienced it before. In
moments of great stress, every life form that exists gives out a tiny sublimal
signal. This signal simply communicates an exact and almost pathetic sense
of how far that being is from the place of his birth. On Earth it is never
possible to be further than sixteen thousand miles from your birthplace,
which really isn’t very far, so such signals are too minute to be noticed. Ford
Prefect was at this moment under great stress, and he was born 600 light
years away in the near vicinity of Betelgeuse.
19
The barman reeled for a moment, hit by a shocking, incomprehensible
sense of distance. He didn’t know what it meant, but he looked at Ford
Prefect with a new sense of respect, almost awe.
”Are you serious, sir?” he said in a small whisper which had the effect of
silencing the pub. ”You think the world’s going to end?”
”Yes,” said Ford.
”But, this afternoon?”
Ford had recovered himself. He was at his flippest.
”Yes,” he said gaily, ”in less than two minutes I would estimate.”
The barman couldn’t believe the conversation he was having, but he
couldn’t believe the sensation he had just had either.
”Isn’t there anything we can do about it then?” he said.
”No, nothing,” said Ford, stuffing the peanuts into his pockets.
Someone in the hushed bar suddenly laughed raucously at how stupid
everyone had become.
The man sitting next to Ford was a bit sozzled by now. His eyes waved
their way up to Ford.
”I thought,” he said, ”that if the world was going to end we were meant
to lie down or put a paper bag over our head or something.”
”If you like, yes,” said Ford.
”That’s what they told us in the army,” said the man, and his eyes began
the long trek back down to his whisky.
”Will that help?” asked the barman.
”No,” said Ford and gave him a friendly smile. ”Excuse me,” he said,
”I’ve got to go.” With a wave, he left.
The pub was silent for a moment longer, and then, embarrassingly enough,
the man with the raucous laugh did it again. The girl he had dragged along
to the pub with him had grown to loathe him dearly over the last hour or
so, and it would probably have been a great satisfaction to her to know that
in a minute and a half or so he would suddenly evaporate into a whiff of
hydrogen, ozone and carbon monoxide. However, when the moment came
she would be too busy evaporating herself to notice it.
The barman cleared his throat. He heard himself say: ”Last orders,
please.”
The huge yellow machines began to sink downward and to move faster.
Ford knew they were there. This wasn’t the way he had wanted it.
Running up the lane, Arthur had nearly reached his house. He didn’t
notice how cold it had suddenly become, he didn’t notice the wind, he didn’t
20
notice the sudden irrational squall of rain. He didn’t notice anything but the
caterpillar bulldozers crawling over the rubble that had been his home.
”You barbarians!” he yelled. ”I’ll sue the council for every penny it’s got!
I’ll have you hung, drawn and quartered! And whipped! And boiled . . . until
. . . until . . . until you’ve had enough.”
Ford was running after him very fast. Very very fast.
”And then I’ll do it again!” yelled Arthur. ”And when I’ve finished I will
take all the little bits, and I will jump on them!”
Arthur didn’t notice that the men were running from the bulldozers; he
didn’t notice that Mr. Prosser was staring hectically into the sky. What
Mr. Prosser had noticed was that huge yellow somethings were screaming
through the clouds. Impossibly huge yellow somethings.
”And I will carry on jumping on them,” yelled Arthur, still running, ”until
I get blisters, or I can think of anything even more unpleasant to do, and
then . . . ”
Arthur tripped, and fell headlong, rolled and landed flat on his back. At
last he noticed that something was going on. His finger shot upwards.
”What the hell’s that?” he shrieked.
Whatever it was raced across the sky in monstrous yellowness, tore the
sky apart with mind-buggering noise and leapt off into the distance leaving
the gaping air to shut behind it with a bang that drove your ears six feet
into your skull.
Another one followed and did the same thing only louder.
It’s difficult to say exactly what the people on the surface of the planet
were doing now, because they didn’t really know what they were doing themselves.
None of it made a lot of sense running into houses, running out of
houses, howling noiselessly at the noise. All around the world city streets
exploded with people, cars slewed into each other as the noise fell on them
and then rolled off like a tidal wave over hills and valleys, deserts and oceans,
seeming to flatten everything it hit.
Only one man stood and watched the sky, stood with terrible sadness in
his eyes and rubber bungs in his ears. He knew exactly what was happening
and had known ever since his Sub-Etha Sens-OMatic had started winking in
the dead of night beside his pillar and woken him with a start. It was what
he had waited for all these years, but when he had deciphered the signal
pattern sitting alone in his small dark room a coldness had gripped him and
squeezed his heart. Of all the races in all of the Galaxy who could have come
and said a big hello to planet Earth, he thought, didn’t it just have to be the
Vogons.
Still he knew what he had to do. As the Vogon craft screamed through the
air high above him he opened his satchel. He threw away a copy of Joseph and
21
the Amazing Technicolor Dreamcoat, he threw away a copy of Godspell: He
wouldn’t need them where he was going. Everything was ready, everything
was prepared.
He knew where his towel was.
A sudden silence hit the Earth. If anything it was worse than the noise.
For a while nothing happened.
The great ships hung motionless in the air, over every nation on Earth.
Motionless they hung, huge, heavy, steady in the sky, a blasphemy against
nature. Many people went straight into shock as their minds tried to encompass
what they were looking at. The ships hung in the sky in much the same
way that bricks don’t.
And still nothing happened.
Then there was a slight whisper, a sudden spacious whisper of open ambient
sound. Every hi fi set in the world, every radio, every television, every
cassette recorder, every woofer, every tweeter, every mid-range driver in the
world quietly turned itself on.
Every tin can, every dust bin, every window, every car, every wine glass,
every sheet of rusty metal became activated as an acoustically perfect sounding
board.
Before the Earth passed away it was going to be treated to the very
ultimate in sound reproduction, the greatest public address system ever built.
But there was no concert, no music, no fanfare, just a simple message.
”People of Earth, your attention please,” a voice said, and it was wonderful.
Wonderful perfect quadrophonic sound with distortion levels so low
as to make a brave man weep.
”This is Prostetnic Vogon Jeltz of the Galactic Hyperspace Planning Council,”
the voice continued. ”As you will no doubt be aware, the plans for development
of the outlying regions of the Galaxy require the building of a hyperspatial
express route through your star system, and regrettably your planet
is one of those scheduled for demolition. The process will take slightly less
that two of your Earth minutes. Thank you.”
The PA died away.
Uncomprehending terror settled on the watching people of Earth. The
terror moved slowly through the gathered crowds as if they were iron fillings
on a sheet of board and a magnet was moving beneath them. Panic sprouted
again, desperate fleeing panic, but there was nowhere to flee to.
Observing this, the Vogons turned on their PA again. It said:
”There’s no point in acting all surprised about it. All the planning charts
and demolition orders have been on display in your local planning department
22
on Alpha Centauri for fifty of your Earth years, so you’ve had plenty of time
to lodge any formal complaint and it’s far too late to start making a fuss
about it now.”
The PA fell silent again and its echo drifted off across the land. The huge
ships turned slowly in the sky with easy power. On the underside of each a
hatchway opened, an empty black space.
By this time somebody somewhere must have manned a radio transmitter,
located a wavelength and broadcasted a message back to the Vogon ships,
to plead on behalf of the planet. Nobody ever heard what they said, they
only heard the reply. The PA slammed back into life again. The voice was
annoyed. It said:
”What do you mean you’ve never been to Alpha Centauri? For heaven’s
sake mankind, it’s only four light years away you know. I’m sorry, but if you
can’t be bothered to take an interest in local affairs that’s your own lookout.
”Energize the demolition beams.”
Light poured out into the hatchways.
”I don’t know,” said the voice on the PA, ”apathetic bloody planet, I’ve
no sympathy at all.” It cut off.
There was a terrible ghastly silence.
There was a terrible ghastly noise.
There was a terrible ghastly silence.
The Vogon Constructor fleet coasted away into the inky starry void.
23
Chapter 4
Far away on the opposite spiral arm of the Galaxy, five hundred thousand
light years from the star Sol, Zaphod Beeblebrox, President of the Imperial
Galactic Government, sped across the seas of Damogran, his ion drive delta
boat winking and flashing in the Damogran sun.
Damogran the hot; Damogran the remote; Damogran the almost totally
unheard of.
Damogran, secret home of the Heart of Gold.
The boat sped on across the water. It would be some time before it
reached its destination because Damogran is such an inconveniently arranged
planet. It consists of nothing but middling to large desert islands separated
by very pretty but annoyingly wide stretches of ocean.
The boat sped on.
Because of this topological awkwardness Damogran has always remained
a deserted planet. This is why the Imperial Galactic Government chose
Damogran for the Heart of Gold project, because it was so deserted and the
Heart of Gold was so secret.
The boat zipped and skipped across the sea, the sea that lay between the
main islands of the only archipelago of any useful size on the whole planet.
Zaphod Beeblebrox was on his way from the tiny spaceport on Easter Island
(the name was an entirely meaningless coincidence – in Galacticspeke, easter
means small flat and light brown) to the Heart of Gold island, which by
another meaningless coincidence was called France.
One of the side effects of work on the Heart of Gold was a whole string
of pretty meaningless coincidences.
But it was not in any way a coincidence that today, the day of culmination
of the project, the great day of unveiling, the day that the Heart of
Gold was finally to be introduced to a marvelling Galaxy, was also a great
day of culmination for Zaphod Beeblebrox. It was for the sake of this day
that he had first decided to run for the Presidency, a decision which had
sent waves of astonishment throughout the Imperial Galaxy – Zaphod Bee24
blebrox? President? Not the Zaphod Beeblebrox? Not the President? Many
had seen it as a clinching proof that the whole of known creation had finally
gone bananas.
Zaphod grinned and gave the boat an extra kick of speed.
Zaphod Beeblebrox, adventurer, ex-hippy, good timer, (crook? quite
possibly), manic self-publicist, terribly bad at personal relationships, often
thought to be completely out to lunch.
President?
No one had gone bananas, not in that way at least.
Only six people in the entire Galaxy understood the principle on which
the Galaxy was governed, and they knew that once Zaphod Beeblebrox had
announced his intention to run as President it was more or less a fait accompli:
he was the ideal presidency fodder.1
What they completely failed to understand was why Zaphod was doing
it.
He banked sharply, shooting a wild wall of water at the sun.
Today was the day; today was the day when they would realize what
Zaphod had been up to. Today was what Zaphod Beeblebrox’s Presidency
was all about. Today was also his two hundredth birthday, but that was just
another meaningless coincidence.
As he skipped his boat across the seas of Damogran he smiled quietly to
himself about what a wonderful exciting day it was going to be. He relaxed
and spread his two arms lazily across the seat back. He steered with an
1President: full title President of the Imperial Galactic Government.
The term Imperial is kept though it is now an anachronism. The hereditary Emperor
is nearly dead and has been so for many centuries. In the last moments of his dying coma
he was locked in a statis field which keeps him in a state of perpetual unchangingness. All
his heirs are now long dead, and this means that without any drastic political upheaval,
power has simply and effectively moved a rung or two down the ladder, and is now seen
to be vested in a body which used to act simply as advisers to the Emperor – an elected
Governmental assembly headed by a President elected by that assembly. In fact it vests
in no such place.
The President in particular is very much a figurehead – he wields no real power whatsoever.
He is apparently chosen by the government, but the qualities he is required to
display are not those of leadership but those of finely judged outrage. For this reason the
President is always a controversial choice, always an infuriating but fascinating character.
His job is not to wield power but to draw attention away from it. On those criteria
Zaphod Beeblebrox is one of the most successful Presidents the Galaxy has ever had –
he has already spent two of his ten Presidential years in prison for fraud. Very very few
people realize that the President and the Government have virtually no power at all, and
of these very few people only six know whence ultimate political power is wielded. Most
of the others secretly believe that the ultimate decision-making process is handled by a
computer. They couldn’t be more wrong.
25
extra arm he’d recently fitted just beneath his right one to help improve his
ski-boxing.
”Hey,” he cooed to himself, ”you’re a real cool boy you.” But his nerves
sang a song shriller than a dog whistle.
The island of France was about twenty miles long, five miles across the
middle, sandy and crescent shaped. In fact it seemed to exist not so much as
an island in its own right as simply a means of defining the sweep and curve
of a huge bay. This impression was heightened by the fact that the inner
coastline of the crescent consisted almost entirely of steep cliffs. From the
top of the cliff the land sloped slowly down five miles to the opposite shore.
On top of the cliffs stood a reception committee.
It consisted in large part of the engineers and researchers who had built
the Heart of Gold – mostly humanoid, but here and there were a few reptiloid
atomineers, two or three green slyph-like maximegalacticans, an octopoid
physucturalist or two and a Hooloovoo (a Hooloovoo is a super-intelligent
shade of the color blue). All except the Hooloovoo were resplendent in their
multicolored ceremonial lab coats; the Hooloovoo had been temporarily refracted
into a free standing prism for the occasion.
There was a mood of immense excitement thrilling through all of them.
Together and between them they had gone to and beyond the furthest limits
of physical laws, restructured the fundamental fabric of matter, strained,
twisted and broken the laws of possibility and impossibility, but still the
greatest excitement of all seemed to be to meet a man with an orange sash
round his neck. (An orange sash was what the President of the Galaxy
traditionally wore.) It might not even have made much difference to them if
they’d known exactly how much power the President of the Galaxy actually
wielded: none at all. Only six people in the Galaxy knew that the job of
the Galactic President was not to wield power but to attract attention away
from it.
Zaphod Beeblebrox was amazingly good at his job.
The crowd gasped, dazzled by sun and seemanship, as the Presidential
speedboat zipped round the headland into the bay. It flashed and shone as
it came skating over the sea in wide skidding turns.
In fact it didn’t need to touch the water at all, because it was supported
on a hazy cushion of ionized atoms – but just for effect it was fitted with
thin finblades which could be lowered into the water. They slashed sheets
of water hissing into the air, carved deep gashes into the sea which swayed
crazily and sank back foaming into the boat’s wake as it careered across the
bay.
Zaphod loved effect: it was what he was best at.
He twisted the wheel sharply, the boat slewed round in a wild scything
26
skid beneath the cliff face and dropped to rest lightly on the rocking waves.
Within seconds he ran out onto the deck and waved and grinned at over
three billion people. The three billion people weren’t actually there, but they
watched his every gesture through the eyes of a small robot tri-D camera
which hovered obsequiously in the air nearby. The antics of the President
always made amazingly popular tri-D; that’s what they were for.
He grinned again. Three billion and six people didn’t know it, but today
would be a bigger antic than anyone had bargained for.
The robot camera homed in for a close up on the more popular of his two
heads and he waved again. He was roughly humanoid in appearance except
for the extra head and third arm. His fair tousled hair stuck out in random
directions, his blue eyes glinted with something completely unidentifiable,
and his chins were almost always unshaven.
A twenty-foot-high transparent globe floated next to his boat, rolling and
bobbing, glistening in the brilliant sun. Inside it floated a wide semi-circular
sofa upholstered in glorious red leather: the more the globe bobbed and
rolled, the more the sofa stayed perfectly still, steady as an upholstered rock.
Again, all done for effect as much as anything.
Zaphod stepped through the wall of the globe and relaxed on the sofa.
He spread his two arms lazily along the back and with the third brushed
some dust off his knee. His heads looked about, smiling; he put his feet up.
At any moment, he thought, he might scream.
Water boiled up beneath the bubble, it seethed and spouted. The bubble
surged into the air, bobbing and rolling on the water spout. Up, up it
climbed, throwing stilts of light at the cliff. Up it surged on the jet, the
water falling from beneath it, crashing back into the sea hundreds of feet
below.
Zaphod smiled, picturing himself.
A thoroughly ridiculous form of transport, but a thoroughly beautiful
one.
At the top of the cliff the globe wavered for a moment, tipped on to a
railed ramp, rolled down it to a small concave platform and riddled to a halt.
To tremendous applause Zaphod Beeblebrox stepped out of the bubble,
his orange sash blazing in the light.
The President of the Galaxy had arrived.
He waited for the applause to die down, then raised his hands in greeting.
”Hi,” he said.
A government spider sidled up to him and attempted to press a copy of his
prepared speech into his hands. Pages three to seven of the original version
were at the moment floating soggily on the Damogran sea some five miles out
from the bay. Pages one and two had been salvaged by a Damogran Frond
27
Crested Eagle and had already become incorporated into an extraordinary
new form of nest which the eagle had invented. It was constructed largely
of papier mˆach´e and it was virtually impossible for a newly hatched baby
eagle to break out of it. The Damogran Frond Crested Eagle had heard of
the notion of survival of the species but wanted no truck with it.
Zaphod Beeblebrox would not be needing his set speech and he gently
deflected the one being offered him by the spider.
”Hi,” he said again.
Everyone beamed at him, or, at least, nearly everyone. He singled out
Trillian from the crowd. Trillian was a gird that Zaphod had picked up
recently whilst visiting a planet, just for fun, incognito. She was slim, darkish,
humanoid, with long waves of black hair, a full mouth, an odd little nob of
a nose and ridiculously brown eyes. With her red head scarf knotted in that
particular way and her long flowing silky brown dress she looked vaguely
Arabic. Not that anyone there had ever heard of an Arab of course. The
Arabs had very recently ceased to exist, and even when they had existed
they were five hundred thousand light years from Damogran. Trillian wasn’t
anybody in particular, or so Zaphod claimed. She just went around with him
rather a lot and told him what she thought of him.
”Hi honey,” he said to her.
She flashed him a quick tight smile and looked away. Then she looked
back for a moment and smiled more warmly – but by this time he was looking
at something else.
”Hi,” he said to a small knot of creatures from the press who were standing
nearby wishing that he would stop saying Hi and get on with the quotes.
He grinned at them particularly because he knew that in a few moments he
would be giving them one hell of a quote.
The next thing he said though was not a lot of use to them. One of the
officials of the party had irritably decided that the President was clearly not
in a mood to read the deliciously turned speech that had been written for
him, and had flipped the switch on the remote control device in his pocket.
Away in front of them a huge white dome that bulged against the sky cracked
down in the middle, split, and slowly folded itself down into the ground.
Everyone gasped although they had known perfectly well it was going to do
that because they had built it that way.
Beneath it lay uncovered a huge starship, one hundred and fifty metres
long, shaped like a sleek running shoe, perfectly white and mindboggingly
beautiful. At the heart of it, unseen, lay a small gold box which carried
within it the most brain-wretching device ever conceived, a device which
made this starship unique in the history of the galaxy, a device after which
the ship had been named – The Heart of Gold.
28
”Wow”, said Zaphod Beeblebrox to the Heart of Gold. There wasn’t
much else he could say.
He said it again because he knew it would annoy the press. ”Wow.”
The crowd turned their faces back towards him expectantly. He winked
at Trillian who raised her eyebrows and widened her eyes at him. She knew
what he was about to say and thought him a terrible showoff.
”That is really amazing,” he said. ”That really is truly amazing. That is
so amazingly amazing I think I’d like to steal it.”
A marvellous Presidential quote, absolutely true to form. The crowd
laughed appreciatively, the newsmen gleefully punched buttons on their SubEtha
News-Matics and the President grinned.
As he grinned his heart screamed unbearably and he fingered the small
Paralyso-Matic bomb that nestled quietly in his pocket.
Finally he could bear it no more. He lifted his heads up to the sky, let
out a wild whoop in major thirds, threw the bomb to the ground and ran
forward through the sea of suddenly frozen smiles.
29
Chapter 5
Prostetnic Vogon Jeltz was not a pleasant sight, even for other Vogons. His
highly domed nose rose high above a small piggy forehead. His dark green
rubbery skin was thick enough for him to play the game of Vogon Civil
Service politics, and play it well, and waterproof enough for him to survive
indefinitely at sea depths of up to a thousand feet with no ill effects.
Not that he ever went swimming of course. His busy schedule would not
allow it. He was the way he was because billions of years ago when the
Vogons had first crawled out of the sluggish primeval seas of Vogsphere, and
had lain panting and heaving on the planet’s virgin shores. . . when the first
rays of the bright young Vogsol sun had shone across them that morning, it
was as if the forces of evolution ad simply given up on them there and then,
had turned aside in disgust and written them off as an ugly and unfortunate
mistake. They never evolved again; they should never have survived.
The fact that they did is some kind of tribute to the thickwilled slugbrained
stubbornness of these creatures. Evolution? they said to themselves,
Who needs it?, and what nature refused to do for them they simply did
without until such time as they were able to rectify the grosser anatomical
inconveniences with surgery.
Meanwhile, the natural forces on the planet Vogsphere had been working
overtime to make up for their earlier blunder. They brought forth scintillating
jewelled scuttling crabs, which the Vogons ate, smashing their shells with iron
mallets; tall aspiring trees with breathtaking slenderness and colour which
the Vogons cut down and burned the crab meat with; elegant gazellelike
creatures with silken coats and dewy eyes which the Vogons would catch
and sit on. They were no use as transport because their backs would snap
instantly, but the Vogons sat on them anyway.
Thus the planet Vogsphere whiled away the unhappy millennia until the
Vogons suddenly discovered the principles of interstellar travel. Within a few
short Vog years every last Vogon had migrated to the Megabrantis cluster, the
political hub of the Galaxy and now formed the immensely powerful backbone
30
of the Galactic Civil Service. They have attempted to acquire learning, they
have attempted to acquire style and social grace, but in most respects the
modern Vogon is little different from his primitive forebears. Every year they
import twenty-seven thousand scintillating jewelled scuttling crabs from their
native planet and while away a happy drunken night smashing them to bits
with iron mallets.
Prostetnic Vogon Jeltz was a fairly typical Vogon in that he was thoroughly
vile. Also, he did not like hitchhikers.
* * *
Somewhere in a small dark cabin buried deep in the intestines of Prostetnic
Vogon Jeltz’s flagship, a small match flared nervously. The owner of the
match was not a Vogon, but he knew all about them and was right to be
nervous. His name was Ford Prefect.1
He looked about the cabin but could see very little; strange monstrous
shadows loomed and leaped with the tiny flickering flame, but all was quiet.
He breathed a silent thank you to the Dentrassis. The Dentrassis are an
unruly tribe of gourmands, a wild but pleasant bunch whom the Vogons had
recently taken to employing as catering staff on their long haul fleets, on the
strict understanding that they keep themselves very much to themselves.
This suited the Dentrassis fine, because they loved Vogon money, which
is one of the hardest currencies in space, but loathed the Vogons themselves.
The only sort of Vogon a Dentrassi liked to see was an annoyed Vogon.
It was because of this tiny piece of information that Ford Prefect was not
now a whiff of hydrogen, ozone and carbon monoxide.
He heard a slight groan. By the light of the match he saw a heavy shape
moving slightly on the floor. Quickly he shook the match out, reached in his
1Ford Prefect’s original name is only pronuncible in an obscure Betelgeusian dialect,
now virtually extinct since the Great Collapsing Hrung Disaster of Gal./Sid./Year 03758
which wiped out all the old Praxibetel communities on Betelgeuse Seven. Ford’s father
was the only man on the entire planet to survive the Great Collapsing Hrung disaster, by
an extraordinary coincidence that he was never able satisfactorily to explain. The whole
episode is shrouded in deep mystery: in fact no one ever knew what a Hrung was nor why
it had chosen to collapse on Betelgeuse Seven particularly. Ford’s father, magnanimously
waving aside the clouds of suspicion that had inevitably settled around him, came to live
on Betelgeuse Five where he both fathered and uncled Ford; in memory of his now dead
race he christened him in the ancient Praxibetel tongue.
Because Ford never learned to say his original name, his father eventually died of shame,
which is still a terminal disease in some parts of the Galaxy. The other kids at school
nicknamed him Ix, which in the language of Betelgeuse Five translates as ”boy who is not
able satisfactorily to explain what a Hrung is, nor why it should choose to collapse on
Betelgeuse Seven”.
31
pocket, found what he was looking for and took it out. He crouched on the
floor. The shape moved again.
Ford Prefect said: ”I bought some peanuts.”
Arthur Dent moved, and groaned again, muttering incoherently.
”Here, have some,” urged Ford, shaking the packet again, ”if you’ve never
been through a matter transference beam before you’ve probably lost some
salt and protein. The beer you had should have cushioned your system a
bit.”
”Whhhrrrr. . . ” said Arthur Dent. He opened his eyes. ”It’s dark,” he
said.
”Yes,” said Ford Prefect, ”it’s dark.”
”No light,” said Arthur Dent. ”Dark, no light.”
One of the things Ford Prefect had always found hardest to understand
about human beings was their habit of continually stating and repeating the
obvious, as in It’s a nice day, or You’re very tall, or Oh dear you seem to
have fallen down a thirty-foot well, are you alright? At first Ford had formed
a theory to account for this strange behaviour. If human beings don’t keep
exercising their lips, he thought, their mouths probably seize up. After a few
months’ consideration and observation he abandoned this theory in favour
of a new one. If they don’t keep on exercising their lips, he thought, their
brains start working. After a while he abandoned this one as well as being
obstructively cynical and decided he quite liked human beings after all, but
he always remained desperately worried about the terrible number of things
they didn’t know about.
”Yes,” he agreed with Arthur, ”no light.” He helped Arthur to some
peanuts. ”How do you feel?” he asked.
”Like a military academy,” said Arthur, ”bits of me keep on passing out.”
Ford stared at him blankly in the darkness.
”If I asked you where the hell we were,” said Arthur weakly, ”would I
regret it?”
Ford stood up. ”We’re safe,” he said.
”Oh good,” said Arthur.
”We’re in a small galley cabin,” said Ford, ”in one of the spaceships of
the Vogon Constructor Fleet.”
”Ah,” said Arthur, ”this is obviously some strange usage of the word safe
that I wasn’t previously aware of.”
Ford struck another match to help him search for a light switch. Monstrous
shadows leaped and loomed again. Arthur struggled to his feet and
hugged himself apprehensively. Hideous alien shapes seemed to throng about
him, the air was thick with musty smells which sidled into his lungs without
identifying themselves, and a low irritating hum kept his brain from focusing.
32
”How did we get here?” he asked, shivering slightly.
”We hitched a lift,” said Ford.
”Excuse me?” said Arthur. ”Are you trying to tell me that we just stuck
out our thumbs and some green bug-eyed monster stuck his head out and said,
Hi fellas, hop right in. I can take you as far as the Basingstoke roundabout?”
”Well,” said Ford, ”the Thumb’s an electronic sub-etha signalling device,
the roundabout’s at Barnard’s Star six light years away, but otherwise, that’s
more or less right.”
”And the bug-eyed monster?”
”Is green, yes.”
”Fine,” said Arthur, ”when can I get home?”
”You can’t,” said Ford Prefect, and found the light switch.
”Shade your eyes . . . ” he said, and turned it on.
Even Ford was surprised.
”Good grief,” said Arthur, ”is this really the interior of a flying saucer?”
Prostetnic Vogon Jeltz heaved his unpleasant green body round the control
bridge. He always felt vaguely irritable after demolishing populated
planets. He wished that someone would come and tell him that it was all
wrong so that he could shout at them and feel better. He flopped as heavily
as he could on to his control seat in the hope that it would break and give
him something to be genuinely angry about, but it only gave a complaining
sort of creak.
”Go away!” he shouted at a young Vogon guard who entered the bridge
at that moment. The guard vanished immediately, feeling rather relieved.
He was glad it wouldn’t now be him who delivered the report they’d just
received. The report was an official release which said that a wonderful new
form of spaceship drive was at this moment being unveiled at a government
research base on Damogran which would henceforth make all hyperspatial
express routes unnecessary.
Another door slid open, but this time the Vogon captain didn’t shout because
it was the door from the galley quarters where the Dentrassis prepared
his meals. A meal would be most welcome.
A huge furry creature bounded through the door with his lunch tray. It
was grinning like a maniac.
Prostetnic Vogon Jeltz was delighted. He knew that when a Dentrassi
looked that pleased with itself there was something going on somewhere on
the ship that he could get very angry indeed about.
Ford and Arthur stared about them.
”Well, what do you think?” said Ford.
33
”It’s a bit squalid, isn’t it?”
Ford frowned at the grubby mattress, unwashed cups and unidentifiable
bits of smelly alien underwear that lay around the cramped cabin.
”Well, this is a working ship, you see,” said Ford. ”These are the Dentrassi
sleeping quarters.”
”I thought you said they were called Vogons or something.”
”Yes,” said Ford, ”the Vogons run the ship, the Dentrassis are the cooks,
they let us on board.”
”I’m confused,” said Arthur.
”Here, have a look at this,” said Ford. He sat down on one of the mattresses
and rummaged about in his satchel. Arthur prodded the mattress
nervously and then sat on it himself: in fact he had very little to be nervous
about, because all mattresses grown in the swamps of Squornshellous Zeta
are very thoroughly killed and dried before being put to service. Very few
have ever come to life again.
Ford handed the book to Arthur.
”What is it?” asked Arthur.
”The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy. It’s a sort of electronic book. It
tells you everything you need to know about anything. That’s its job.”
Arthur turned it over nervously in his hands.
”I like the cover,” he said. ”Don’t Panic. It’s the first helpful or intelligible
thing anybody’s said to me all day.”
”I’ll show you how it works,” said Ford. He snatched it from Arthur who
was still holding it as if it was a two-week-dead lark and pulled it out of its
cover.
”You press this button here you see and the screen lights up giving you
the index.”
A screen, about three inches by four, lit up and characters began to flicker
across the surface.
”You want to know about Vogons, so I enter that name so.” His fingers
tapped some more keys. ”And there we are.”
The words Vogon Constructor Fleets flared in green across the screen.
Ford pressed a large red button at the bottom of the screen and words began
to undulate across it. At the same time, the book began to speak the entry
as well in a still quiet measured voice. This is what the book said.
”Vogon Constructor Fleets. Here is what to do if you want to get a
lift from a Vogon: forget it. They are one of the most unpleasant races in
the Galaxy – not actually evil, but bad tempered, bureaucratic, officious and
callous. They wouldn’t even lift a finger to save their own grandmothers from
the Ravenous Bugblatter Beast of Traal without orders signed in triplicate,
34
sent in, sent back, queried, lost, found, subjected to public inquiry, lost again,
and finally buried in soft peat and recycled as firelighters.
”The best way to get a drink out of a Vogon is to stick your finger down
his throat, and the best way to irritate him is to feed his grandmother to the
Ravenous Bugblatter Beast of Traal.
”On no account allow a Vogon to read poetry at you.”
Arthur blinked at it.
”What a strange book. How did we get a lift then?”
”That’s the point, it’s out of date now,” said Ford, sliding the book back
into its cover. ”I’m doing the field research for the New Revised Edition,
and one of the things I’ll have to include is a bit about how the Vogons now
employ Dentrassi cooks which gives us a rather useful little loophole.”
A pained expression crossed Arthur’s face. ”But who are the Dentrassi?”
he said.
”Great guys,” said Ford. ”They’re the best cooks and the best drink
mixers and they don’t give a wet slap about anything else. And they’ll
always help hitchhikers aboard, partly because they like the company, but
mostly because it annoys the Vogons. Which is exactly the sort of thing you
need to know if you’re an impoverished hitchhiker trying to see the marvels
of the Universe for less than thirty Altairan Dollars a day. And that’s my
job. Fun, isn’t it?”
Arthur looked lost.
”It’s amazing,” he said and frowned at one of the other mattresses.
”Unfortunately I got stuck on the Earth for rather longer than I intended,”
said Ford. ”I came for a week and got stuck for fifteen years.”
”But how did you get there in the first place then?”
”Easy, I got a lift with a teaser.”
”A teaser?”
”Yeah.”
”Er, what is . . . ”
”A teaser? Teasers are usually rich kids with nothing to do. They cruise
around looking for planets which haven’t made interstellar contact yet and
buzz them.”
”Buzz them?” Arthur began to feel that Ford was enjoying making life
difficult for him.
”Yeah”, said Ford, ”they buzz them. They find some isolated spot with
very few people around, then land right by some poor soul whom no one’s
ever going to believe and then strut up and down in front of him wearing
silly antennae on their heads and making beep beep noises. Rather childish
really.” Ford leant back on the mattress with his hands behind his head and
looked infuriatingly pleased with himself.
35
”Ford,” insisted Arthur, ”I don’t know if this sounds like a silly question,
but what am I doing here?”
”Well you know that,” said Ford. ”I rescued you from the Earth.” ”And
what’s happened to the Earth?”
”Ah. It’s been demolished.”
”Has it,” said Arthur levelly.
”Yes. It just boiled away into space.”
”Look,” said Arthur, ”I’m a bit upset about that.”
Ford frowned to himself and seemed to roll the thought around his mind.
”Yes, I can understand that,” he said at last.
”Understand that!” shouted Arthur. ”Understand that!”
Ford sprang up.
”Keep looking at the book!” he hissed urgently.
”What?”
”Don’t Panic.”
”I’m not panicking!”
”Yes you are.”
”All right so I’m panicking, what else is there to do?”
”You just come along with me and have a good time. The Galaxy’s a fun
place. You’ll need to have this fish in your ear.”
”I beg your pardon?” asked Arthur, rather politely he thought.
Ford was holding up a small glass jar which quite clearly had a small
yellow fish wriggling around in it. Arthur blinked at him. He wished there
was something simple and recognizable he could grasp hold of. He would
have felt safe if alongside the Dentrassi underwear, the piles of Squornshellous
mattresses and the man from Betelgeuse holding up a small yellow fish and
offering to put it in his ear he had been able to see just a small packet of
corn flakes. He couldn’t, and he didn’t feel safe.
Suddenly a violent noise leapt at them from no source that he could
identify. He gasped in terror at what sounded like a man trying to gargle
whilst fighting off a pack of wolves.
”Shush!” said Ford. ”Listen, it might be important.”
”Im . . . important?”
”It’s the Vogon captain making an announcement on the tannoy.”
”You mean that’s how the Vogons talk?”
”Listen!”
”But I can’t speak Vogon!”
”You don’t need to. Just put that fish in your ear.”
Ford, with a lightning movement, clapped his hand to Arthur’s ear, and
he had the sudden sickening sensation of the fish slithering deep into his aural
tract. Gasping with horror he scrabbled at his ear for a second or so, but
36
then slowly turned goggle-eyed with wonder. He was experiencing the aural
equivalent of looking at a picture of two black silhouetted faces and suddenly
seeing it as a picture of a white candlestick. Or of looking at a lot of coloured
dots on a piece of paper which suddenly resolve themselves into the figure
six and mean that your optician is going to charge you a lot of money for a
new pair of glasses.
He was still listening to the howling gargles, he knew that, only now it
had taken on the semblance of perfectly straightforward English.
This is what he heard . . .
37
Chapter 6
”Howl howl gargle howl gargle howl howl howl gargle howl gargle howl howl
gargle gargle howl gargle gargle gargle howl slurrp uuuurgh should have a
good time. Message repeats. This is your captain speaking, so stop whatever
you’re doing and pay attention. First of all I see from our instruments that
we have a couple of hitchhikers aboard. Hello wherever you are. I just want
to make it totally clear that you are not at all welcome. I worked hard to
get where I am today, and I didn’t become captain of a Vogon constructor
ship simply so I could turn it into a taxi service for a load of degenerate
freeloaders. I have sent out a search party, and as soon that they find you I
will put you off the ship. If you’re very lucky I might read you some of my
poetry first.
”Secondly, we are about to jump into hyperspace for the journey to
Barnard’s Star. On arrival we will stay in dock for a seventy-two hour refit,
and no one’s to leave the ship during that time. I repeat, all planet leave is
cancelled. I’ve just had an unhappy love affair, so I don’t see why anybody
else should have a good time. Message ends.”
The noise stopped.
Arthur discovered to his embarrassment that he was lying curled up in
a small ball on the floor with his arms wrapped round his head. He smiled
weakly.
”Charming man,” he said. ”I wish I had a daughter so I could forbid her
to marry one . . . ”
”You wouldn’t need to,” said Ford. ”They’ve got as much sex appeal as a
road accident. No, don’t move,” he added as Arthur began to uncurl himself,
”you’d better be prepared for the jump into hyperspace. It’s unpleasantly
like being drunk.”
”What’s so unpleasant about being drunk?”
”You ask a glass of water.”
Arthur thought about this.
”Ford,” he said.
38
”Yeah?”
”What’s this fish doing in my ear?”
”It’s translating for you. It’s a Babel fish. Look it up in the book if you
like.”
He tossed over The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy and then curled
himself up into a foetal ball to prepare himself for the jump.
At that moment the bottom fell out of Arthur’s mind.
His eyes turned inside out. His feet began to leak out of the top of his
head.
The room folded flat about him, spun around, shifted out of existence
and left him sliding into his own navel.
They were passing through hyperspace.
”The Babel fish,” said The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy quietly, ”is
small, yellow and leech-like, and probably the oddest thing in the Universe.
It feeds on brainwave energy not from its carrier but from those around it.
It absorbs all unconscious mental frequencies from this brainwave energy to
nourish itself with. It then excretes into the mind of its carrier a telepathic
matrix formed by combining the conscious thought frequencies with nerve
signals picked up from the speech centres of the brain which has supplied
them. The practical upshot of all this is that if you stick a Babel fish in
your ear you can instantly understand anything said to you in any form of
language. The speech patterns you actually hear decode the brainwave matrix
which has been fed into your mind by your Babel fish.
”Now it is such a bizarrely improbable coincidence that anything so mindboggingly
useful could have evolved purely by chance that some thinkers have
chosen to see it as the final and clinching proof of the non-existence of God.
”The argument goes something like this: ‘I refuse to prove that I exist,’
says God, ‘for proof denies faith, and without faith I am nothing.’
”‘But,’ says Man, ‘The Babel fish is a dead giveaway, isn’t it? It could
not have evolved by chance. It proves you exist, and so therefore, by your
own arguments, you don’t. QED.’
”‘Oh dear,’ says God, ‘I hadn’t thought of that,’ and promptly vanished
in a puff of logic.
”‘Oh, that was easy,’ says Man, and for an encore goes on to prove that
black is white and gets himself killed on the next zebra crossing.
”Most leading theologians claim that this argument is a load of dingo’s
kidneys, but that didn’t stop Oolon Colluphid making a small fortune when
he used it as the central theme of his bestselling book Well That About Wraps
It Up For God.
”Meanwhile, the poor Babel fish, by effectively removing all barriers to
communication between different races and cultures, has caused more and
39
bloddier wars than anything else in the history of creation.”
Arthur let out a low groan. He was horrified to discover that the kick
through hyperspace hadn’t killed him. He was now six light years from the
place that the Earth would have been if it still existed.
The Earth.
Visions of it swam sickeningly through his nauseated mind. There was no
way his imagination could feel the impact of the whole Earth having gone,
it was too big. He prodded his feelings by thinking that his parents and
his sister had gone. No reaction. He thought of all the people he had been
close to. No reaction. Then he thought of a complete stranger he had been
standing behind in the queue at the supermarket before and felt a sudden
stab – the supermarket was gone, everything in it was gone. Nelson’s Column
had gone! Nelson’s Column had gone and there would be no outcry, because
there was no one left to make an outcry. From now on Nelson’s Column only
existed in his mind. England only existed in his mind – his mind, stuck here
in this dank smelly steel-lined spaceship. A wave of claustrophobia closed in
on him.
England no longer existed. He’d got that – somehow he’d got it. He tried
again. America, he thought, has gone. He couldn’t grasp it. He decided to
start smaller again. New York has gone. No reaction. He’d never seriously
believed it existed anyway. The dollar, he thought, had sunk for ever. Slight
tremor there. Every Bogart movie has been wiped, he said to himself, and
that gave him a nasty knock. McDonalds, he thought. There is no longer
any such thing as a McDonald’s hamburger.
He passed out. When he came round a second later he found he was
sobbing for his mother.
He jerked himself violently to his feet.
”Ford!”
Ford looked up from where he was sitting in a corner humming to himself.
He always found the actual travelling-through-space part of space travel
rather trying.
”Yeah?” he said.
”If you’re a researcher on this book thing and you were on Earth, you
must have been gathering material on it.”
”Well, I was able to extend the original entry a bit, yes.”
”Let me see what it says in this edition then, I’ve got to see it.”
”Yeah OK.” He passed it over again.
Arthur grabbed hold of it and tried to stop his hands shaking. He pressed
the entry for the relevant page. The screen flashed and swirled and resolved
into a page of print. Arthur stared at it.
”It doesn’t have an entry!” he burst out.
40
Ford looked over his shoulder.
”Yes it does,” he said, ”down there, see at the bottom of the screen, just
under Eccentrica Gallumbits, the triple-breasted whore of Eroticon 6.”
Arthur followed Ford’s finger, and saw where it was pointing. For a
moment it still didn’t register, then his mind nearly blew up.
”What? Harmless? Is that all it’s got to say? Harmless! One word!”
Ford shrugged. ”Well, there are a hundred billion stars in the Galaxy,
and only a limited amount of space in the book’s microprocessors,” he said,
”and no one knew much about the Earth of course.”
”Well for God’s sake I hope you managed to rectify that a bit.”
”Oh yes, well I managed to transmit a new entry off to the editor. He
had to trim it a bit, but it’s still an improvement.”
”And what does it say now?” asked Arthur.
”Mostly harmless,” admitted Ford with a slightly embarrassed cough.
”Mostly harmless!” shouted Arthur.
”What was that noise?” hissed Ford.
”It was me shouting,” shouted Arthur.
”No! Shut up!” said Ford. I think we’re in trouble.”
”You think we’re in trouble!”
Outside the door were the sounds of marching feet. ”The Dentrassi?”
whispered Arthur.
”No, those are steel tipped boots,” said Ford.
There was a sharp ringing rap on the door.
”Then who is it?” said Arthur.
”Well,” said Ford, ”if we’re lucky it’s just the Vogons come to throw us
in to space.”
”And if we’re unlucky?”
”If we’re unlucky,” said Ford grimly, ”the captain might be serious in his
threat that he’s going to read us some of his poetry first . . . ”
41
Chapter 7
Vogon poetry is of course the third worst in the Universe. The second worst
is that of the Azagoths of Kria. During a recitation by their Poet Master
Grunthos the Flatulent of his poem ”Ode To A Small Lump of Green Putty I
Found In My Armpit One Midsummer Morning” four of his audience died of
internal haemorrhaging, and the President of the Mid-Galactic Arts Nobbling
Council survived by gnawing one of his own legs off. Grunthos is reported
to have been ”disappointed” by the poem’s reception, and was about to
embark on a reading of his twelvebook epic entitled My Favourite Bathtime
Gurgles when his own major intestine, in a desperate attempt to save life
and civilization, leapt straight up through his neck and throttled his brain.
The very worst poetry of all perished along with its creator Paula Nancy
Millstone Jennings of Greenbridge, Essex, England in the destruction of the
planet Earth.
Prostetnic Vogon Jeltz smiled very slowly. This was done not so much for
effect as because he was trying to remember the sequence of muscle movements.
He had had a terribly therapeutic yell at his prisoners and was now
feeling quite relaxed and ready for a little callousness.
The prisoners sat in Poetry Appreciation Chairs – strapped in. Vogons
suffered no illusions as to the regard their works were generally held in. Their
early attempts at composition had been part of bludgeoning insistence that
they be accepted as a properly evolved and cultured race, but now the only
thing that kept them going was sheer bloodymindedness.
The sweat stood out cold on Ford Prefect’s brow, and slid round the
electrodes strapped to his temples. These were attached to a battery of
electronic equipment – imagery intensifiers, rhythmic modulators, alliterative
residulators and simile dumpers – all designed to heighten the experience of
the poem and make sure that not a single nuance of the poet’s thought was
lost.
Arthur Dent sat and quivered. He had no idea what he was in for, but
42
he knew that he hadn’t liked anything that had happened so far and didn’t
think things were likely to change.
The Vogon began to read – a fetid little passage of his own devising.
”Oh freddled gruntbuggly . . . ” he began. Spasms wracked Ford’s body –
this was worse than ever he’d been prepared for.
”? . . . thy micturations are to me – As plurdled gabbleblotchits on a lurgid
bee.”
”Aaaaaaarggggghhhhhh!” went Ford Prefect, wrenching his head back as
lumps of pain thumped through it. He could dimly see beside him Arthur
lolling and rolling in his seat. He clenched his teeth.
”Groop I implore thee,” continued the merciless Vogon, ”my foonting
turlingdromes.”
His voice was rising to a horrible pitch of impassioned stridency. ”And
hooptiously drangle me with crinkly bindlewurdles,/ Or I will rend thee in the
gobberwarts with my blurglecruncheon, see if I don’t!”
”Nnnnnnnnnnyyyyyyyuuuuuuurrrrrrrggggggghhhhh!” cried Ford Prefect
and threw one final spasm as the electronic enhancement of the last line
caught him full blast across the temples. He went limp.
Arthur lolled.
”Now Earthlings . . . ” whirred the Vogon (he didn’t know that Ford Prefect
was in fact from a small planet in the vicinity of Betelgeuse, and wouldn’t
have cared if he had) ”I present you with a simple choice! Either die in the
vacuum of space, or . . . ” he paused for melodramatic effect, ”tell me how
good you thought my poem was!”
He threw himself backwards into a huge leathery bat-shaped seat and
watched them. He did the smile again.
Ford was rasping for breath. He rolled his dusty tongue round his parched
mouth and moaned.
Arthur said brightly: ”Actually I quite liked it.”
Ford turned and gaped. Here was an approach that had quite simply not
occurred to him.
The Vogon raised a surprised eyebrow that effectively obscured his nose
and was therefore no bad thing.
”Oh good . . . ” he whirred, in considerable astonishment.
”Oh yes,” said Arthur, ”I thought that some of the metaphysical imagery
was really particularly effective.”
Ford continued to stare at him, slowly organizing his thoughts around
this totally new concept. Were they really going to be able to bareface their
way out of this?
”Yes, do continue . . . ” invited the Vogon.
43
”Oh . . . and, er . . . interesting rhythmic devices too,” continued Arthur,
”which seemed to counterpoint the . . . er . . . er . . . ” he floundered.
Ford leaped to his rescue, hazarding ”counterpoint the surrealism of the
underlying metaphor of the . . . er . . . ” He floundered too, but Arthur was
ready again.
”. . . humanity of the . . . ”
”Vogonity,” Ford hissed at him.
”Ah yes, Vogonity – sorry – of the poet’s compassionate soul,” – Arthur
felt he was on a home stretch now – ,”which contrives through the medium of
the verse structure to sublimate this, transcend that, and come to terms with
the fundamental dichotomies of the other,” – he was reaching a triumphant
crescendo – ”and one is left with a profound and vivid insight into . . . into
. . . er . . . ” (which suddenly gave out on him.)
Ford leaped in with the coup de grace:
”Into whatever it was the poem was about!” he yelled. Out of the corner
of his mouth: ”Well done, Arthur, that was very good.”
The Vogon perused them. For a moment his embittered racial soul had
been touched, but he thought no – too little too late. His voice took on the
quality of a cat snagging brushed nylon.
”So what you’re saying is that I write poetry because underneath my
mean callous heartless exterior I really just want to be loved,” he said. He
paused. ”Is that right?”
Ford laughed a nervous laugh. ”Well I mean yes,” he said, ”don’t we all,
deep down, you know . . . er . . . ”
The Vogon stood up.
”No, well you’re completely wrong,” he said, ”I just write poetry to throw
my mean callous heartless exterior into sharp relief. I’m going to throw you
off the ship anyway. Guard! Take the prisoners to number three airlock and
throw them out!”
”What?” shouted Ford.
A huge young Vogon guard stepped forward and yanked them out of their
straps with his huge blubbery arms.
”You can’t throw us into space,” yelled Ford, ”we’re trying to write a
book.”
”Resistance is useless!” shouted the Vogon guard back at him. It was the
first phrase he’d learnt when he joined the Vogon Guard Corps.
The captain watched with detached amusement and then turned away.
Arthur stared round him wildly.
”I don’t want to die now!” he yelled. ”I’ve still got a headache! I don’t
want to go to heaven with a headache, I’d be all cross and wouldn’t enjoy
it!”
44
The guard grasped them both firmly round the neck, and bowing deferentially
towards his captain’s back, hoiked them both protesting out of the
bridge. A steel door closed and the captain was on his own again. He hummed
quietly and mused to himself, lightly fingering his notebook of verses.
”Hmmmm,” he said, ”counterpoint the surrealism of the underlying metaphor
. . . ” He considered this for a moment, and then closed the book with a grim
smile.
”Death’s too good for them,” he said.
The long steel-lined corridor echoed to the feeble struggles of the two
humanoids clamped firmly under rubbery Vogon armpits.
”This is great,” spluttered Arthur, ”this is really terrific. Let go of me
you brute!”
The Vogon guard dragged them on.
”Don’t you worry,” said Ford, ”I’ll think of something.” He didn’t sound
hopeful.
”Resistance is useless!” bellowed the guard.
”Just don’t say things like that,” stammered Ford. ”How can anyone
maintain a positive mental attitude if you’re saying things like that?”
”My God,” complained Arthur, ”you’re talking about a positive mental
attitude and you haven’t even had your planet demolished today. I woke up
this morning and thought I’d have a nice relaxed day, do a bit of reading,
brush the dog . . . It’s now just after four in the afternoon and I’m already
thrown out of an alien spaceship six light years from the smoking remains of
the Earth!” He spluttered and gurgled as the Vogon tightened his grip.
”All right,” said Ford, ”just stop panicking.”
”Who said anything about panicking?” snapped Arthur. ”This is still
just the culture shock. You wait till I’ve settled down into the situation and
found my bearings. Then I’ll start panicking.”
”Arthur you’re getting hysterical. Shut up!” Ford tried desperately to
think, but was interrupted by the guard shouting again.
”Resistance is useless!”
”And you can shut up as well!” snapped Ford.
”Resistance is useless!”
”Oh give it a rest,” said Ford. He twisted his head till he was looking
straight up into his captor’s face. A thought struck him.
”Do you really enjoy this sort of thing?” he asked suddenly.
The Vogon stopped dead and a look of immense stupidity seeped slowly
over his face.
”Enjoy?” he boomed. ”What do you mean?”
45
”What I mean,” said Ford, ”is does it give you a full satisfying life?
Stomping around, shouting, pushing people out of spaceships . . . ”
The Vogon stared up at the low steel ceiling and his eyebrows almost
rolled over each other. His mouth slacked. Finally he said, ”Well the hours
are good . . . ”
”They’d have to be,” agreed Ford.
Arthur twisted his head to look at Ford.
”Ford, what are you doing?” he asked in an amazed whisper.
”Oh, just trying to take an interest in the world around me, Okay?” he
said. ”So the hours are pretty good then?” he resumed.
The Vogon stared down at him as sluggish thoughts moiled around in the
murky depths.
”Yeah,” he said, ”but now you come to mention it, most of the actual
minutes are pretty lousy. Except . . . ” he thought again, which required
looking at the ceiling – ”except some of the shouting I quite like.” He filled
his lungs and bellowed, ”Resistance is . . . ”
”Sure, yes,” interrupted Ford hurriedly, ”you’re good at that, I can tell.
But if it’s mostly lousy,” he said, slowly giving the words time to reach their
mark, ”then why do you do it? What is it? The girls? The leather? The
machismo? Or do you just find that coming to terms with the mindless
tedium of it all presents an interesting challenge?”
Arthur looked backward and forward between them in bafflement.
”Er . . . ” said the guard, ”er . . . er . . . I dunno. I think I just sort of . . . do
it really. My aunt said that spaceship guard was a good career for a young
Vogon – you know, the uniform, the lowslung stun ray holster, the mindless
tedium . . . ”
”There you are, Arthur,” said Ford with the air of someone reaching the
conclusion of his argument, ”you think you’ve got problems.”
Arthur rather thought he had. Apart from the unpleasant business with
his home planet the Vogon guard had half-throttled him already and he
didn’t like the sound of being thrown into space very much.
”Try and understand his problem,” insisted Ford. ”Here he is poor lad,
his entire life’s work is stamping around, throwing people off spaceships . . . ”
”And shouting,” added the guard.
”And shouting, sure,” said Ford patting the blubbery arm clamped round
his neck in friendly condescension, ”. . . and he doesn’t even know why he’s
doing it!”
Arthur agreed this was very sad. He did this with a small feeble gesture,
because he was too asphyxicated to speak.
Deep rumblings of bemusement came from the guard.
”Well. Now you put it like that I suppose . . . ”
46
”Good lad!” encouraged Ford.
”But alright,” went on the rumblings, ”so what’s the alternative?”
”Well,” said Ford, brightly but slowly, ”stop doing it of course! Tell
them,” he went on, ”you’re not going to do it anymore.” He felt he had to
add something to that, but for the moment the guard seemed to have his
mind occupied pondering that much.
”Eerrrrrrmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmm . . . ” said the guard, ”erm,
well that doesn’t sound that great to me.”
Ford suddenly felt the moment slipping away.
”Now wait a minute,” he said, ”that’s just the start you see, there’s more
to it than that you see . . . ”
But at that moment the guard renewed his grip and continued his original
purpose of lugging his prisoners to the airlock. He was obviously quite
touched.
”No, I think if it’s all the same to you,” he said, ”I’d better get you
both shoved into this airlock and then go and get on with some other bits of
shouting I’ve got to do.”
It wasn’t all the same to Ford Prefect after all.
”Come on now . . . but look!” he said, less slowly, less brightly.
”Huhhhhgggggggnnnnnnn . . . ” said Arthur without any clear inflection.
”But hang on,” pursued Ford, ”there’s music and art and things to tell
you about yet! Arrrggghhh!”
”Resistance is useless,” bellowed the guard, and then added, ”You see
if I keep it up I can eventually get promoted to Senior Shouting Officer,
and there aren’t usually many vacancies for non-shouting and non-pushingpeople-about
officers, so I think I’d better stick to what I know.”
They had now reached the airlock – a large circular steel hatchway of
massive strength and weight let into the inner skin of the craft. The guard
operated a control and the hatchway swung smoothly open.
”But thanks for taking an interest,” said the Vogon guard. ”Bye now.” He
flung Ford and Arthur through the hatchway into the small chamber within.
Arthur lay panting for breath. Ford scrambled round and flung his shoulder
uselessly against the reclosing hatchway.
”But listen,” he shouted to the guard, ”there’s a whole world you don’t
know anything about . . . here how about this?” Desperately he grabbed
for the only bit of culture he knew offhand – he hummed the first bar of
Beethoven’s Fifth.
”Da da da dum! Doesn’t that stir anything in you?”
”No,” said the guard, ”not really. But I’ll mention it to my aunt.”
If he said anything further after that it was lost. The hatchway sealed
itself tight, and all sound was lost but the faint distant hum of the ship’s
47
engines.
They were in a brightly polished cylindrical chamber about six feet in
diameter and ten feet long.
Ford looked round it, panting.
”Potentially bright lad I thought,” he said and slumped against the curved
wall.
Arthur was still lying in the curve of the floor where he had fallen. He
didn’t look up. He just lay panting.
”We’re trapped now aren’t we?”
”Yes,” said Ford, ”we’re trapped.”
”Well didn’t you think of anything? I thought you said you were going to
think of something. Perhaps you thought of something and didn’t notice.”
”Oh yes, I thought of something,” panted Ford.
Arthur looked up expectantly.
”But unfortunately,” continued Ford, ”it rather involved being on the
other side of this airtight hatchway.” He kicked the hatch they’d just been
through.
”But it was a good idea was it?”
”Oh yes, very neat.”
”What was it?”
”Well I hadn’t worked out the details yet. Not much point now is there?”
”So . . . er, what happens next?”
”Oh, er, well the hatchway in front of us will open automatically in a few
moments and we will shoot out into deep space I expect and asphyxicate.
If you take a lungful of air with you you can last for up to thirty seconds
of course . . . ” said Ford. He stuck his hands behind his back, raised his
eyebrows and started to hum an old Betelgeusian battle hymn. To Arthur’s
eyes he suddenly looked very alien.
”So this is it,” said Arthur, ”we’re going to die.”
”Yes,” said Ford, ”except . . . no! Wait a minute!”
He suddenly lunged across the chamber at something behind Arthur’s
line of vision. ”What’s this switch?” he cried.
”What? Where?” cried Arthur twisting round.
”No, I was only fooling,” said Ford, ”we are going to die after all.”
He slumped against the wall again and carried on the tune from where
he left off.
”You know,” said Arthur, ”it’s at times like this, when I’m trapped in a
Vogon airlock with a man from Betelgeuse, and about to die of asphyxication
in deep space that I really wish I’d listened to what my mother told me when
I was young.”
”Why, what did she tell you?”
48
”I don’t know, I didn’t listen.”
”Oh.” Ford carried on humming.
”This is terrific,” Arthur thought to himself, ”Nelson’s Column has gone,
McDonald’s have gone, all that’s left is me and the words Mostly Harmless.
Any second now all that will be left is Mostly Harmless. And yesterday the
planet seemed to be going so well.”
A motor whirred.
A slight hiss built into a deafening roar of rushing air as the outer hatchway
opened on to an empty blackness studded with tiny impossibly bright
points of light. Ford and Arthur popped into outer space like corks from a
toy gun.
49
Chapter 8
The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy is a wholly remarkable book. It has
been compiled and recompiled many times over many years and under many
different editorships. It contains contributions from countless numbers of
travellers and researchers.
The introduction begins like this:
”Space,” it says, ”is big. Really big. You just won’t believe how vastly
hugely mindboggingly big it is. I mean you may think it’s a long way down
the road to the chemist, but that’s just peanuts to space. Listen . . . ” and so
on.
(After a while the style settles down a bit and it begins to tell you things
you really need to know, like the fact that the fabulously beautiful planet Bethselamin
is now so worried about the cumulative erosion by ten billion visiting
tourists a year that any net imbalance between the amount you eat and
the amount you excrete whilst on the planet is surgically removed from your
bodyweight when you leave: so every time you go to the lavatory it is vitally
important to get a receipt.)
To be fair though, when confronted by the sheer enormity of distances
between the stars, better minds than the one responsible for the Guide’s introduction
have faltered. Some invite you to consider for a moment a peanut
in reading and a small walnut in Johannesburg, and other such dizzying concepts.
The simple truth is that interstellar distances will not fit into the human
imagination.
Even light, which travels so fast that it takes most races thousands of
years to realize that it travels at all, takes time to journey between the stars.
It takes eight minutes from the star Sol to the place where the Earth used to
be, and four years more to arrive at Sol’s nearest stellar neighbour, Alpha
Proxima.
For light to reach the other side of the Galaxy, for it to reach Damogran
for instance, takes rather longer: five hundred thousand years.
50
The record for hitch hiking this distance is just under five years, but you
don’t get to see much on the way.
The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy says that if you hold a lungful of
air you can survive in the total vacuum of space for about thirty seconds.
However it goes on to say that what with space being the mind boggling size it
is the chances of getting picked up by another ship within those thirty seconds
are two to the power of two hundred and sixty-seven thousand seven hundred
and nine to one against.
By a totally staggering coincidence that is also the telephone number of
an Islington flat where Arthur once went to a very good party and met a
very nice girl whom he totally failed to get off with – she went off with a
gatecrasher.
Though the planet Earth, the Islington flat and the telephone have all
now been demolished, it is comforting to reflect that they are all in some
small way commemorated by the fact that twenty-nine seconds later Ford and
Arthur were rescued.
51
Chapter 9
A computer chatted to itself in alarm as it noticed an airlock open and close
itself for no apparent reason.
This was because Reason was in fact out to lunch. A hole had just
appeared in the Galaxy. It was exactly a nothingth of a second long, a
nothingth of an inch wide, and quite a lot of million light years from end to
end.
As it closed up lots of paper hats and party balloons fell out of it and
drifted off through the universe. A team of seven threefoot-high market
analysts fell out of it and died, partly of asphyxication, partly of surprise.
Two hundred and thirty-nine thousand lightly fried eggs fell out of it too,
materializing in a large woobly heap on the faminestruck land of Poghril in
the Pansel system.
The whole Poghril tribe had died out from famine except for one last man
who died of cholesterol poisoning some weeks later.
The nothingth of a second for which the hole existed reverberated backwards
and forwards through time in a most improbable fashion. Somewhere
in the deeply remote past it seriously traumatized a small random group of
atoms drifting through the empty sterility of space and made them cling together
in the most extraordinarily unlikely patterns. These patterns quickly
learnt to copy themselves (this was part of what was so extraordinary of the
patterns) and went on to cause massive trouble on every planet they drifted
on to. That was how life began in the Universe.
Five wild Event Maelstroms swirled in vicious storms of unreason and
spewed up a pavement.
On the pavement lay Ford Prefect and Arthur Dent gulping like half-spent
fish.
”There you are,” gasped Ford, scrabbling for a fingerhold on the pavement
as it raced through the Third Reach of the Unknown, ”I told you I’d think
of something.”
”Oh sure,” said Arthur, ”sure.”
52
”Bright idea of mine,” said Ford, ”to find a passing spaceship and get
rescued by it.”
The real universe arched sickeningly away beneath them. Various pretend
ones flitted silently by, like mountain goats. Primal light exploded, splattering
space-time as with gobbets of junket. Time blossomed, matter shrank
away. The highest prime number coalesced quietly in a corner and hid itself
away for ever.
”Oh come off it,” said Arthur, ”the chances against it were astronomical.”
”Don’t knock it, it worked,” said Ford.
”What sort of ship are we in?” asked Arthur as the pit of eternity yawned
beneath them.
”I don’t know,” said Ford, ”I haven’t opened my eyes yet.”
”No, nor have I,” said Arthur.
The Universe jumped, froze, quivered and splayed out in several unexpected
directions.
Arthur and Ford opened their eyes and looked about in considerable surprise.
”Good god,” said Arthur, ”it looks just like the sea front at Southend.”
”Hell, I’m relieved to hear you say that,” said Ford.
”Why?”
”Because I thought I must be going mad.”
”Perhaps you are. Perhaps you only thought I said it.”
Ford thought about this.
”Well, did you say it or didn’t you?” he asked.
”I think so,” said Arthur.
”Well, perhaps we’re both going mad.”
”Yes,” said Arthur, ”we’d be mad, all things considered, to think this was
Southend.”
”Well, do you think this is Southend?”
”Oh yes.”
”So do I.”
”Therefore we must be mad.”
”Nice day for it.”
”Yes,” said a passing maniac. ”Who was that?” asked Arthur ”Who –
the man with the five heads and the elderberry bush full of kippers?”
”Yes,” said a passing maniac.
”Who was that?” asked Arthur.
”Who – the man with the five heads and the elderberry bush full of
kippers?”
”Yes.”
”I don’t know. Just someone.”
53
”Ah.”
They both sat on the pavement and watched with a certain unease as
huge children bounced heavily along the sand and wild horses thundered
through the sky taking fresh supplies of reinforced railings to the Uncertain
Areas.
”You know,” said Arthur with a slight cough, ”if this is Southend, there’s
something very odd about it . . . ”
”You mean the way the sea stays steady and the buildings keep washing
up and down?” said Ford. ”Yes I thought that was odd too. In fact,” he continued
as with a huge bang Southend split itself into six equal segments which
danced and span giddily round each other in lewd and licentious formation,
”there is something altogether very strange going on.”
Wild yowling noises of pipes and strings seared through the wind, hot
doughnuts popped out of the road for ten pence each, horrid fish stormed
out of the sky and Arthur and Ford decided to make a run for it.
They plunged through heavy walls of sound, mountains of archaic thought,
valleys of mood music, bad shoe sessions and footling bats and suddenly heard
a girl’s voice.
It sounded quite a sensible voice, but it just said, ”Two to the power of
one hundred thousand to one against and falling,” and that was all.
Ford skidded down a beam of light and span round trying to find a source
for the voice but could see nothing he could seriously believe in.
”What was that voice?” shouted Arthur.
”I don’t know,” yelled Ford, ”I don’t know. It sounded like a measurement
of probability.”
”Probability? What do you mean?”
”Probability. You know, like two to one, three to one, five to four against.
It said two to the power of one hundred thousand to one against. That’s
pretty improbable you know.”
A million-gallon vat of custard upended itself over them without warning.
”But what does it mean?” cried Arthur.
”What, the custard?”
”No, the measurement of probability!”
”I don’t know. I don’t know at all. I think we’re on some kind of spaceship.”
”I can only assume,” said Arthur, ”that this is not the firstclass compartment.”
Bulges appeared in the fabric of space-time. Great ugly bulges.
”Haaaauuurrgghhh . . . ” said Arthur as he felt his body softening and
bending in unusual directions. ”Southend seems to be melting away . . . the
stars are swirling . . . a dustbowl . . . my legs are drifting off into the sunset
54
. . . my left arm’s come off too.” A frightening thought struck him: ”Hell,” he
said, ”how am I going to operate my digital watch now?” He wound his eyes
desperately around in Ford’s direction.
”Ford,” he said, ”you’re turning into a penguin. Stop it.”
Again came the voice.
”Two to the power of seventy-five thousand to one against and falling.”
Ford waddled around his pond in a furious circle.
”Hey, who are you,” he quacked. ”Where are you? What’s going on and
is there any way of stopping it?”
”Please relax,” said the voice pleasantly, like a stewardess in an airliner
with only one wing and two engines one of which is on fire, ”you are perfectly
safe.”
”But that’s not the point!” raged Ford. ”The point is that I am now
a perfectly save penguin, and my colleague here is rapidly running out of
limbs!”
”It’s alright, I’ve got them back now,” said Arthur.
”Two to the power of fifty thousand to one against and falling,” said the
voice.
”Admittedly,” said Arthur, ”they’re longer than I usually like them, but
. . . ”
”Isn’t there anything,” squawked Ford in avian fury, ”you feel you ought
to be telling us?”
The voice cleared its throat. A giant petit four lolloped off into the
distance.
”Welcome,” the voice said, ”to the Starship Heart of Gold.”
The voice continued.
”Please do not be alarmed,” it said, ”by anything you see or hear around
you. You are bound to feel some initial ill effects as you have been rescued
from certain death at an improbability level of two to the power of two
hundred and seventy-six thousand to one against – possibly much higher.
We are now cruising at a level of two to the power of twenty-five thousand
to one against and falling, and we will be restoring normality just as soon as
we are sure what is normal anyway. Thank you. Two to the power of twenty
thousand to one against and falling.”
The voice cut out.
Ford and Arthur were in a small luminous pink cubicle.
Ford was wildly excited.
”Arthur!” he said, ”this is fantastic! We’ve been picked up by a ship
powered by the Infinite Improbability Drive! This is incredible! I heard
rumors about it before! They were all officially denied, but they must have
55
done it! They’ve built the Improbability Drive! Arthur, this is . . . Arthur?
What’s happening?”
Arthur had jammed himself against the door to the cubicle, trying to hold
it closed, but it was ill fitting. Tiny furry little hands were squeezing themselves
through the cracks, their fingers were inkstained; tiny voices chattered
insanely.
Arthur looked up.
”Ford!” he said, ”there’s an infinite number of monkeys outside who want
to talk to us about this script for Hamlet they’ve worked out.”
56
Chapter 10
The Infinite Improbability Drive is a wonderful new method of crossing vast
interstellar distances in a mere nothingth of a second, without all that tedious
mucking about in hyperspace.
It was discovered by a lucky chance, and then developed into a governable
form of propulsion by the Galactic Government’s research team on Damogran.
This, briefly, is the story of its discovery.
The principle of generating small amounts of finite improbability by simply
hooking the logic circuits of a Bambleweeny 57 SubMeson Brain to an
atomic vector plotter suspended in a strong Brownian Motion producer (say
a nice hot cup of tea) were of course well understood – and such generators
were often used to break the ice at parties by making all the molecules
in the hostess’s undergarments leap simultaneously one foot to the left, in
accordance with the Theory of Indeterminacy.
Many respectable physicists said that they weren’t going to stand for this
– partly because it was a debasement of science, but mostly because they
didn’t get invited to those sort of parties.
Another thing they couldn’t stand was the perpetual failure they encountered
in trying to construct a machine which could generate the infinite
improbability field needed to flip a spaceship across the mind-paralysing distances
between the furthest stars, and in the end they grumpily announced
that such a machine was virtually impossible.
Then, one day, a student who had been left to sweep up the lab after a
particularly unsuccessful party found himself reasoning this way:
If, he thought to himself, such a machine is a virtual impossibility, then
it must logically be a finite improbability. So all I have to do in order to
make one is to work out exactly how improbable it is, feed that figure into
the finite improbability generator, give it a fresh cup of really hot tea . . . and
turn it on!
He did this, and was rather startled to discover that he had managed to
57
create the long sought after golden Infinite Improbability generator out of
thin air.
It startled him even more when just after he was awarded the Galactic
Institute’s Prize for Extreme Cleverness he got lynched by a rampaging mob
of respectable physicists who had finally realized that the one thing they
really couldn’t stand was a smartass.
58
Chapter 11
The Improbability-proof control cabin of the Heart of Gold looked like a
perfectly conventional spaceship except that it was perfectly clean because
it was so new. Some of the control seats hadn’t had the plastic wrapping
taken off yet. The cabin was mostly white, oblong, and about the size of a
smallish restaurant. In fact it wasn’t perfectly oblong: the two long walls
were raked round in a slight parallel curve, and all the angles and corners
were contoured in excitingly chunky shapes. The truth of the matter is that
it would have been a great deal simpler and more practical to build the cabin
as an ordinary three-dimensional oblong rom, but then the designers would
have got miserable. As it was the cabin looked excitingly purposeful, with
large video screens ranged over the control and guidance system panels on
the concave wall, and long banks of computers set into the convex wall. In
one corner a robot sat humped, its gleaming brushed steel head hanging
loosely between its gleaming brushed steel knees. It too was fairly new, but
though it was beautifully constructed and polished it somehow looked as if
the various parts of its more or less humanoid body didn’t quite fit properly.
In fact they fitted perfectly well, but something in its bearing suggested that
they might have fitted better.
Zaphod Beeblebrox paced nervously up and down the cabin, brushing his
hands over pieces of gleaming equipment and giggling with excitement.
Trillian sat hunched over a clump of instruments reading off figures. Her
voice was carried round the Tannoy system of the whole ship.
”Five to one against and falling . . . ” she said, ”four to one against and
falling . . . three to one . . . two . . . one . . . probability factor of one to one . . . we
have normality, I repeat we have normality.” She turned her microphone off
– then turned it back on, with a slight smile and continued: ”Anything you
still can’t cope with is therefore your own problem. Please relax. You will be
sent for soon.”
Zaphod burst out in annoyance: ”Who are they Trillian?”
Trillian span her seat round to face him and shrugged.
59
”Just a couple of guys we seem to have picked up in open space,” she
said. ”Section ZZ9 Plural Z Alpha.”
”Yeah, well that’s a very sweet thought Trillian,” complained Zaphod,
”but do you really think it’s wise under the circumstances? I mean, here we
are on the run and everything, we must have the police of half the Galaxy
after us by now, and we stop to pick up hitchhikers. OK, so ten out of ten
for style, but minus several million for good thinking, yeah?”
He tapped irritably at a control panel. Trillian quietly moved his hand
before he tapped anything important. Whatever Zaphod’s qualities of mind
might include – dash, bravado, conceit – he was mechanically inept and could
easily blow the ship up with an extravagant gesture. Trillian had come to
suspect that the main reason why he had had such a wild and successful life
that he never really understood the significance of anything he did.
”Zaphod,” she said patiently, ”they were floating unprotected in open
space . . . you wouldn’t want them to have died would you?”
”Well, you know . . . no. Not as such, but . . . ”
”Not as such? Not die as such? But?” Trillian cocked her head on one
side.
”Well, maybe someone else might have picked them up later.”
”A second later and they would have been dead.”
”Yeah, so if you’d taken the trouble to think about the problem a bit
longer it would have gone away.”
”You’d been happy to let them die?”
”Well, you know, not happy as such, but . . . ”
”Anyway,” said Trillian, turning back to the controls, ”I didn’t pick them
up.”
”What do you mean? Who picked them up then?”
”The ship did.”
”Huh?”
”The ship did. All by itself.”
”Huh?”
”While we were in Improbability Drive.”
”But that’s incredible.”
”No Zaphod. Just very very improbable.”
”Er, yeah.”
”Look Zaphod,” she said, patting his arm, ”don’t worry about the aliens.
They’re just a couple of guys I expect. I’ll send the robot down to get them
and bring them up here. Hey Marvin!”
In the corner, the robot’s head swung up sharply, but then wobbled about
imperceptibly. It pulled itself up to its feet as if it was about five pounds
heavier that it actually was, and made what an outside observer would have
60
thought was a heroic effort to cross the room. It stopped in front of Trillian
and seemed to stare through her left shoulder.
”I think you ought to know I’m feeling very depressed,” it said. Its voice
was low and hopeless.
”Oh God,” muttered Zaphod and slumped into a seat.
”Well,” said Trillian in a bright compassionate tone, ”here’s something
to occupy you and keep your mind off things.”
”It won’t work,” droned Marvin, ”I have an exceptionally large mind.”
”Marvin!” warned Trillian.
”All right,” said Marvin, ”what do you want me to do?”
”Go down to number two entry bay and bring the two aliens up here
under surveillance.”
With a microsecond pause, and a finely calculated micromodulation of
pitch and timbre – nothing you could actually take offence at – Marvin
managed to convey his utter contempt and horror of all things human.
”Just that?” he said.
”Yes,” said Trillian firmly.
”I won’t enjoy it,” said Marvin.
Zaphod leaped out of his seat.
”She’s not asking you to enjoy it,” he shouted, ”just do it will you?”
”All right,” said Marvin like the tolling of a great cracked bell, ”I’ll do
it.”
”Good . . . ” snapped Zaphod, ”great . . . thank you . . . ”
Marvin turned and lifted his flat-topped triangular red eyes up towards
him.
”I’m not getting you down at all am I?” he said pathetically.
”No no Marvin,” lilted Trillian, ”that’s just fine, really . . . ”
”I wouldn’t like to think that I was getting you down.”
”No, don’t worry about that,” the lilt continued, ”you just act as comes
naturally and everything will be just fine.”
”You’re sure you don’t mind?” probed Marvin.
”No no Marvin,” lilted Trillian, ”that’s just fine, really . . . just part of
life.”
”Marvin flashed him an electronic look.
”Life,” said Marvin, ”don’t talk to me about life.”
He turned hopelessly on his heel and lugged himself out of the cabin.
With a satisfied hum and a click the door closed behind him
”I don’t think I can stand that robot much longer Zaphod,” growled
Trillian.
The Encyclopaedia Galactica defines a robot as a mechanical apparatus
designed to do the work of a man. The marketing division of the Sirius
61
Cybernetics Corporation defines a robot as ”Your Plastic Pal Who’s Fun To
Be With.”
The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy defines the marketing division of
the Sirius Cybernetics Corporation as ”a bunch of mindless jerks who’ll be
the first against the wall when the revolution comes,” with a footnote to the
effect that the editors would welcome applications from anyone interested in
taking over the post of robotics correspondent.
Curiously enough, an edition of the Encyclopaedia Galactica that had
the good fortune to fall through a time warp from a thousand years in the
future defined the marketing division of the Sirius Cybernetics Corporation
as ”a bunch of mindless jerks who were the first against the wall when the
revolution came.”
The pink cubicle had winked out of existence, the monkeys had sunk away
to a better dimension. Ford and Arthur found themselves in the embarkation
area of the ship. It was rather smart.
”I think the ship’s brand new,” said Ford.
”How can you tell?” asked Arthur. ”Have you got some exotic device for
measuring the age of metal?”
”No, I just found this sales brochure lying on the floor. It’s a lot of ‘the
Universe can be yours’ stuff. Ah! Look, I was right.”
Ford jabbed at one of the pages and showed it to Arthur.
”It says: ’Sensational new breakthrough in Improbability Physics. As soon
as the ship’s drive reaches Infinite Improbability it passes through every point
in the Universe. Be the envy of other major governments.’ Wow, this is big
league stuff.”
Ford hunted excitedly through the technical specs of the ship, occasionally
gasping with astonishment at what he read – clearly Galactic astrotechnology
had moved ahead during the years of his exile.
Arthur listened for a short while, but being unable to understand the vast
majority of what Ford was saying he began to let his mind wander, trailing
his fingers along the edge of an incomprehensible computer bank, he reached
out and pressed an invitingly large red button on a nearby panel. The panel
lit up with the words Please do not press this button again. He shook himself.
”Listen,” said Ford, who was still engrossed in the sales brochure, ”they
make a big thing of the ship’s cybernetics. ’A new generation of Sirius
Cybernetics Corporation robots and computers, with the new GPP feature.’ ”
”GPP feature?” said Arthur. ”What’s that?”
”Oh, it says Genuine People Personalities.”
”Oh,” said Arthur, ”sounds ghastly.”
A voice behind them said, ”It is.” The voice was low and hopeless and
accompanied by a slight clanking sound. They span round and saw an abject
62
steel man standing hunched in the doorway.
”What?” they said.
”Ghastly,” continued Marvin, ”it all is. Absolutely ghastly. Just don’t
even talk about it. Look at this door,” he said, stepping through it. The
irony circuits cut into his voice modulator as he mimicked the style of the
sales brochure. ”All the doors in this spaceship have a cheerful and sunny
disposition. It is their pleasure to open for you, and their satisfaction to close
again with the knowledge of a job well done.”
As the door closed behind them it became apparent that it did indeed
have a satisfied sigh-like quality to it. ”Hummmmmmmyummmmmmm ah!”
it said.
Marvin regarded it with cold loathing whilst his logic circuits chattered
with disgust and tinkered with the concept of directing physical violence
against it Further circuits cut in saying, Why bother? What’s the point?
Nothing is worth getting involved in. Further circuits amused themselves by
analysing the molecular components of the door, and of the humanoids’ brain
cells. For a quick encore they measured the level of hydrogen emissions in
the surrounding cubic parsec of space and then shut down again in boredom.
A spasm of despair shook the robot’s body as he turned.
”Come on,” he droned, ”I’ve been ordered to take you down to the bridge.
Here I am, brain the size of a planet and they ask me to take you down to
the bridge. Call that job satisfaction? ’Cos I don’t.”
He turned and walked back to the hated door.
”Er, excuse me,” said Ford following after him, ”which government owns
this ship?”
Marvin ignored him.
”You watch this door,” he muttered, ”it’s about to open again. I can tell
by the intolerable air of smugness it suddenly generates.”
With an ingratiating little whine the door slit open again and Marvin
stomped through.
”Come on,” he said.
The others followed quickly and the door slit back into place with pleased
little clicks and whirrs.
”Thank you the marketing division of the Sirius Cybernetics Corporation,”
said Marvin and trudged desolately up the gleaming curved corridor
that stretched out before them. ”Let’s build robots with Genuine People
Personalities, they said. So they tried it out with me. I’m a personality
prototype. You can tell can’t you?”
Ford and Arthur muttered embarrassed little disclaimers.
”I hate that door,” continued Marvin. ”I’m not getting you down at all
am I?”
63
”Which government . . . ” started Ford again.
”No government owns it,” snapped the robot, ”it’s been stolen.”
”Stolen?”
”Stolen?” mimicked Marvin.
”Who by?” asked Ford.
”Zaphod Beeblebrox.”
Something extraordinary happened to Ford’s face. At least five entirely
separate and distinct expressions of shock and amazement piled up on it in a
jumbled mess. His left leg, which was in mid stride, seemed to have difficulty
in finding the floor again. He stared at the robot and tried to entangle some
dartoid muscles.
”Zaphod Beeblebrox . . . ?” he said weakly.
”Sorry, did I say something wrong?” said Marvin, dragging himself on
regardless. ”Pardon me for breathing, which I never do anyway so I don’t
know why I bother to say it, oh God I’m so depressed. Here’s another of
those self-satisfied door. Life! Don’t talk to me about life.”
”No one ever mentioned it,” muttered Arthur irritably. ”Ford, are you
alright?”
Ford stared at him. ”Did that robot say Zaphod Beeblebrox?” he said.
64
Chapter 12
A loud clatter of gunk music flooded through the Heart of Gold cabin as
Zaphod searched the sub-etha radio wavebands for news of himself. The machine
was rather difficult to operate. For years radios had been operated by
means of pressing buttons and turning dials; then as the technology became
more sophisticated the controls were made touch-sensitive – you merely had
to brush the panels with your fingers; now all you had to do was wave your
hand in the general direction of the components and hope. It saved a lot of
muscular expenditure of course, but meant that you had to sit infuriatingly
still if you wanted to keep listening to the same programme.
Zaphod waved a hand and the channel switched again. More gunk music,
but this time it was a background to a news announcement. The news was
always heavily edited to fit the rhythms of the music.
”. . . and news brought to you here on the sub-etha wave band, broadcasting
around the galaxy around the clock,” squawked a voice, ”and we’ll be saying
a big hello to all intelligent life forms everywhere . . . and to everyone else out
there, the secret is to bang the rocks together, guys. And of course, the big
news story tonight is the sensational theft of the new Improbability Drive prototype
ship by none other than Galactic President Zaphod Beeblebrox. And
the question everyone’s asking is . . . has the big Z finally flipped? Beeblebrox,
the man who invented the Pan Galactic Gargle Blaster, ex-confidence
trickster, once described by Eccentrica Gallumbits as the Best Bang since the
Big One, and recently voted the Wort Dressed Sentinent Being in the Known
Universe for the seventh time . . . has he got an answer this time? We asked
his private brain care specialist Gag Halfrunt . . . ”
The music swirled and dived for a moment. Another voice broke in,
presumably Halfrunt. He said: ”Vell, Zaphod’s jist zis guy you know?” but
got no further because an electric pencil flew across the cabin and through
the radio’s on/off sensitive airspace. Zaphod turned and glared at Trillian –
she had thrown the pencil.
”Hey,” he said, what do you do that for?”
65
Trillian was tapping her fingers on a screenful of figures.
”I’ve just thought of something,” she said.
”Yeah? Worth interrupting a news bulletin about me for?”
”You hear enough about yourself as it is.”
”I’m very insecure. We know that.”
”Can we drop your ego for a moment? This is important.”
”If there’s anything more important than my ego around, I want it caught
and shot now.” Zaphod glared at her again, then laughed.
”Listen,” she said, ”we picked up those couple of guys . . . ”
”What couple of guys?”
”The couple of guys we picked up.”
”Oh, yeah,” said Zaphod, ”those couple of guys.”
”We picked them up in sector ZZ9 Plural Z Alpha.”
”Yeah?” said Zaphod and blinked. Trillian said quietly, ”Does that mean
anything to you?”
”Mmmmm,” said Zaphod, ”ZZ9 Plural Z Alpha. ZZ9 Plural Z Alpha?”
”Well?” said Trillian.
”Er . . . what does the Z mean?” said Zaphod.
”Which one?”
”Any one.”
One of the major difficulties Trillian experienced in her relationship with
Zaphod was learning to distinguish between him pretending to be stupid just
to get people off their guard, pretending to be stupid because he couldn’t be
bothered to think and wanted someone else to do it for him, pretending to
be outrageously stupid to hide the fact that he actually didn’t understand
what was going on, and really being genuinely stupid. He was renowned
for being amazingly clever and quite clearly was so – but not all the time,
which obviously worried him, hence the act. He proffered people to be puzzled
rather than contemptuous. This above all appeared to Trillian to be
genuinely stupid, but she could no longer be bothered to argue about it.
She sighed and punched up a star map on the visiscreen so she could
make it simple for him, whatever his reasons for wanting it to be that way.
”There,” she pointed, ”right there.”
”Hey . . . Yeah!” said Zaphod.
”Well?” she said.
”Well what?”
Parts of the inside of her head screamed at other parts of the inside of
her head. She said, very calmly, ”It’s the same sector you originally picked
me up in.”
He looked at her and then looked back at the screen.
66
”Hey, yeah,” he said, ”now that is wild. We should have zapped straight
into the middle of the Horsehead Nebula. How did we come to be there? I
mean that’s nowhere.”
She ignored this.
”Improbability Drive,” she said patiently. ”You explained it to me yourself.
We pass through every point in the Universe, you know that.”
”Yeah, but that’s one wild coincidence isn’t it?”
”Yes.”
”Picking someone up at that point? Out of the whole of the Universe to
choose from? That’s just too . . . I want to work this out. Computer!”
The Sirius Cybernetics Corporation Shipboard Computer which controlled
and permeated every particle of the ship switched into communication mode.
”Hi there!” it said brightly and simultaneously spewed out a tiny ribbon
of ticker tape just for the record. The ticker tape said, Hi there!
”Oh God,” said Zaphod. He hadn’t worked with this computer for long
but had already learned to loathe it.
The computer continued, brash and cheery as if it was selling detergent.
”I want you to know that whatever your problem, I am here to help you
solve it.”
”Yeah yeah,” said Zaphod. ”Look, I think I’ll just use a piece of paper.”
”Sure thing,” said the computer, spilling out its message into a waste bin
at the same time, ”I understand. If you ever want . . . ”
”Shut up!” said Zaphod, and snatching up a pencil sat down next to
Trillian at the console.
”Okay, okay,” said the computer in a hurt tone of voice and closed down
its speech channel again.
Zaphod and Trillian pored over the figures that the Improbability flight
path scanner flashed silently up in front of them.
”Can we work out,” said Zaphod, ”from their point of view what the
Improbability of their rescue was?”
”Yes, that’s a constant”, said Trillian, ”two to the power of two hundred
and seventy-six thousand seven hundred and nine to one against.”
”That’s high. They’re two lucky lucky guys.”
”Yes.”
”But relative to what we were doing when the ship picked them up . . . ”
Trillian punched up the figures. They showed tow-to-the powerof-Infinityminus-one
(an irrational number that only has a conventional meaning in
Improbability physics).
”It’s pretty low,” continued Zaphod with a slight whistle.
”Yes,” agreed Trillian, and looked at him quizzically.
67
”That’s one big whack of Improbability to be accounted for. Something
pretty improbable has got to show up on the balance sheet if it’s all going to
add up into a pretty sum.”
Zaphod scribbled a few sums, crossed them out and threw the pencil
away.
”Bat’s dos, I can’t work it out.”
”Well?”
Zaphod knocked his two heads together in irritation and gritted his teeth.
”OK,” he said. ”Computer!” The voice circuits sprang to life again. ”Why
hello there!” they said (ticker tape, ticker tape). ”All I want to do is make
your day nicer and nicer and nicer . . . ”
”Yeah well shut up and work something out for me.”
”Sure thing,” chattered the computer, ”you want a probability forecast
based on . . . ”
”Improbability data, yeah.”
”Okay,” the computer continued. ”Here’s an interesting little notion. Did
you realize that most people’s lives are governed by telephone numbers?”
A pained look crawled across one of Zaphod’s faces and on to the other
one.
”Have you flipped?” he said.
”No, but you will when I tell you that . . . ”
Trillian gasped. She scrabbled at the buttons on the Improbability flight
path screen.
”Telephone number?” she said. ”Did that thing say telephone number?”
Numbers flashed up on the screen.
The computer had paused politely, but now it continued.
”What I was about to say was that . . . ”
”Don’t bother please,” said Trillian.
”Look, what is this?” said Zaphod.
”I don’t know,” said Trillian, ”but those aliens – they’re on the way up to
the bridge with that wretched robot. Can we pick them up on any monitor
cameras?”
68
Chapter 13
Marvin trudged on down the corridor, still moaning.
”And then of course I’ve got this terrible pain in all the diodes down my
left hand side . . . ”
”No?” said Arthur grimly as he walked along beside him. ”Really?”
”Oh yes,” said Marvin, ”I mean I’ve asked for them to be replaced but
no one ever listens.”
”I can imagine.” Vague whistling and humming noises were coming from
Ford. ”Well well well,” he kept saying to himself, ”Zaphod Beeblebrox . . . ”
Suddenly Marvin stopped, and held up a hand.
”You know what’s happened now of course?”
”No, what?” said Arthur, who didn’t what to know.
”We’ve arrived at another of those doors.”
There was a sliding door let into the side of the corridor. Marvin eyed it
suspiciously.
”Well?” said Ford impatiently. ”Do we go through?”
”Do we go through?” mimicked Marvin. ”Yes. This is the entrance to the
bridge. I was told to take you to the bridge. Probably the highest demand
that will be made on my intellectual capacities today I shouldn’t wonder.”
Slowly, with great loathing, he stepped towards the door, like a hunter
stalking his prey. Suddenly it slid open.
”Thank you,” it said, ”for making a simple door very happy.”
Deep in Marvin’s thorax gears ground.
”Funny,” he intoned funerally, ”how just when you think life can’t possibly
get any worse it suddenly does.”
He heaved himself through the door and left Ford and Arthur staring at
each other and shrugging their shoulders. From inside they heard Marvin’s
voice again.
”I suppose you want to see the aliens now,” he said. ”Do you want me
to sit in a corner and rust, or just fall apart where I’m standing?”
”Yeah, just show them in would you Marvin?” came another voice.
69
Arthur looked at Ford and was astonished to see him laughing.
”What’s . . . ?”
”Shhh,” said Ford, ”come in.”
He stepped through into the bridge.
Arthur followed him in nervously and was astonished to see a man lolling
back in a chair with his feet on a control console picking the teeth in his righthand
head with his left hand. The right-hand head seemed to be thoroughly
preoccupied with this task, but the left-hand one was grinning a broad, relaxed,
nonchalant grin. The number of things that Arthur couldn’t believe
he was seeing was fairly large. His jaw flapped about at a loose end for a
while.
The peculiar man waved a lazy wave at Ford and with an appalling affectation
of nonchalance said, ”Ford, hi, how are you? Glad you could drop
in.”
Ford was not going to be outcooled.
”Zaphod,” he drawled, ”great to see you, you’re looking well, the extra
arm suits you. Nice ship you’ve stolen.”
Arthur goggled at him.
”You mean you know this guy?” he said, waving a wild finger at Zaphod.
”Know him!” exclaimed Ford, ”he’s . . . ” he paused, and decided to do
the introductions the other way round.
”Oh, Zaphod, this is a friend of mine, Arthur Dent,” he said, ”I saved
him when his planet blew up.”
”Oh sure,” said Zaphod, ”hi Arthur, glad you could make it.” His righthand
head looked round casually, said ”hi” and went back to having his teeth
picked.
Ford carried on. ”And Arthur,” he said, ”this is my semi-cousin Zaphod
Beeb . . . ”
”We’ve met,” said Arthur sharply.
When you’re cruising down the road in the fast lane and you lazily sail
past a few hard driving cars and are feeling pretty pleased with yourself
and then accidentally change down from fourth to first instead of third thus
making your engine leap out of your bonnet in a rather ugly mess, it tends
to throw you off your stride in much the same way that this remark threw
Ford Prefect off his.
”Er . . . what?”
”I said we’ve met.”
Zaphod gave an awkward start of surprise and jabbed a gum sharply.
”Hey . . . er, have we? Hey . . . er . . . ”
Ford rounded on Arthur with an angry flash in his eyes. Now he felt
he was back on home ground he suddenly began to resent having lumbered
70
himself with this ignorant primitive who knew as much about the affairs of
the Galaxy as an Ilford-based gnat knew about life in Peking.
”What do you mean you’ve met?” he demanded. ”This is Zaphod Beeblebrox
from Betelgeuse Five you know, not bloody Martin Smith from Croydon.”
”I don’t care,” said Arthur coldly. We’ve met, haven’t we Zaphod Beeblebrox
– or should I say . . . Phil?”
”What!” shouted Ford.
”You’ll have to remind me,” said Zaphod. ”I’ve a terrible memory for
species.”
”It was at a party,” pursued Arthur.
”Yeah, well I doubt that,” said Zaphod.
”Cool it will you Arthur!” demanded Ford.
Arthur would not be deterred. ”A party six months ago. On Earth
. . . England . . . ”
Zaphod shook his head with a tight-lipped smile.
”London,” insisted Arthur, ”Islington.”
”Oh,” said Zaphod with a guilty start, ”that party.”
This wasn’t fair on Ford at all. He looked backwards and forwards between
Arthur and Zaphod. ”What?” he said to Zaphod. ”You don’t mean
to say you’ve been on that miserable planet as well do you?”
”No, of course not,” said Zaphod breezily. ”Well, I may have just dropped
in briefly, you know, on my way somewhere . . . ”
”But I was stuck there for fifteen years!”
”Well I didn’t know that, did I?”
”But what were you doing there?”
”Looking about, you know.”
”He gatecrashed a party,” persisted Arthur, trembling with anger, ”a
fancy dress party . . . ”
”It would have to be, wouldn’t it?” said Ford.
”At this party,” persisted Arthur, ”was a girl . . . oh well, look it doesn’t
matter now. The whole place has gone up in smoke anyway . . . ”
”I wish you’d stop sulking about that bloody planet,” said Ford. ”Who
was the lady?”
”Oh just somebody. Well all right, I wasn’t doing very well with her.
I’d been trying all evening. Hell, she was something though. Beautiful,
charming, devastatingly intelligent, at last I’d got her to myself for a bit and
was plying her with a bit of talk when this friend of yours barges up and says
Hey doll, is this guy boring you? Why don’t you talk to me instead? I’m
from a different planet.” I never saw her again.”
”Zaphod?” exclaimed Ford.
71
”Yes,” said Arthur, glaring at him and trying not to feel foolish. ”He
only had the two arms and the one head and he called himself Phil, but . . . ”
”But you must admit he did turn out to be from another planet,” said
Trillian wandering into sight at the other end of the bridge. She gave Arthur
a pleasant smile which settled on him like a ton of bricks and then turned
her attention to the ship’s controls again.
There was silence for a few seconds, and then out of the scrambled mess
of Arthur’s brain crawled some words.
”Tricia McMillian?” he said. ”What are you doing here?”
”Same as you,” she said, ”I hitched a lift. After all with a degree in Maths
and another in astrophysics what else was there to do? It was either that or
the dole queue again on Monday.”
”Infinity minus one,” chattered the computer, ”Improbability sum now
complete.”
Zaphod looked about him, at Ford, at Arthur, and then at Trillian.
”Trillian,” he said, ”is this sort of thing going to happen every time we
use the Improbability drive?”
”Very probably, I’m afraid,” she said.
72
Chapter 14
The Heart of Gold fled on silently through the night of space, now on conventional
photon drive. Its crew of four were ill at ease knowing that they
had been brought together not of their own volition or by simple coincidence,
but by some curious principle of physics – as if relationships between people
were susceptible to the same laws that governed the relationships between
atoms and molecules.
As the ship’s artificial night closed in they were each grateful to retire to
separate cabins and try to rationalize their thoughts.
Trillian couldn’t sleep. She sat on a couch and stared at a small cage which
contained her last and only links with Earth – two white mice that she had
insisted Zaphod let her bring. She had expected not to see the planet again,
but she was disturbed by her negative reaction to the planet’s destruction. It
seemed remote and unreal and she could find no thoughts to think about it.
She watched the mice scurrying round the cage and running furiously in their
little plastic treadwheels till they occupied her whole attention. Suddenly
she shook herself and went back to the bridge to watch over the tiny flashing
lights and figures that charted the ship’s progress through the void. She
wished she knew what it was she was trying not to think about.
Zaphod couldn’t sleep. He also wished he knew what it was that he
wouldn’t let himself think about. For as long as he could remember he’d
suffered from a vague nagging feeling of being not all there. Most of the time
he was able to put this thought aside and not worry about it, but it had been
re-awakened by the sudden inexplicable arrival of Ford Prefect and Arthur
Dent. Somehow it seemed to conform to a pattern that he couldn’t see.
Ford couldn’t sleep. He was too excited about being back on the road
again. Fifteen years of virtual imprisonment were over, just as he was finally
beginning to give up hope. Knocking about with Zaphod for a bit promised
to be a lot of fun, though there seemed to be something faintly odd about his
semi-cousin that he couldn’t put his finger on. The fact that he had become
President of the Galaxy was frankly astonishing, as was the manner of his
73
leaving the post. Was there a reason behind it? There would be no point in
asking Zaphod, he never appeared to have a reason for anything he did at
all: he had turned unfathomably into an art form. He attacked everything
in life with a mixture of extraordinary genius and naive incompetence and it
was often difficult to tell which was which.
Arthur slept: he was terribly tired.
There was a tap at Zaphod’s door. It slid open.
”Zaphod . . . ?”
”Yeah?”
Trillian stood outlined in an oval of light.
”I think we just found what you came to look for.”
”Hey, yeah?”
Ford gave up the attempt to sleep. In the corner of his cabin was a
small computer screen and keyboard. He sat at it for a while and tried to
compose a new entry for the Guide on the subject of Vogons but couldn’t
think of anything vitriolic enough so he gave that up too, wrapped a robe
round himself and went for a walk to the bridge.
As he entered he was surprised to see two figures hunched excitedly over
the instruments.
”See? The ship’s about to move into orbit,” Trillian was saying. ”There’s
a planet out there. It’s at the exact coordinates you predicted.”
Zaphod heard a noise and looked up.
”Ford!” he hissed. ”Hey, come and take a look at this.”
Ford went and had a look at it. It was a series of figures flashing over a
screen.
”You recognize those Galactic coordinates?” said Zaphod.
”No.”
”I’ll give you a clue. Computer!”
”Hi gang!” enthused the computer. ”This is getting real sociable isn’t
it?”
”Shut up,” said Zaphod, ”and show up the screens.”
Light on the bridge sank. Pinpoints of light played across the consoles
and reflected in four pairs of eyes that stared up at the external monitor
screens.
There was absolutely nothing on them.
”Recognize that?” whispered Zaphod.
Ford frowned. ”Er, no,” he said.
”What do you see?”
”Nothing.”
”Recognize it?”
”What are you talking about?”
74
”We’re in the Horsehead Nebula. One whole vast dark cloud.”
”And I was meant to recognize that from a blank screen?”
”Inside a dark nebula is the only place in the Galaxy you’d see a dark
screen.”
”Very good.”
Zaphod laughed. He was clearly very excited about something, almost
childishly so.
”Hey, this is really terrific, this is just far too much!”
”What’s so great about being stuck in a dust cloud?” said Ford.
”What would you reckon to find here?” urged Zaphod.
”Nothing.”
”No stars? No planets?”
”No.”
”Computer!” shouted Zaphod, ”rotate angle of vision through oneeighty
degrees and don’t talk about it!”
For a moment it seemed that nothing was happening, then a brightness
glowed at the edge of the huge screen. A red star the size of a small plate
crept across it followed quickly by another one – a binary system. Then a
vast crescent sliced into the corner of the picture – a red glare shading away
into the deep black, the night side of the planet.
”I’ve found it!” cried Zaphod, thumping the console. ”I’ve found it!”
Ford stared at it in astonishment.
”What is it?” he said.
”That . . . ” said Zaphod, ”is the most improbable planet that ever existed.”
75
Chapter 15
(Excerpt from The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy, Page 634784, Section
5a, Entry: Magrathea)
Far back in the mists of ancient time, in the great and glorious days of
the former Galactic Empire, life was wild, rich and largely tax free. Mighty
starships plied their way between exotic suns, seeking adventure and reward
amongst the furthest reaches of Galactic space. In those days spirits were
brave, the stakes were high, men were real men, women were real women,
and small furry creatures from Alpha Centauri were real small furry creatures
from Alpha Centauri. And all dared to brave unknown terrors, to do mighty
deeds, to boldly split infinitives that no man had split before – and thus was
the Empire forged.
Many men of course became extremely rich, but this was perfectly natural
and nothing to be ashamed of because no one was really poor – at least no
one worth speaking of. And for all the richest and most successful merchants
life inevitably became rather dull and niggly, and they began to imagine that
this was therefore the fault of the worlds they’d settled on – none of them was
entirely satisfactory: either the climate wasn’t quite right in the later part of
the afternoon, or the day was half an hour too long, or the sea was exactly
the wrong shade of pink.
And thus were created the conditions for a staggering new form of specialist
industry: custom-made luxury planet building. The home of this industry
was the planet Magrathea, where hyperspatial engineers sucked matter through
white holes in space to form it into dream planets – gold planets, platinum
planets, soft rubber planets with lots of earthquakes – all lovingly made to
meet the exacting standards that the Galaxy’s richest men naturally came to
expect.
But so successful was this venture that Magrathea itself soon became the
richest planet of all time and the rest of the Galaxy was reduced to abject
poverty. And so the system broke down, the Empire collapsed, and a long
76
sullen silence settled over a billion worlds, disturbed only by the pen scratchings
of scholars as they laboured into the night over smug little treaties on
the value of a planned political economy.
Magrathea itself disappeared and its memory soon passed into the obscurity
of legend.
In these enlightened days of course, no one believes a word of it.
77
Chapter 16
Arthur awoke to the sound of argument and went to the bridge. Ford was
waving his arms about.
”You’re crazy, Zaphod,” he was saying, ”Magrathea is a myth, a fairy
story, it’s what parents tell their kids about at night if they want them to
grow up to become economists, it’s . . . ”
”And that’s what we are currently in orbit around,” insisted Zaphod.
”Look, I can’t help what you may personally be in orbit around,” said
Ford, ”but this ship . . . ”
”Computer!” shouted Zaphod.
”Oh no . . . ”
”Hi there! This is Eddie your shipboard computer, and I’m feeling just
great guys, and I know I’m just going to get a bundle of kicks out of any
programme you care to run through me.”
Arthur looked inquiringly at Trillian. She motioned him to come on in
but keep quiet.
”Computer,” said Zaphod, ”tell us again what our present trajectory is.”
”A real pleasure feller,” it burbled; ”we are currently in orbit at an altitude
of three hundred miles around the legendary planet of Magrathea.”
”Proving nothing,” said Ford. ”I wouldn’t trust that computer to speak
my weight.”
”I can do that for you, sure,” enthused the computer, punching out more
tickertape. ”I can even work out you personality problems to ten decimal
places if it will help.”
Trillian interrupted.
”Zaphod,” she said, ”any minute now we will be swinging round to the
daylight side of this planet,” adding, ”whatever it turns out to be.”
”Hey, what do you mean by that? The planet’s where I predicted it would
be isn’t it?”
”Yes, I know there’s a planet there. I’m not arguing with anyone, it’s just
that I wouldn’t know Magrathea from any other lump of cold rock. Dawn’s
78
coming up if you want it.”
”Okay, okay,” muttered Zaphod, ”let’s at least give our eyes a good time.
Computer!”
”Hi there! What can I . . . ”
”Just shut up and give us a view of the planet again.”
A dark featureless mass once more filled the screens – the planet rolling
away beneath them.
They watched for a moment in silence, but Zaphod was fidgety with
excitement.
”We are now traversing the night side . . . ” he said in a hushed voice. The
planet rolled on.
”The surface of the planet is now three hundred miles beneath us . . . ” he
continued. He was trying to restore a sense of occasion to what he felt should
have been a great moment. Magrathea! He was piqued by Ford’s sceptical
reaction. Magrathea!
”In a few seconds,” he continued, ”we should see . . . there!”
The moment carried itself. Even the most seasoned star tramp can’t help
but shiver at the spectacular drama of a sunrise seen from space, but a binary
sunrise is one of the marvels of the Galaxy.
Out of the utter blackness stabbed a sudden point of blinding light. It
crept up by slight degrees and spread sideways in a thin crescent blade, and
within seconds two suns were visible, furnaces of light, searing the black edge
of the horizon with white fire. Fierce shafts of colour streaked through the
thin atmosphere beneath them.
”The fires of dawn . . . !” breathed Zaphod. ”The twin suns of Soulianis
and Rahm . . . !”
”Or whatever,” said Ford quietly.
”Soulianis and Rahm!” insisted Zaphod.
The suns blazed into the pitch of space and a low ghostly music floated
through the bridge: Marvin was humming ironically because he hated humans
so much.
As Ford gazed at the spectacle of light before them excitement burnt
inside him, but only the excitement of seeing a strange new planet, it was
enough for him to see it as it was. It faintly irritated him that Zaphod had
to impose some ludicrous fantasy on to the scene to make it work for him.
All this Magrathea nonsense seemed juvenile. Isn’t it enough to see that a
garden is beautiful without having to believe that there are fairies at the
bottom of it too?
All this Magrathea business seemed totally incomprehensible to Arthur.
He edged up to Trillian and asked her what was going on.
79
”I only know what Zaphod’s told me,” she whispered. ”Apparently Magrathea
is some kind of legend from way back which no one seriously believes
in. Bit like Atlantis on Earth, except that the legends say the Magratheans
used to manufacture planets.”
Arthur blinked at the screens and felt he was missing something important.
Suddenly he realized what it was.
”Is there any tea on this spaceship?” he asked.
More of the planet was unfolding beneath them as the Heart of Gold
streaked along its orbital path. The suns now stood high in the black sky,
the pyrotechnics of dawn were over, and the surface of the planet appeared
bleak and forbidding in the common light of day – grey, dusty and only
dimly contoured. It looked dead and cold as a crypt. From time to time
promising features would appear on the distant horizon – ravines, maybe
mountains, maybe even cities – but as they approached the lines would soften
and blur into anonymity and nothing would transpire. The planet’s surface
was blurred by time, by the slow movement of the thin stagnant air that had
crept across it for century upon century.
Clearly, it was very very old.
A moment of doubt came to Ford as he watched the grey landscape move
beneath them. The immensity of time worried him, he could feel it as a
presence. He cleared his throat.
”Well, even supposing it is . . . ”
”It is,” said Zaphod.
”Which it isn’t,” continued Ford. ”What do you want with it anyway?
There’s nothing there.”
”Not on the surface,” said Zaphod.
”All right, just supposing there’s something. I take it you’re not here for
the sheer industrial archaeology of it all. What are you after?”
One of Zaphod’s heads looked away. The other one looked round to see
what the first was looking at, but it wasn’t looking at anything very much.
”Well,” said Zaphod airily, ”it’s partly the curiosity, partly a sense of
adventure, but mostly I think it’s the fame and the money . . . ”
Ford glanced at him sharply. He got a very strong impression that Zaphod
hadn’t the faintest idea why he was there at all.
”You know I don’t like the look of that planet at all,” said Trillian shivering.
”Ah, take no notice,” said Zaphod, ”with half the wealth of the former
Galactic Empire stored on it somewhere it can afford to look frumpy.”
Bullshit, thought Ford. Even supposing this was the home of some ancient
civilization now gone to dust, even supposing a number of exceedingly
80
unlikely things, there was no way that vast treasures of wealth were going to
be stored there in any form that would still have meaning now. He shrugged.
”I think it’s just a dead planet,” he said.
”The suspense is killing me,” said Arthur testily.
Stress and nervous tension are now serious social problems in all parts of
the Galaxy, and it is in order that this situation should not in any way be
exacerbated that the following facts will now be revealed in advance.
The planet in question is in fact the legendary Magrathea.
The deadly missile attack shortly to be launched by an ancient automatic
defence system will result merely in the breakage of three coffee cups and a
micecage, the bruising of somebody’s upper arm, and the untimely creation
and sudden demise of a bowl of petunias and an innocent sperm whale.
In order that some sense of mystery should still be preserved, no revelation
will yet be made concerning whose upper arm sustained the bruise. This
fact may safely be made the subject of suspense since it is of no significance
whatsoever.
81
Chapter 17
After a fairly shaky start to the day, Arthur’s mind was beginning to reassemble
itself from the shellshocked fragments the previous day had left
him with. He had found a Nutri-Matic machine which had provided him
with a plastic cup filled with a liquid that was almost, but not quite, entirely
unlike tea. The way it functioned was very interesting. When the Drink
button was pressed it made an instant but highly detailed examination of
the subject’s taste buds, a spectroscopic analysis of the subject’s metabolism
and then sent tiny experimental signals down the neural pathways to the
taste centres of the subject’s brain to see what was likely to go down well.
However, no one knew quite why it did this because it invariably delivered
a cupful of liquid that was almost, but not quite, entirely unlike tea. The
Nutri-Matic was designed and manufactured by the Sirius Cybernetics Corporation
whose complaints department now covers all the major land masses
of the first three planets in the Sirius Tau Star system.
Arthur drank the liquid and found it reviving. He glanced up at the
screens again and watched a few more hundred miles of barren greyness slide
past. It suddenly occurred to him to ask a question which had been bothering
him.
”Is it safe?” he said.
”Magrathea’s been dead for five million years,” said Zaphod, ”of course
it’s safe. Even the ghosts will have settled down and raised families by now.”
At which point a strange and inexplicable sound thrilled suddenly through
the bridge – a noise as of a distant fanfare; a hollow, reedy, insubstantial
sound. It preceded a voice that was equally hollow, reedy and insubstantial.
The voice said ”Greetings to you . . . ”
Someone from the dead planet was talking to them.
”Computer!” shouted Zaphod.
”Hi there!”
”What the photon is it?”
”Oh, just some five-million-year-old tape that’s being broadcast at us.”
82
”A what? A recording?”
”Shush!” said Ford. ”It’s carrying on.”
The voice was old, courteous, almost charming, but was underscored with
quite unmistakable menace.
”This is a recorded announcement,” it said, ”as I’m afraid we’re all out
at the moment. The commercial council of Magrathea thanks you for your
esteemed visit . . . ”
(”A voice from ancient Magrathea!” shouted Zaphod. ”Okay, okay,” said
Ford.)
”. . . but regrets,” continued the voice, ”that the entire planet is temporarily
closed for business. Thank you. If you would care to leave your name and
the address of a planet where you can be contacted, kindly speak when you
hear the tone.”
A short buzz followed, then silence.
”They want to get rid of us,” said Trillian nervously. ”What do we do?”
”It’s just a recording,” said Zaphod. ”We keep going. Got that, computer?”
”I got it,” said the computer and gave the ship an extra kick of speed.
They waited.
After a second or so came the fanfare once again, and then the voice.
”We would like to assure you that as soon as our business is resumed
announcements will be made in all fashionable magazines and colour supplements,
when our clients will once again be able to select from all that’s best in
contemporary geography.” The menace in the voice took on a sharper edge.
”Meanwhile we thank our clients for their kind interest and would ask them
to leave. Now.”
Arthur looked round the nervous faces of his companions.
”Well, I suppose we’d better be going then, hadn’t we?” he suggested.
”Shhh!” said Zaphod. ”There’s absolutely nothing to be worried about.”
”Then why’s everyone so tense?”
”They’re just interested!” shouted Zaphod. ”Computer, start a descent
into the atmosphere and prepare for landing.”
This time the fanfare was quite perfunctory, the voice distinctly cold.
”It is most gratifying,” it said, ”that your enthusiasm for our planet continues
unabated, and so we would like to assure you that the guided missiles
currently converging with your ship are part of a special service we extend
to all of our most enthusiastic clients, and the fully armed nuclear warheads
are of course merely a courtesy detail. We look forward to your custom in
future lives . . . Thank you.”
The voice snapped off.
”Oh,” said Trillian.
83
”Er . . . ” said Arthur.
”Well?” said Ford.
”Look,” said Zaphod, ”will you get it into your heads? That’s just a
recorded message. It’s millions of years old. It doesn’t apply to us, get it?”
”What,” said Trillian quietly, ”about the missiles?”
”Missiles? Don’t make me laugh.”
Ford tapped Zaphod on the shoulder and pointed at the rear screen.
Clear in the distance behind them two silver darts were climbing through
the atmosphere towards the ship. A quick change of magnification brought
them into close focus – two massively real rockets thundering through the
sky. The suddenness of it was shocking.
”I think they’re going to have a very good try at applying to us,” said
Ford.
Zaphod stared at them in astonishment.
”Hey this is terrific!” he said. ”Someone down there is trying to kill us!”
”Terrific,” said Arthur.
”But don’t you see what this means?”
”Yes. We’re going to die.”
”Yes, but apart from that.”
”Apart from that?”
”It means we must be on to something!”
”How soon can we get off it?”
Second by second the image of the missiles on the screen became larger.
They had swung round now on to a direct homing course so that all that
could be seen of them now was the warheads, head on.
”As a matter of interest,” said Trillian, ”what are we going to do?”
”Just keep cool,” said Zaphod.
”Is that all?” shouted Arthur.
”No, we’re also going to . . . er . . . take evasive action!” said Zaphod with
a sudden access of panic. ”Computer, what evasive action can we take?”
”Er, none I’m afraid, guys,” said the computer.
”Or something,” said Zaphod, ”. . . er . . . ” he said.
”There seems to be something jamming my guidance system,” explained
the computer brightly, ”impact minus forty-five seconds. Please call me Eddie
if it will help you to relax.”
Zaphod tried to run in several equally decisive directions simultaneously.
”Right!” he said. ”Er . . . we’ve got to get manual control of this ship.”
”Can you fly her?” asked Ford pleasantly.
”No, can you?”
”No.”
”Trillian, can you?”
84
”No.”
”Fine,” said Zaphod, relaxing. ”We’ll do it together.”
”I can’t either,” said Arthur, who felt it was time he began to assert
himself.
”I’d guessed that,” said Zaphod. ”Okay computer, I want full manual
control now.”
”You got it,” said the computer.
Several large desk panels slid open and banks of control consoles sprang up
out of them, showering the crew with bits of expanded polystyrene packaging
and balls of rolled-up cellophane: these controls had never been used before.
Zaphod stared at them wildly.
”Okay, Ford,” he said, ”full retro thrust and ten degrees starboard. Or
something . . . ”
”Good luck guys,” chirped the computer, ”impact minus thirty seconds
. . . ”
Ford leapt to the controls – only a few of them made any immediate sense
to him so he pulled those. The ship shook and screamed as its guidance
rocked jets tried to push it every which way simultaneously. He released half
of them and the ship span round in a tight arc and headed back the way it
had come, straight towards the oncoming missiles.
Air cushions ballooned out of the walls in an instant as everyone was
thrown against them. For a few seconds the inertial forces held them flattened
and squirming for breath, unable to move. Zaphod struggled and pushed in
manic desperation and finally managed a savage kick at a small lever that
formed part of the guidance system.
The lever snapped off. The ship twisted sharply and rocketed upwards.
The crew were hurled violently back across the cabin. Ford’s copy of The
Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy smashed into another section of the control
console with the combined result that the Guide started to explain to anyone
who cared to listen about the best ways of smuggling Antarean parakeet
glands out of Antares (an Antarean parakeet gland stuck on a small stick is
a revolting but much sought after cocktail delicacy and very large sums of
money are often paid for them by very rich idiots who want to impress other
very rich idiots), and the ship suddenly dropped out of the sky like a stone.
It was of course more or less at this moment that one of the crew sustained
a nasty bruise to the upper arm. This should be emphasized because, as had
already been revealed, they escape otherwise completely unharmed and the
deadly nuclear missiles do not eventually hit the ship. The safety of the crew
is absolutely assured.
”Impact minus twenty seconds, guys . . . ” said the computer.
85
”Then turn the bloody engines back on!” bawled Zaphod. ”Oh, sure
thing, guys,” said the computer. With a subtle roar the engines cut back
in, the ship smoothly flattened out of its dive and headed back towards the
missiles again.
The computer started to sing.
”When you walk through the storm . . . ” it whined nasally, ”hold your
head up high . . . ”
Zaphod screamed at it to shut up, but his voice was lost in the din of
what they quite naturally assumed was approaching destruction.
”And don’t . . . be afraid . . . of the dark!” Eddie wailed.
The ship, in flattening out had in fact flattened out upside down and
lying on the ceiling as they were it was now totally impossible for any of the
crew to reach the guidance systems.
”At the end of the storm . . . ” crooned Eddie.
The two missiles loomed massively on the screens as they thundered towards
the ship.
”is a golden sky . . . ”
But by an extraordinarily lucky chance they had not yet fully corrected
their flight paths to that of the erratically weaving ship, and they passed
right under it.
”And the sweet silver songs of the lark . . . Revised impact time fifteen
seconds fellas . . .Walk on through the wind . . . ”
The missiles banked round in a screeching arc and plunged back into
pursuit.
”This is it,” said Arthur watching them. ”We are now quite definitely
going to die aren’t we?”
”I wish you’d stop saying that,” shouted Ford. ”Well, we are, aren’t we?”
”Yes.”
”Walk on through the rain . . . ” sang Eddie.
A thought struck Arthur. He struggled to his feet. ”Why doesn’t anyone
turn on this Improbability Drive thing?” he said. ”We could probably reach
that.”
”What are you crazy?” said Zaphod. ”Without proper programming
anything could happen.”
”Does that matter at this stage?” shouted Arthur.
”Though your dreams be tossed and blown . . . ” sang Eddie.
Arthur scrambled up on to one end of the excitingly chunky pieces of
moulded contouring where the curve of the wall met the ceiling.
”Walk on, walk on, with hope in your heart . . . ”
”Does anyone know why Arthur can’t turn on the Improbability Drive?”
shouted Trillian.
86
”And you’ll never walk alone . . . Impact minus five seconds, it’s been
great knowing you guys, God bless . . . You’ll ne . . . ver . . . walk . . . alone!”
”I said,” yelled Trillian, ”does anyone know . . . ” The next thing that
happened was a mid-mangling explosion of noise and light.
87
Chapter 18
And the next thing that happened after that was that the Heart of Gold
continued on its way perfectly normally with a rather fetchingly redesigned
interior. It was somewhat larger, and done out in delicate pastel shades of
green and blue. In the centre a spiral staircase, leading nowhere in particular,
stood in a spray of ferns and yellow flowers and next to it a stone sundial
pedestal housed the main computer terminal. Cunningly deployed lighting
and mirrors created the illusion of standing in a conservatory overlooking
a wide stretch of exquisitely manicured garden. Around the periphery of
the conservatory area stood marble-topped tables on intricately beautiful
wrought-iron legs. As you gazed into the polished surface of the marble the
vague forms of instruments became visible, and as you touched them the
instruments materialized instantly under your hands. Looked at from the
correct angles the mirrors appeared to reflect all the required data readouts,
though it was far from clear where they were reflected from. It was in fact
sensationally beautiful.
Relaxing in a wickerwork sun chair, Zaphod Beeblebrox said, ”What the
hell happened?”
”Well I was just saying,” said Arthur lounging by a small fish pool,
”there’s this Improbability Drive switch over here . . . ” he waved at where it
had been. There was a potted plant there now.
”But where are we?” said Ford who was sitting on the spiral staircase, a
nicely chilled Pan Galactic Gargle Blaster in his hand.
”Exactly where we were, I think . . . ” said Trillian, as all about them the
mirrors showed them an image of the blighted landscape of Magrathea which
still scooted along beneath them.
Zaphod leapt out of his seat.
”Then what’s happened to the missiles?” he said.
A new and astounding image appeared in the mirrors. ”They would
appear,” said Ford doubtfully, ”to have turned into a bowl of petunias and
a very surprised looking whale . . . ”
88
”At an Improbability Factor,” cut in Eddie, who hadn’t changed a bit,
”of eight million seven hundred and sixty-seven thousand one hundred and
twenty-eight to one against.”
Zaphod stared at Arthur. ”Did you think of that, Earthman?” he demanded.
”Well,” said Arthur, ”all I did was . . . ”
”That’s very good thinking you know. Turn on the Improbability Drive
for a second without first activating the proofing screens. Hey kid you just
saved our lives, you know that?”
”Oh,” said Arthur, ”well, it was nothing really . . . ”
”Was it?” said Zaphod. ”Oh well, forget it then. Okay, computer, take
us in to land.”
”But . . . ”
”I said forget it.”
Another thing that got forgotten was the fact that against all probability
a sperm whale had suddenly been called into existence several miles above
the surface of an alien planet.
And since this is not a naturally tenable position for a whale, this poor
innocent creature had very little time to come to terms with its identity as a
whale before it then had to come to terms with not being a whale any more.
This is a complete record of its thoughts from the moment it began its
life till the moment it ended it.
Ah . . . ! What’s happening? it thought.
Er, excuse me, who am I?
Hello?
Why am I here? What’s my purpose in life?
What do I mean by who am I?
Calm down, get a grip now . . . oh! this is an interesting sensation, what is
it? It’s a sort of . . . yawning, tingling sensation in my . . . my . . . well I suppose
I’d better start finding names for things if I want to make any headway in
what for the sake of what I shall call an argument I shall call the world, so
let’s call it my stomach.
Good. Ooooh, it’s getting quite strong. And hey, what’s about this
whistling roaring sound going past what I’m suddenly going to call my head?
Perhaps I can call that . . . wind! Is that a good name? It’ll do . . . perhaps I
can find a better name for it later when I’ve found out what it’s for. It must
be something very important because there certainly seems to be a hell of a
lot of it. Hey! What’s this thing? This . . . let’s call it a tail – yeah, tail. Hey!
I can can really thrash it about pretty good can’t I? Wow! Wow! That feels
great! Doesn’t seem to achieve very much but I’ll probably find out what it’s
for later on. Now – have I built up any coherent picture of things yet?
89
No.
Never mind, hey, this is really exciting, so much to find out about, so
much to look forward to, I’m quite dizzy with anticipation . . .
Or is it the wind?
There really is a lot of that now isn’t it?
And wow! Hey! What’s this thing suddenly coming towards me very
fast? Very very fast. So big and flat and round, it needs a big wide sounding
name like . . . ow . . . ound . . . round . . . ground! That’s it! That’s a good name
– ground!
I wonder if it will be friends with me?
And the rest, after a sudden wet thud, was silence.
Curiously enough, the only thing that went through the mind of the bowl
of petunias as it fell was Oh no, not again. Many people have speculated
that if we knew exactly why the bowl of petunias had thought that we would
know a lot more about the nature of the universe than we do now.
90
Chapter 19
”Are we taking this robot with us?” said Ford, looking with distaste at
Marvin who was standing in an awkward hunched posture in the corner
under a small palm tree.
Zaphod glanced away from the mirror screens which presented a panoramic
view of the blighted landscape on which the Heart of Gold had now landed.
”Oh, the Paranoid Android,” he said. ”Yeah, we’ll take him.”
”But what are supposed to do with a manically depressed robot?”
”You think you’ve got problems,” said Marvin as if he was addressing a
newly occupied coffin, ”what are you supposed to do if you are a manically
depressed robot? No, don’t bother to answer that, I’m fifty thousand times
more intelligent than you and even I don’t know the answer. It gives me a
headache just trying to think down to your level.”
Trillian burst in through the door from her cabin.
”My white mice have escaped!” she said.
An expression of deep worry and concern failed to cross either of Zaphod’s
faces.
”Nuts to your white mice,” he said.
Trillian glared an upset glare at him, and disappeared again.
It is possible that her remark would have commanded greater attention
had it been generally realized that human beings were only the third most
intelligent life form present on the planet Earth, instead of (as was generally
thought by most independent observers) the second.
”Good afternoon boys.”
The voice was oddly familiar, but oddly different. It had a matriarchal
twang. It announced itself to the crew as they arrived at the airlock hatchway
that would let them out on the planet surface.
They looked at each other in puzzlement.
”It’s the computer,” explained Zaphod. ”I discovered it had an emergency
back-up personality that I thought might work out better.”
91
”Now this is going to be your first day out on a strange new planet,”
continued Eddie’s new voice, ”so I want you all wrapped up snug and warm,
and no playing with any naughty bug-eyed monsters.”
Zaphod tapped impatiently on the hatch.
”I’m sorry,” he said, ”I think we might be better off with a slide rule.”
”Right!” snapped the computer. ”Who said that?”
”Will you open the exit hatch please, computer?” said Zaphod trying not
to get angry.
”Not until whoever said that owns up,” urged the computer, stamping a
few synapses closed.
”Oh God,” muttered Ford, slumped against a bulkhead and started to
count to ten. He was desperately worried that one day sentinent life forms
would forget how to do this. Only by counting could humans demonstrate
their independence of computers.
”Come on,” said Eddie sternly.
”Computer . . . ” began Zaphod . . .
”I’m waiting,” interrupted Eddie. ”I can wait all day if necessary . . . ”
”Computer . . . ” said Zaphod again, who had been trying to think of some
subtle piece of reasoning to put the computer down with, and had decided
not to bother competing with it on its own ground, ”if you don’t open that
exit hatch this moment I shall zap straight off to your major data banks and
reprogram you with a very large axe, got that?”
Eddie, shocked, paused and considered this.
Ford carried on counting quietly. This is about the most aggressive thing
you can do to a computer, the equivalent of going up to a human being and
saying Blood . . . blood . . . blood . . . blood . . .
Finally Eddie said quietly, ”I can see this relationship is something we’re
all going to have to work at,” and the hatchway opened.
An icy wind ripped into them, they hugged themselves warmly and stepped
down the ramp on to the barren dust of Magrathea.
”It’ll all end in tears, I know it,” shouted Eddie after them and closed
the hatchway again.
A few minutes later he opened and closed the hatchway again in response
to a command that caught him entirely by surprise.
92
Chapter 20
Five figures wandered slowly over the blighted land. Bits of it were dullish
grey, bits of it dullish brown, the rest of it rather less interesting to look at.
It was like a dried-out marsh, now barren of all vegetation and covered with
a layer of dust about an inch thick. It was very cold.
Zaphod was clearly rather depressed about it. He stalked off by himself
and was soon lost to sight behind a slight rise in the ground.
The wind stung Arthur’s eyes and ears, and the stale thin air clasped his
throat. However, the thing stung most was his mind.
”It’s fantastic . . . ” he said, and his own voice rattled his ears. Sound
carried badly in this thin atmosphere.
”Desolate hole if you ask me,” said Ford. ”I could have more fun in a
cat litter.” He felt a mounting irritation. Of all the planets in all the star
systems of all the Galaxy – didn’t he just have to turn up at a dump like
this after fifteen years of being a castaway? Not even a hot dog stand in
evidence. He stooped down and picked up a cold clot of earth, but there was
nothing underneath it worth crossing thousands of light years to look at.
”No,” insisted Arthur, ”don’t you understand, this is the first time I’ve
actually stood on the surface of another planet . . . a whole alien world . . . !
Pity it’s such a dump though.”
Trillian hugged herself, shivered and frowned. She could have sworn she
saw a slight and unexpected movement out of the corner of her eye, but when
she glanced in that direction all she could see was the ship, still and silent, a
hundred yards or so behind them.
She was relieved when a second or so later they caught sight of Zaphod
standing on top of the ridge of ground and waving to them to come and join
him.
He seemed to be excited, but they couldn’t clearly hear what he was
saying because of the thinnish atmosphere and the wind.
As they approached the ridge of higher ground they became aware that
it seemed to be circular – a crater about a hundred and fifty yards wide.
93
Round the outside of the crater the sloping ground was spattered with black
and red lumps. They stopped and looked at a piece. It was wet. It was
rubbery.
With horror they suddenly realized that it was fresh whalemeat.
At the top of the crater’s lip they met Zaphod.
”Look,” he said, pointing into the crater.
In the centre lay the exploded carcass of a lonely sperm whale that hadn’t
lived long enough to be disappointed with its lot. The silence was only
disturbed by the slight involuntary spasms of Trillian’s throat.
”I suppose there’s no point in trying to bury it?” murmured Arthur, and
then wished he hadn’t.
”Come,” said Zaphod and started back down into the crater.
”What, down there?” said Trillian with severe distaste.
”Yeah,” said Zaphod, ”come on, I’ve got something to show you.”
”We can see it,” said Trillian.
”Not that,” said Zaphod, ”something else. Come on.”
They all hesitated.
”Come on,” insisted Zaphod, ”I’ve found a way in.”
”In?” said Arthur in horror.
”Into the interior of the planet! An underground passage. The force of
the whale’s impact cracked it open, and that’s where we have to go. Where
no man has trod these five million years, into the very depths of time itself
. . . ”
Marvin started his ironical humming again.
Zaphod hit him and he shut up.
With little shudders of disgust they all followed Zaphod down the incline
into the crater, trying very hard not to look at its unfortunate creator.
”Life,” said Marvin dolefully, ”loathe it or ignore it, you can’t like it.”
The ground had caved in where the whale had hit it revealing a network
of galleries and passages, now largely obstructed by collapsed rubble and
entrails. Zaphod had made a start clearing a way into one of them, but
Marvin was able to do it rather faster. Dank air wafted out of its dark
recesses, and as Zaphod shone a torch into it, little was visible in the dusty
gloom.
”According to the legends,” he said, ”the Magratheans lived most of their
lives underground.”
”Why’s that?” said Arthur. ”Did the surface become too polluted or
overpopulated?”
”No, I don’t think so,” said Zaphod. ”I think they just didn’t like it very
much.”
94
”Are you sure you know what you’re doing?” said Trillian peering nervously
into the darkness. ”We’ve been attacked once already you know.”
”Look kid, I promise you the live population of this planet is nil plus the
four of us, so come on, let’s get on in there. Er, hey Earthman . . . ”
”Arthur,” said Arthur.
”Yeah could you just sort of keep this robot with you and guard this end
of the passageway. Okay?”
”Guard?” said Arthur. ”What from? You just said there’s no one here.”
”Yeah, well, just for safety, Okay?” said Zaphod.
”Whose? Yours or mine?”
”Good lad. Okay, here we go.”
Zaphod scrambled down into the passage, followed by Trillian and Ford.
”Well I hope you all have a really miserable time,” complained Arthur.
”Don’t worry,” Marvin assured him, ”they will.”
In a few seconds they had disappeared from view.
Arthur stamped around in a huff, and then decided that a whale’s graveyard
is not on the whole a good place to stamp around in.
Marvin eyed him balefully for a moment, and then turned himself off.
* * *
Zaphod marched quickly down the passageway, nervous as hell, but trying
to hide it by striding purposefully. He flung the torch beam around. The
walls were covered in dark tiles and were cold to the touch, the air thick with
decay.
”There, what did I tell you?” he said. ”An inhabited planet. Magrathea,”
and he strode on through the dirt and debris that littered the tile floor.
Trillian was reminded unavoidably of the London Underground, though
it was less thoroughly squalid.
At intervals along the walls the tiles gave way to large mosaics – simple
angular patterns in bright colours. Trillian stopped and studied one of them
but could not interpret any sense in them. She called to Zaphod.
”Hey, have you any idea what these strange symbols are?”
”I think they’re just strange symbols of some kind,” said Zaphod, hardly
glancing back.
Trillian shrugged and hurried after him.
From time to time a doorway led either to the left or right into smallish
chambers which Ford discovered to be full of derelict computer equipment.
He dragged Zaphod into one to have a look. Trillian followed.
”Look,” said Ford, ”you reckon this is Magrathea . . . ”
”Yeah,” said Zaphod, ”and we heard the voice, right?”
95
”Okay, so I’ve bought the fact that it’s Magrathea – for the moment.
What you have so far said nothing about is how in the Galaxy you found it.
You didn’t just look it up in a star atlas, that’s for sure.”
”Research. Government archives. Detective work. Few lucky guesses.
Easy.”
”And then you stole the Heart of Gold to come and look for it with?”
”I stole it to look for a lot of things.”
”A lot of things?” said Ford in surprise. ”Like what?”
”I don’t know.”
”What?”
”I don’t know what I’m looking for.”
”Why not?”
”Because . . . because . . . I think it might be because if I knew I wouldn’t
be able to look for them.”
”What, are you crazy?”
”It’s a possibility I haven’t ruled out yet,” said Zaphod quietly. ”I only
know as much about myself as my mind can work out under its current
conditions. And its current conditions are not good.”
For a long time nobody said anything as Ford gazed at Zaphod with a
mind suddenly full of worry.
”Listen old friend, if you want to . . . ” started Ford eventually.
”No, wait . . . I’ll tell you something,” said Zaphod. ”I freewheel a lot. I
get an idea to do something, and, hey, why not, I do it. I reckon I’ll become
President of the Galaxy, and it just happens, it’s easy. I decide to steal
this ship. I decide to look for Magrathea, and it all just happens. Yeah, I
work out how it can best be done, right, but it always works out. It’s like
having a Galacticredit card which keeps on working though you never send
off the cheques. And then whenever I stop and think why did I want to do
something? – how did I work out how to do it? – I get a very strong desire
just to stop thinking about it. Like I have now. It’s a big effort to talk about
it.”
Zaphod paused for a while. For a while there was silence. Then he
frowned and said, ”Last night I was worrying about this again. About the
fact that part of my mind just didn’t seem to work properly. Then it occurred
to me that the way it seemed was that someone else was using my mind to
have good ideas with, without telling me about it. I put the two ideas
together and decided that maybe that somebody had locked off part of my
mind for that purpose, which was why I couldn’t use it. I wondered if there
was a way I could check.
”I went to the ship’s medical bay and plugged myself into the encephelographic
screen. I went through every major screening test on both my heads
96
– all the tests I had to go through under government medical officers before
my nomination for Presidency could be properly ratified. They showed up
nothing. Nothing unexpected at least. They showed that I was clever, imaginative,
irresponsible, untrustworthy, extrovert, nothing you couldn’t have
guessed. And no other anomalies. So I started inventing further tests, completely
at random. Nothing. Then I tried superimposing the results from one
head on top of the results from the other head. Still nothing. Finally I got
silly, because I’d given it all up as nothing more than an attack of paranoia.
Last thing I did before I packed it in was take the superimposed picture and
look at it through a green filter. You remember I was always superstitious
about the color green when I was a kid? I always wanted to be a pilot on
one of the trading scouts?”
Ford nodded.
”And there it was,” said Zaphod, ”clear as day. A whole section in the
middle of both brains that related only to each other and not to anything
else around them. Some bastard had cauterized all the synapses and electronically
traumatised those two lumps of cerebellum.”
Ford stared at him, aghast. Trillian had turned white.
”Somebody did that to you?” whispered Ford.
”Yeah.”
”But have you any idea who? Or why?”
”Why? I can only guess. But I do know who the bastard was.”
”You know? How do you know?”
”Because they left their initials burnt into the cauterized synapses. They
left them there for me to see.”
Ford stared at him in horror and felt his skin begin to crawl.
”Initials? Burnt into your brain?”
”Yeah.”
”Well, what were they, for God’s sake?”
Zaphod looked at him in silence again for a moment. Then he looked
away.
”Z.B.,” he said. At that moment a steel shutter slammed down behind
them and gas started to pour into the chamber.
”I’ll tell you about it later,” choked Zaphod as all three passed out.
97
Chapter 21
On the surface of Magrathea Arthur wandered about moodily.
Ford had thoughtfully left him his copy of The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the
Galaxy to while away the time with. He pushed a few buttons at random.
The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy is a very unevenly edited book and
contains many passages that simply seemed to its editors like a good idea at
the time.
One of these (the one Arthur now came across) supposedly relates the
experiences of one Veet Voojagig, a quiet young student at the University
of Maximegalon, who pursued a brilliant academic career studying ancient
philology, transformational ethics and the wave harmonic theory of historical
perception, and then, after a night of drinking Pan Galactic Gargle Blasters
with Zaphod Beeblebrox, became increasingly obsessed with the problem of
what had happened to all the biros he’d bought over the past few years.
There followed a long period of painstaking research during which he visited
all the major centres of biro loss throughout the galaxy and eventually
came up with a quaint little theory which quite caught the public imagination
at the time. Somewhere in the cosmos, he said, along with all the planets
inhabited by humanoids, reptiloids, fishoids, walking treeoids and superintelligent
shades of the colour blue, there was also a planet entirely given over to
biro life forms. And it was to this planet that unattended biros would make
their way, slipping away quietly through wormholes in space to a world where
they knew they could enjoy a uniquely biroid lifestyle, responding to highly
biro-oriented stimuli, and generally leading the biro equivalent of the good
life.
And as theories go this was all very fine and pleasant until Veet Voojagig
suddenly claimed to have found this planet, and to have worked there for a
while driving a limousine for a family of cheap green retractables, whereupon
he was taken away, locked up, wrote a book, and was finally sent into tax
exile, which is the usual fate reserved for those who are determined to make
a fool of themselves in public.
98
When one day an expedition was sent to the spatial coordinates that Voojagig
had claimed for this planet they discovered only a small asteroid inhabited
by a solitary old man who claimed repeatedly that nothing was true,
though he was later discovered to be lying.
There did, however, remain the question of both the mysterious 60,000
Altairan dollars paid yearly into his Brantisvogan bank account, and of course
Zaphod Beeblebrox’s highly profitable second-hand biro business.
* * *
Arthur read this, and put the book down.
The robot still sat there, completely inert.
Arthur got up and walked to the top of the crater. He walked around the
crater. He watched two suns set magnificently over Magrathea.
He went back down into the crater. He woke the robot up because even
a manically depressed robot is better to talk to than nobody.
”Night’s falling,” he said. ”Look robot, the stars are coming out.”
From the heart of a dark nebula it is possible to see very few stars, and
only very faintly, but they were there to be seen.
The robot obediently looked at them, then looked back.
”I know,” he said. ”Wretched isn’t it?”
”But that sunset! I’ve never seen anything like it in my wildest dreams
. . . the two suns! It was like mountains of fire boiling into space.”
”I’ve seen it,” said Marvin. ”It’s rubbish.”
”We only ever had the one sun at home,” persevered Arthur, ”I came
from a planet called Earth you know.”
”I know,” said Marvin, ”you keep going on about it. It sounds awful.”
”Ah no, it was a beautiful place.”
”Did it have oceans?”
”Oh yes,” said Arthur with a sigh, ”great wide rolling blue oceans . . . ”
”Can’t bear oceans,” said Marvin.
”Tell me,” inquired Arthur, ”do you get on well with other robots?”
”Hate them,” said Marvin. ”Where are you going?”
Arthur couldn’t bear any more. He had got up again.
”I think I’ll ju st take another walk,” he said.
”Don’t blame you,” said Marvin and counted five hundred and ninetyseven
thousand million sheep before falling asleep again a second later.
Arthur slapped his arms about himself to try and get his circulation a
little more enthusiastic about its job. He trudged back up the wall of the
crater.
99
Because the atmosphere was so thin and because there was no moon,
nightfall was very rapid and it was by now very dark. Because of this,
Arthur practically walked into the old man before he noticed him.
100
Chapter 22
He was standing with his back to Arthur watching the very last glimmers
of light sink into blackness behind the horizon. He was tallish, elderly and
dressed in a single long grey robe. When he turned his face was thin and
distinguished, careworn but not unkind, the sort of face you would happily
bank with. But he didn’t turn yet, not even to react to Arthur’s yelp of
surprise.
Eventually the last rays of the sun had vanished completely, and he
turned. His face was still illuminated from somewhere, and when Arthur
looked for the source of the light he saw that a few yards away stood a small
craft of some kind – a small hovercraft, Arthur guessed. It shed a dim pool
of light around it.
The man looked at Arthur, sadly it seemed.
”You choose a cold night to visit our dead planet,” he said.
”Who . . . who are you?” stammered Arthur.
The man looked away. Again a kind of sadness seemed to cross his face.
”My name is not important,” he said.
He seemed to have something on his mind. Conversation was clearly
something he felt he didn’t have to rush at. Arthur felt awkward.
”I . . . er . . . you startled me . . . ” he said, lamely.
The man looked round to him again and slightly raised his eyebrows.
”Hmmmm?” he said.
”I said you startled me.”
”Do not be alarmed, I will not harm you.”
Arthur frowned at him. ”But you shot at us! There were missiles . . . ”
he said.
The man gazed into the pit of the crater. The slight glow from Marvin’s
eyes cast very faint red shadows on the huge carcass of the whale.
The man chuckled slightly.
101
”An automatic system,” he said and gave a small sigh. ”Ancient computers
ranged in the bowels of the planet tick away the dark millennia, and the
ages hang heavy on their dusty data banks. I think they take the occasional
pot shot to relieve the monotony.”
He looked gravely at Arthur and said, ”I’m a great fan of science you
know.”
”Oh . . . er, really?” said Arthur, who was beginning to find the man’s
curious, kindly manner disconcerting.
”Oh, yes,” said the old man, and simply stopped talking again.
”Ah,” said Arthur, ”er . . . ” He had an odd felling of being like a man in
the act of adultery who is surprised when the woman’s husband wanders into
the room, changes his trousers, passes a few idle remarks about the weather
and leaves again.
”You seem ill at ease,” said the old man with polite concern.
”Er, no . . . well, yes. Actually you see, we weren’t really expecting to find
anybody about in fact. I sort of gathered that you were all dead or something
. . . ”
”Dead?” said the old man. ”Good gracious no, we have but slept.”
”Slept?” said Arthur incredulously.
”Yes, through the economic recession you see,” said the old man, apparently
unconcerned about whether Arthur understood a word he was talking
about or not.
Arthur had to prompt him again.
”Er, economic recession?”
”Well you see, five million years ago the Galactic economy collapsed, and
seeing that custom-made planets are something of a luxury commodity you
see . . . ”
He paused and looked at Arthur.
”You know we built planets do you?” he asked solemnly.
”Well yes,” said Arthur, ”I’d sort of gathered . . . ”
”Fascinating trade,” said the old man, and a wistful look came into his
eyes, ”doing the coastlines was always my favourite. Used to have endless fun
doing the little bits in fjords . . . so anyway,” he said trying to find his thread
again, ”the recession came and we decided it would save us a lot of bother
if we just slept through it. So we programmed the computers to revive us
when it was all over.”
The man stifled a very slight yawn and continued.
”The computers were index linked to the Galactic stock market prices you
see, so that we’d all be revived when everybody else had rebuilt the economy
enough to afford our rather expensive services.”
Arthur, a regular Guardian reader, was deeply shocked at this.
102
”That’s a pretty unpleasant way to behave isn’t it?”
”Is it?” asked the old man mildly. ”I’m sorry, I’m a bit out of touch.”
He pointed down into the crater.
”Is that robot yours?” he said.
”No,” came a thin metallic voice from the crater, ”I’m mine.”
”If you’d call it a robot,” muttered Arthur. ”It’s more a sort of electronic
sulking machine.”
”Bring it,” said the old man. Arthur was quite surprised to hear a note
of decision suddenly present in the old man’s voice. He called to Marvin who
crawled up the slope making a big show of being lame, which he wasn’t.
”On second thoughts,” said the old man, ”leave it here. You must come
with me. Great things are afoot.” He turned towards his craft which, though
no apparent signal had been given, now drifted quietly towards them through
the dark.
Arthur looked down at Marvin, who now made an equally big show of
turning round laboriously and trudging off down into the crater again muttering
sour nothings to himself.
”Come,” called the old man, ”come now or you will be late.”
”Late?” said Arthur. ”What for?”
”What is your name, human?”
”Dent. Arthur Dent,” said Arthur.
”Late, as in the late Dentarthurdent,” said the old man, sternly. ”It’s
a sort of threat you see.” Another wistful look came into his tired old eyes.
”I’ve never been very good at them myself, but I’m told they can be very
effective.”
Arthur blinked at him.
”What an extraordinary person,” he muttered to himself.
”I beg your pardon?” said the old man.
”Oh nothing, I’m sorry,” said Arthur in embarrassment. ”All right, where
do we go?”
”In my aircar,” said the old man motioning Arthur to get into the craft
which had settled silently next to them. ”We are going deep into the bowels
of the planet where even now our race is being revived from its five-millionyear
slumber. Magrathea awakes.”
Arthur shivered involuntarily as he seated himself next to the old man.
The strangeness of it, the silent bobbing movement of the craft as it soared
into the night sky quite unsettled him.
He looked at the old man, his face illuminated by the dull glow of tiny
lights on the instrument panel.
”Excuse me,” he said to him, ”what is your name by the way?”
103
”My name?” said the old man, and the same distant sadness came into
his face again. He paused. ”My name,” he said, ”. . . is Slartibartfast.”
Arthur practically choked.
”I beg your pardon?” he spluttered.
”Slartibartfast,” repeated the old man quietly.
”Slartibartfast?”
The old man looked at him gravely.
”I said it wasn’t important,” he said.
The aircar sailed through the night.
104
Chapter 23
It is an important and popular fact that things are not always what they
seem. For instance, on the planet Earth, man had always assumed that
he was more intelligent than dolphins because he had achieved so much –
the wheel, New York, wars and so on – whilst all the dolphins had ever
done was muck about in the water having a good time. But conversely, the
dolphins had always believed that they were far more intelligent than man –
for precisely the same reasons.
Curiously enough, the dolphins had long known of the impending destruction
of the planet Earth and had made many attempts to alert mankind of
the danger; but most of their communications were misinterpreted as amusing
attempts to punch footballs or whistle for tidbits, so they eventually gave
up and left the Earth by their own means shortly before the Vogons arrived.
The last ever dolphin message was misinterpreted as a surprisingly sophisticated
attempt to do a double-backwardssomersault through a hoop whilst
whistling the ”Star Sprangled Banner”, but in fact the message was this: So
long and thanks for all the fish.
In fact there was only one species on the planet more intelligent than
dolphins, and they spent a lot of their time in behavioural research laboratories
running round inside wheels and conducting frighteningly elegant
and subtle experiments on man. The fact that once again man completely
misinterpreted this relationship was entirely according to these creatures’
plans.
105
Chapter 24
Silently the aircar coasted through the cold darkness, a single soft glow of
light that was utterly alone in the deep Magrathean night. It sped swiftly.
Arthur’s companion seemed sunk in his own thoughts, and when Arthur tried
on a couple of occasions to engage him in conversation again he would simply
reply by asking if he was comfortable enough, and then left it at that.
Arthur tried to gauge the speed at which they were travelling, but the
blackness outside was absolute and he was denied any reference points. The
sense of motion was so soft and slight he could almost believe they were
hardly moving at all.
Then a tiny glow of light appeared in the far distance and within seconds
had grown so much in size that Arthur realized it was travelling towards them
at a colossal speed, and he tried to make out what sort of craft it might be.
He peered at it, but was unable to discern any clear shape, and suddenly
gasped in alarm as the aircraft dipped sharply and headed downwards in
what seemed certain to be a collision course. Their relative velocity seemed
unbelievable, and Arthur had hardly time to draw breath before it was all
over. The next thing he was aware of was an insane silver blur that seemed
to surround him. He twisted his head sharply round and saw a small black
point dwindling rapidly in the distance behind them, and it took him several
seconds to realize what had happened.
They had plunged into a tunnel in the ground. The colossal speed had
been their own relative to the glow of light which was a stationary hole in the
ground, the mouth of the tunnel. The insane blur of silver was the circular
wall of the tunnel down which they were shooting, apparently at several
hundred miles an hour.
He closed his eyes in terror.
After a length of time which he made no attempt to judge, he sensed a
slight subsidence in their speed and some while later became aware that they
were gradually gliding to a gentle halt.
He opened his eyes again. They were still in the silver tunnel, threading
106
and weaving their way through what appeared to be a crisscross warren of
converging tunnels. When they finally stopped it was in a small chamber of
curved steel. Several tunnels also had their terminus here, and at the farther
end of the chamber Arthur could see a large circle of dim irritating light.
It was irritating because it played tricks with the eyes, it was impossible to
focus on it properly or tell how near or far it was. Arthur guessed (quite
wrongly) that it might be ultra violet.
Slartibartfast turned and regarded Arthur with his solemn old eyes.
”Earthman,” he said, ”we are now deep in the heart of Magrathea.”
”How did you know I was an Earthman?” demanded Arthur.
”These things will become clear to you,” said the old man gently, ”at
least,” he added with slight doubt in his voice, ”clearer than they are at the
moment.”
He continued: ”I should warn you that the chamber we are about to pass
into does not literally exist within our planet. It is a little too . . . large. We
are about to pass through a gateway into a vast tract of hyperspace. It may
disturb you.”
Arthur made nervous noises.
Slartibartfast touched a button and added, not entirely reassuringly. ”It
scares the willies out of me. Hold tight.”
The car shot forward straight into the circle of light, and suddenly Arthur
had a fairly clear idea of what infinity looked like.
It wasn’t infinity in fact. Infinity itself looks flat and uninteresting. Looking
up into the night sky is looking into infinity – distance is incomprehensible
and therefore meaningless. The chamber into which the aircar emerged was
anything but infinite, it was just very very big, so that it gave the impression
of infinity far better than infinity itself.
Arthur’s senses bobbed and span, as, travelling at the immense speed
he knew the aircar attained, they climbed slowly through the open air leaving
the gateway through which they had passed an invisible pinprick in the
shimmering wall behind them.
The wall.
The wall defied the imagination – seduced it and defeated it. The wall
was so paralysingly vast and sheer that its top, bottom and sides passed away
beyond the reach of sight. The mere shock of vertigo could kill a man.
The wall appeared perfectly flat. It would take the finest laser measuring
equipment to detect that as it climbed, apparently to infinity, as it dropped
dizzily away, as it planed out to either side, it also curved. It met itself again
thirteen light seconds away. In other words the wall formed the inside of
107
a hollow sphere, a sphere over three million miles across and flooded with
unimaginable light.
”Welcome,” said Slartibartfast as the tiny speck that was the aircar, travelling
now at three times the speed of sound, crept imperceptibly forward into
the mindboggling space, ”welcome,” he said, ”to our factory floor.”
Arthur stared about him in a kind of wonderful horror. Ranged away
before them, at distances he could neither judge nor even guess at, were a
series of curious suspensions, delicate traceries of metal and light hung about
shadowy spherical shapes that hung in the space.
”This,” said Slartibartfast, ”is where we make most of our planets you
see.”
”You mean,” said Arthur, trying to form the words, ”you mean you’re
starting it all up again now?”
”No no, good heavens no,” exclaimed the old man, ”no, the Galaxy isn’t
nearly rich enough to support us yet. No, we’ve been awakened to perform
just one extraordinary commission for very . . . special clients from another
dimension. It may interest you . . . there in the distance in front of us.”
Arthur followed the old man’s finger, till he was able to pick out the
floating structure he was pointing out. It was indeed the only one of the
many structures that betrayed any sign of activity about it, though this was
more a sublimal impression than anything one could put one’s finger on.
At the moment however a flash of light arced through the structure and
revealed in stark relief the patterns that were formed on the dark sphere
within. Patterns that Arthur knew, rough blobby shapes that were as familiar
to him as the shapes of words, part of the furniture of his mind. For a few
seconds he sat in stunned silence as the images rushed around his mind and
tried to find somewhere to settle down and make sense.
Part of his brain told him that he knew perfectly well what he was looking
at and what the shapes represented whilst another quite sensibly refused to
countenance the idea and abdicated responsibility for any further thinking
in that direction.
The flash came again, and this time there could be no doubt.
”The Earth . . . ” whispered Arthur.
”Well, the Earth Mark Two in fact,” said Slartibartfast cheerfully. ”We’re
making a copy from our original blueprints.”
There was a pause.
”Are you trying to tell me,” said Arthur, slowly and with control, ”that
you originally . . . made the Earth?”
”Oh yes,” said Slartibartfast. ”Did you ever go to a place . . . I think it
was called Norway?”
”No,” said Arthur, ”no, I didn’t.”
108
”Pity,” said Slartibartfast, ”that was one of mine. Won an award you
know. Lovely crinkly edges. I was most upset to hear about its destruction.”
”You were upset!”
”Yes. Five minutes later and it wouldn’t have mattered so much. It was
a quite shocking cock-up.”
”Huh?” said Arthur.
”The mice were furious.”
”The mice were furious?”
”Oh yes,” said the old man mildly.
”Yes well so I expect were the dogs and cats and duckbilled platypuses,
but . . . ”
”Ah, but they hadn’t paid for it you see, had they?”
”Look,” said Arthur, ”would it save you a lot of time if I just gave up
and went mad now?”
For a while the aircar flew on in awkward silence. Then the old man tried
patiently to explain.
”Earthman, the planet you lived on was commissioned, paid for, and run
by mice. It was destroyed five minutes before the completion of the purpose
for which it was built, and we’ve got to build another one.”
Only one word registered with Arthur.
”Mice?” he said.
”Indeed Earthman.”
”Look, sorry – are we talking about the little white furry things with the
cheese fixation and women standing on tables screaming in early sixties sit
coms?”
Slartibartfast coughed politely.
”Earthman,” he said, ”it is sometimes hard to follow your mode of speech.
Remember I have been asleep inside this planet of Magrathea for five million
years and know little of these early sixties sit coms of which you speak. These
creatures you call mice, you see, they are not quite as they appear. They are
merely the protrusion into our dimension of vast hyperintelligent pandimensional
beings. The whole business with the cheese and the squeaking is just
a front.”
The old man paused, and with a sympathetic frown continued. ”They’ve
been experimenting on you I’m afraid.”
Arthur thought about this for a second, and then his face cleared.
”Ah no,” he said, ”I see the source of the misunderstanding now. No,
look you see, what happened was that we used to do experiments on them.
They were often used in behavioural research, Pavlov and all that sort of
stuff. So what happened was hat the mice would be set all sorts of tests,
learning to ring bells, run around mazes and things so that the whole nature
109
of the learning process could be examined. From our observations of their
behaviour we were able to learn all sorts of things about our own . . . ”
Arthur’s voice tailed off.
”Such subtlety . . . ” said Slartibartfast, ”one has to admire it.”
”What?” said Arthur.
”How better to disguise their real natures, and how better to guide your
thinking. Suddenly running down a maze the wrong way, eating the wrong
bit of cheese, unexpectedly dropping dead of myxomatosis, – if it’s finely
calculated the cumulative effect is enormous.”
He paused for effect.
”You see, Earthman, they really are particularly clever hyperintelligent
pan-dimensional beings. Your planet and people have formed the matrix of
an organic computer running a tenmillion-year research programme . . . ”Let
me tell you the whole story. It’ll take a little time.”
”Time,” said Arthur weakly, ”is not currently one of my problems.”
110
Chapter 25
There are of course many problems connected with life, of which some of the
most popular are Why are people born? Why do they die? Why do they want
to spend so much of the intervening time wearing digital watches?
Many many millions of years ago a race of hyperintelligent pandimensional
beings (whose physical manifestation in their own pan-dimensional universe
is not dissimilar to our own) got so fed up with the constant bickering about
the meaning of life which used to interrupt their favourite pastime of Brockian
Ultra Cricket (a curious game which involved suddenly hitting people for no
readily apparent reason and then running away) that they decided to sit
down and solve their problems once and for all.
And to this end they built themselves a stupendous super computer which
was so amazingly intelligent that even before the data banks had been connected
up it had started from I think therefore I am and got as far as the
existence of rice pudding and income tax before anyone managed to turn it
off.
It was the size of a small city.
Its main console was installed in a specially designed executive office,
mounted on an enormous executive desk of finest ultramahagony topped
with rich ultrared leather. The dark carpeting was discreetly sumptuous,
exotic pot plants and tastefully engraved prints of the principal computer
programmers and their families were deployed liberally about the room, and
stately windows looked out upon a tree-lined public square.
On the day of the Great On-Turning two soberly dressed programmers
with brief cases arrived and were shown discreetly into the office. They were
aware that this day they would represent their entire race in its greatest
moment, but they conducted themselves calmly and quietly as they seated
themselves deferentially before the desk, opened their brief cases and took
out their leather-bound notebooks.
Their names were Lunkwill and Fook.
For a few moments they sat in respectful silence, then, after exchanging
111
a quiet glance with Fook, Lunkwill leaned forward and touched a small black
panel.
The subtlest of hums indicated that the massive computer was now in
total active mode. After a pause it spoke to them in a voice rich resonant
and deep.
It said: ”What is this great task for which I, Deep Thought, the second
greatest computer in the Universe of Time and Space have been called into
existence?”
Lunkwill and Fook glanced at each other in surprise.
”Your task, O Computer . . . ” began Fook.
”No, wait a minute, this isn’t right,” said Lunkwill, worried. ”We distinctly
designed this computer to be the greatest one ever and we’re not
making do with second best. Deep Thought,” he addressed the computer,
”are you not as we designed you to be, the greatest most powerful computer
in all time?”
”I described myself as the second greatest,” intoned Deep Thought, ”and
such I am.”
Another worried look passed between the two programmers. Lunkwill
cleared his throat.
”There must be some mistake,” he said, ”are you not a greatest computer
than the Milliard Gargantubrain which can count all the atoms in a star in
a millisecond?”
”The Milliard Gargantubrain?” said Deep Thought with unconcealed contempt.
”A mere abacus – mention it not.”
”And are you not,” said Fook leaning anxiously forward, ”a greater analyst
than the Googleplex Star Thinker in the Seventh Galaxy of Light and
Ingenuity which can calculate the trajectory of every single dust particle
throughout a five-week Dangrabad Beta sand blizzard?”
”A five-week sand blizzard?” said Deep Thought haughtily. ”You ask this
of me who have contemplated the very vectors of the atoms in the Big Bang
itself? Molest me not with this pocket calculator stuff.”
The two programmers sat in uncomfortable silence for a moment. Then
Lunkwill leaned forward again.
”But are you not,” he said, ”a more fiendish disputant than the Great
Hyperlobic Omni-Cognate Neutron Wrangler of Ciceronicus 12, the Magic
and Indefatigable?”
”The Great Hyperlobic Omni-Cognate Neutron Wrangler,” said Deep
Thought thoroughly rolling the r ’s, ”could talk all four legs off an Arcturan
MegaDonkey – but only I could persuade it to go for a walk afterwards.”
”Then what,” asked Fook, ”is the problem?”
112
”There is no problem,” said Deep Thought with magnificent ringing tones.
”I am simply the second greatest computer in the Universe of Space and
Time.”
”But the second?” insisted Lunkwill. ”Why do you keep saying the second?
You’re surely not thinking of the Multicorticoid Perspicutron Titan
Muller are you? Or the Pondermatic? Or the . . . ”
Contemptuous lights flashed across the computer’s console.
”I spare not a single unit of thought on these cybernetic simpletons!” he
boomed. ”I speak of none but the computer that is to come after me!”
Fook was losing patience. He pushed his notebook aside and muttered,
”I think this is getting needlessly messianic.”
”You know nothing of future time,” pronounced Deep Thought, ”and yet
in my teeming circuitry I can navigate the infinite delta streams of future
probability and see that there must one day come a computer whose merest
operational parameters I am not worthy to calculate, but which it will be my
fate eventually to design.”
Fook sighed heavily and glanced across to Lunkwill.
”Can we get on and ask the question?” he said.
Lunkwill motioned him to wait.
”What computer is this of which you speak?” he asked.
”I will speak of it no further in this present time,” said Deep Thought.
”Now. Ask what else of me you will that I may function. Speak.”
They shrugged at each other. Fook composed himself.
”O Deep Thought Computer,” he said, ”the task we have designed you
to perform is this. We want you to tell us . . . ” he paused, ”. . . the Answer!”
”The answer?” said Deep Thought. ”The answer to what?”
”Life!” urged Fook.
”The Universe!” said Lunkwill.
”Everything!” they said in chorus.
Deep Thought paused for a moment’s reflection.
”Tricky,” he said finally.
”But can you do it?”
Again, a significant pause.
”Yes,” said Deep Thought, ”I can do it.”
”There is an answer?” said Fook with breathless excitement.”
”A simple answer?” added Lunkwill.
”Yes,” said Deep Thought. ”Life, the Universe, and Everything. There
is an answer. But,” he added, ”I’ll have to think about it.”
A sudden commotion destroyed the moment: the door flew open and two
angry men wearing the coarse faded-blue robes and belts of the Cruxwan
113
University burst into the room, thrusting aside the ineffectual flunkies who
tried to bar their way.
”We demand admission!” shouted the younger of the two men elbowing
a pretty young secretary in the throat.
”Come on,” shouted the older one, ”you can’t keep us out!” He pushed a
junior programmer back through the door.
”We demand that you can’t keep us out!” bawled the younger one, though
he was now firmly inside the room and no further attempts were being made
to stop him.
”Who are you?” said Lunkwill, rising angrily from his seat. ”What do
you want?”
”I am Majikthise!” announced the older one.
”And I demand that I am Vroomfondel!” shouted the younger one.
Majikthise turned on Vroomfondel. ”It’s alright,” he explained angrily,
”you don’t need to demand that.”
”All right!” bawled Vroomfondel banging on an nearby desk. ”I am
Vroomfondel, and that is not a demand, that is a solid fact! What we
demand is solid facts!”
”No we don’t!” exclaimed Majikthise in irritation. ”That is precisely
what we don’t demand!”
Scarcely pausing for breath, Vroomfondel shouted, ”We don’t demand
solid facts! What we demand is a total absence of solid facts. I demand that
I may or may not be Vroomfondel!”
”But who the devil are you?” exclaimed an outraged Fook.
”We,” said Majikthise, ”are Philosophers.”
”Though we may not be,” said Vroomfondel waving a warning finger at
the programmers.
”Yes we are,” insisted Majikthise. ”We are quite definitely here as representatives
of the Amalgamated Union of Philosophers, Sages, Luminaries
and Other Thinking Persons, and we want this machine off, and we want it
off now!”
”What’s the problem?” said Lunkwill.
”I’ll tell you what the problem is mate,” said Majikthise, ”demarcation,
that’s the problem!”
”We demand,” yelled Vroomfondel, ”that demarcation may or may not
be the problem!”
”You just let the machines get on with the adding up,” warned Majikthise,
”and we’ll take care of the eternal verities thank you very much. You want
to check your legal position you do mate. Under law the Quest for Ultimate
Truth is quite clearly the inalienable prerogative of your working thinkers.
Any bloody machine goes and actually finds it and we’re straight out of a
114
job aren’t we? I mean what’s the use of our sitting up half the night arguing
that there may or may not be a God if this machine only goes and gives us
his bleeding phone number the next morning?”
”That’s right!” shouted Vroomfondel, ”we demand rigidly defined areas
of doubt and uncertainty!”
Suddenly a stentorian voice boomed across the room.
”Might I make an observation at this point?” inquired Deep Thought.
”We’ll go on strike!” yelled Vroomfondel.
”That’s right!” agreed Majikthise. ”You’ll have a national Philosopher’s
strike on your hands!”
The hum level in the room suddenly increased as several ancillary bass
driver units, mounted in sedately carved and varnished cabinet speakers
around the room, cut in to give Deep Thought’s voice a little more power.
”All I wanted to say,” bellowed the computer, ”is that my circuits are now
irrevocably committed to calculating the answer to the Ultimate Question of
Life, the Universe, and Everything –” he paused and satisfied himself that
he now had everyone’s attention, before continuing more quietly, ”but the
programme will take me a little while to run.”
Fook glanced impatiently at his watch.
”How long?” he said.
”Seven and a half million years,” said Deep Thought.
Lunkwill and Fook blinked at each other.
”Seven and a half million years . . . !” they cried in chorus.
”Yes,” declaimed Deep Thought, ”I said I’d have to think about it, didn’t
I? And it occurs to me that running a programme like this is bound to create
an enormous amount of popular publicity for the whole area of philosophy
in general. Everyone’s going to have their own theories about what answer
I’m eventually to come up with, and who better to capitalize on that media
market than you yourself? So long as you can keep disagreeing with each
other violently enough and slagging each other off in the popular press, you
can keep yourself on the gravy train for life. How does that sound?”
The two philosophers gaped at him.
”Bloody hell,” said Majikthise, ”now that is what I call thinking. Here
Vroomfondel, why do we never think of things like that?”
”Dunno,” said Vroomfondel in an awed whisper, ”think our brains must
be too highly trained Majikthise.”
So saying, they turned on their heels and walked out of the door and into
a lifestyle beyond their wildest dreams.
115
Chapter 26
”Yes, very salutary,” said Arthur, after Slartibartfast had related the salient
points of the story to him, ”but I don’t understand what all this has got to
do with the Earth and mice and things.”
”That is but the first half of the story Earthman,” said the old man. ”If
you would care to discover what happened seven and a half millions later,
on the great day of the Answer, allow me to invite you to my study where
you can experience the events yourself on our Sens-O-Tape records. That
is unless you would care to take a quick stroll on the surface of New Earth.
It’s only half completed I’m afraid – we haven’t even finished burying the
artificial dinosaur skeletons in the crust yet, then we have the Tertiary and
Quarternary Periods of the Cenozoic Era to lay down, and . . . ”
”No thank you,” said Arthur, ”it wouldn’t be quite the same.”
”No,” said Slartibartfast, ”it won’t be,” and he turned the aircar round
and headed back towards the mind-numbing wall.
116
Chapter 27
Slartibartfast’s study was a total mess, like the results of an explosion in a
public library. The old man frowned as they stepped in.
”Terribly unfortunate,” he said, ”a diode blew in one of the life-support
computers. When we tried to revive our cleaning staff we discovered they’d
been dead for nearly thirty thousand years. Who’s going to clear away the
bodies, that’s what I want to know. Look why don’t you sit yourself down
over there and let me plug you in?”
He gestured Arthur towards a chair which looked as if it had been made
out of the rib cage of a stegosaurus.
”It was made out of the rib cage of a stegosaurus,” explained the old man
as he pottered about fishing bits of wire out from under tottering piles of
paper and drawing instruments. ”Here,” he said, ”hold these,” and passed a
couple of stripped wire end to Arthur.
The instant he took hold of them a bird flew straight through him.
He was suspended in mid-air and totally invisible to himself. Beneath him
was a pretty treelined city square, and all around it as far as the eye could see
were white concrete buildings of airy spacious design but somewhat the worse
for wear – many were cracked and stained with rain. Today however the sun
was shining, a fresh breeze danced lightly through the trees, and the odd
sensation that all the buildings were quietly humming was probably caused
by the fact that the square and all the streets around it were thronged with
cheerful excited people. Somewhere a band was playing, brightly coloured
flags were fluttering in the breeze and the spirit of carnival was in the air.
Arthur felt extraordinarily lonely stuck up in the air above it all without
so much as a body to his name, but before he had time to reflect on this a
voice rang out across the square and called for everyone’s attention.
A man standing on a brightly dressed dais before the building which
clearly dominated the square was addressing the crowd over a Tannoy.
”O people waiting in the Shadow of Deep Thought!” he cried out. ”Honoured
Descendants of Vroomfondel and Majikthise, the Greatest and Most
117
Truly Interesting Pundits the Universe has ever known . . . The Time of Waiting
is over!”
Wild cheers broke out amongst the crowd. Flags, streamers and wolf
whistles sailed through the air. The narrower streets looked rather like centipedes
rolled over on their backs and frantically waving their legs in the
air.
”Seven and a half million years our race has waited for this Great and
Hopefully Enlightening Day!” cried the cheer leader. ”The Day of the Answer!”
Hurrahs burst from the ecstatic crowd.
”Never again,” cried the man, ”never again will we wake up in the morning
and think Who am I? What is my purpose in life? Does it really, cosmically
speaking, matter if I don’t get up and go to work? For today we will finally
learn once and for all the plain and simple answer to all these nagging little
problems of Life, the Universe and Everything!”
As the crowd erupted once again, Arthur found himself gliding through
the air and down towards one of the large stately windows on the first floor
of the building behind the dais from which the speaker was addressing the
crowd.
He experienced a moment’s panic as he sailed straight through towards
the window, which passed when a second or so later he found he had gone
right through the solid glass without apparently touching it.
No one in the room remarked on his peculiar arrival, which is hardly
surprising as he wasn’t there. He began to realize that the whole experience
was merely a recorded projection which knocked six-track seventy-millimetre
into a cocked hat.
The room was much as Slartibartfast had described it. In seven and a
half million years it had been well looked after and cleaned regularly every
century or so. The ultramahagony desk was worn at the edges, the carpet a
little faded now, but the large computer terminal sat in sparkling glory on
the desk’s leather top, as bright as if it had been constructed yesterday.
Two severely dressed men sat respectfully before the terminal and waited.
”The time is nearly upon us,” said one, and Arthur was surprised to see
a word suddenly materialize in thin air just by the man’s neck. The word
was Loonquawl, and it flashed a couple of times and the disappeared again.
Before Arthur was able to assimilate this the other man spoke and the word
Phouchg appeared by his neck.
”Seventy-five thousand generations ago, our ancestors set this program
in motion,” the second man said, ”and in all that time we will be the first to
hear the computer speak.”
118
”An awesome prospect, Phouchg,” agreed the first man, and Arthur suddenly
realized that he was watching a recording with subtitles.
”We are the ones who will hear,” said Phouchg, ”the answer to the great
question of Life . . . !”
”The Universe . . . !” said Loonquawl.
”And Everything . . . !”
”Shhh,” said Loonquawl with a slight gesture, ”I think Deep Thought is
preparing to speak!”
There was a moment’s expectant pause whilst panels slowly came to life
on the front of the console. Lights flashed on and off experimentally and
settled down into a businesslike pattern. A soft low hum came from the
communication channel.
”Good morning,” said Deep Thought at last.
”Er . . . Good morning, O Deep Thought,” said Loonquawl nervously, ”do
you have . . . er, that is . . . ”
”An answer for you?” interrupted Deep Thought majestically. ”Yes. I
have.”
The two men shivered with expectancy. Their waiting had not been in
vain.
”There really is one?” breathed Phouchg.
”There really is one,” confirmed Deep Thought.
”To Everything? To the great Question of Life, the Universe and Everything?”
”Yes.”
Both of the men had been trained for this moment, their lives had been a
preparation for it, they had been selected at birth as those who would witness
the answer, but even so they found themselves gasping and squirming like
excited children.
”And you’re ready to give it to us?” urged Loonquawl.
”I am.”
”Now?”
”Now,” said Deep Thought.
They both licked their dry lips.
”Though I don’t think,” added Deep Thought, ”that you’re going to like
it.”
”Doesn’t matter!” said Phouchg. ”We must know it! Now!”
”Now?” inquired Deep Thought.
”Yes! Now . . . ”
”All right,” said the computer and settled into silence again. The two
men fidgeted. The tension was unbearable.
”You’re really not going to like it,” observed Deep Thought.
119
”Tell us!”
”All right,” said Deep Thought. ”The Answer to the Great Question . . . ”
”Yes . . . !”
”Of Life, the Universe and Everything . . . ” said Deep Thought.
”Yes . . . !”
”Is . . . ” said Deep Thought, and paused.
”Yes . . . !”
”Is . . . ”
”Yes . . . !!!. . . ?”
”Forty-two,” said Deep Thought, with infinite majesty and calm.
120
Chapter 28
It was a long time before anyone spoke.
Out of the corner of his eye Phouchg could see the sea of tense expectant
faces down in the square outside.
”We’re going to get lynched aren’t we?” he whispered.
”It was a tough assignment,” said Deep Thought mildly.
”Forty-two!” yelled Loonquawl. ”Is that all you’ve got to show for seven
and a half million years’ work?”
”I checked it very thoroughly,” said the computer, ”and that quite definitely
is the answer. I think the problem, to be quite honest with you, is
that you’ve never actually known what the question is.”
”But it was the Great Question! The Ultimate Question of Life, the
Universe and Everything!” howled Loonquawl.
”Yes,” said Deep Thought with the air of one who suffers fools gladly,
”but what actually is it?”
A slow stupefied silence crept over the men as they stared at the computer
and then at each other.
”Well, you know, it’s just Everything . . . Everything . . . ” offered Phouchg
weakly.
”Exactly!” said Deep Thought. ”So once you do know what the question
actually is, you’ll know what the answer means.”
”Oh terrific,” muttered Phouchg flinging aside his notebook and wiping
away a tiny tear.
”Look, alright, alright,” said Loonquawl, ”can you just please tell us the
Question?”
”The Ultimate Question?”
”Yes!”
”Of Life, the Universe, and Everything?”
”Yes!”
Deep Thought pondered this for a moment.
”Tricky,” he said.
121
”But can you do it?” cried Loonquawl.
Deep Thought pondered this for another long moment.
Finally: ”No,” he said firmly.
Both men collapsed on to their chairs in despair.
”But I’ll tell you who can,” said Deep Thought.
They both looked up sharply.
”Who?” ”Tell us!”
Suddenly Arthur began to feel his apparently non-existent scalp begin to
crawl as he found himself moving slowly but inexorably forward towards the
console, but it was only a dramatic zoom on the part of whoever had made
the recording he assumed.
”I speak of none other than the computer that is to come after me,” intoned
Deep Thought, his voice regaining its accustomed declamatory tones.
”A computer whose merest operational parameters I am not worthy to calculate
– and yet I will design it for you. A computer which can calculate
the Question to the Ultimate Answer, a computer of such infinite and subtle
complexity that organic life itself shall form part of its operational matrix.
And you yourselves shall take on new forms and go down into the computer
to navigate its ten-million-year program! Yes! I shall design this computer
for you. And I shall name it also unto you. And it shall be called . . . The
Earth.”
Phouchg gaped at Deep Thought.
”What a dull name,” he said and great incisions appeared down the length
of his body. Loonquawl too suddenly sustained horrific gashed from nowhere.
The Computer console blotched and cracked, the walls flickered and crumbled
and the room crashed upwards into its own ceiling . . .
Slartibartfast was standing in front of Arthur holding the two wires.
”End of the tape,” he explained.
122
Chapter 29
”Zaphod! Wake up!”
”Mmmmmwwwwwerrrrr?”
”Hey come on, wake up.”
”Just let me stick to what I’m good at, yeah?” muttered Zaphod and
rolled away from the voice back to sleep.
”Do you want me to kick you?” said Ford.
”Would it give you a lot of pleasure?” said Zaphod, blearily.
”No.”
”Nor me. So what’s the point? Stop bugging me.” Zaphod curled himself
up.
”He got a double dose of the gas,” said Trillian looking down at him, ”two
windpipes.”
”And stop talking,” said Zaphod, ”it’s hard enough trying to sleep anyway.
What’s the matter with the ground? It’s all cold and hard.”
”It’s gold,” said Ford.
With an amazingly balletic movement Zaphod was standing and scanning
the horizon, because that was how far the gold ground stretched in every
direction, perfectly smooth and solid. It gleamed like . . . it’s impossible to
say what it gleamed like because nothing in the Universe gleams in quite the
same way that a planet of solid gold does.
”Who put all that there?” yelped Zaphod, goggle-eyed.
”Don’t get excited,” said Ford, ”it’s only a catalogue.”
”A who?”
”A catalogue,” said Trillian, ”an illusion.”
”How can you say that?” cried Zaphod, falling to his hands and knees
and staring at the ground. He poked it and prodded it with his fingernail. It
was very heavy and very slightly soft – he could mark it with his fingernail.
It was very yellow and very shiny, and when he breathed on it his breath
evaporated off it in that very peculiar and special way that breath evaporates
off solid gold.
123
”Trillian and I came round a while ago,” said Ford. ”We shouted and
yelled till somebody came and then carried on shouting and yelling till they
got fed up and put us in their planet catalogue to keep us busy till they were
ready to deal with us. This is all Sens-O-Tape.”
Zaphod stared at him bitterly.
”Ah, shit,” he said, ”you wake me up from my own perfectly good dream
to show me somebody else’s.” He sat down in a huff.
”What’s that series of valleys over there?” he said.
”Hallmark,” said Ford. ”We had a look.”
”We didn’t wake you earlier,” said Trillian. ”The last planet was knee
deep in fish.”
”Fish?”
”Some people like the oddest things.”
”And before that,” said Ford, ”we had platinum. Bit dull. We thought
you’d like to see this one though.”
Seas of light glared at them in one solid blaze wherever they looked.
”Very pretty,” said Zaphod petulantly.
In the sky a huge green catalogue number appeared. It flickered and
changed, and when they looked around again so had the land.
As with one voice they all went, ”Yuch.”
The sea was purple. The beach they were on was composed of tiny yellow
and green pebbles – presumably terribly precious stones. The mountains in
the distance seemed soft and undulating with red peaks. Nearby stood a
solid silver beach table with a frilly mauve parasol and silver tassles.
In the sky a huge sign appeared, replacing the catalogue number. It said,
Whatever your tastes, Magrathea can cater for you. We are not proud.
And five hundred entirely naked women dropped out of the sky on parachutes.
In a moment the scene vanished and left them in a springtime meadow
full of cows.
”Ow!” said Zaphod. ”My brains!”
”You want to talk about it?” said Ford.
”Yeah, Okay,” said Zaphod, and all three sat down and ignored the scenes
that came and went around them.
”I figure this,” said Zaphod. ”Whatever happened to my mind, I did it.
And I did it in such a way that it wouldn’t be detected by the government
screening tests. And I wasn’t to know anything about it myself. Pretty crazy,
right?”
The other two nodded in agreement.
”So I reckon, what’s so secret that I can’t let anybody know I know it,
not the Galactic Government, not even myself? And the answer is I don’t
know. Obviously. But I put a few things together and I can begin to guess.
124
When did I decide to run for President? Shortly after the death of President
Yooden Vranx. You remember Yooden, Ford?”
”Yeah,” said Ford, ”he was that guy we met when we were kids, the
Arcturan captain. He was a gas. He gave us conkers when you bust your
way into his megafreighter. Said you were the most amazing kid he’d ever
met.”
”What’s all this?” said Trillian.
”Ancient history,” said Ford, ”when we were kids together on Betelgeuse.
The Arcturan megafreighters used to carry most of the bulky trade between
the Galactic Centre and the outlying regions The Betelgeuse trading scouts
used to find the markets and the Arcturans would supply them. There was a
lot of trouble with space pirates before they were wiped out in the Dordellis
wars, and the megafreighters had to be equipped with the most fantastic
defence shields known to Galactic science. They were real brutes of ships,
and huge. In orbit round a planet they would eclipse the sun.
”One day, young Zaphod here decides to raid one. On a tri-jet scooter
designed for stratosphere work, a mere kid. I mean forget it, it was crazier
than a mad monkey. I went along for the ride because I’d got some very
safe money on him not doing it, and didn’t want him coming back with fake
evidence. So what happens? We got in his tri-jet which he had souped up
into something totally other, crossed three parsecs in a matter of weeks, bust
our way into a megafreighter I still don’t know how, marched on to the bridge
waving toy pistols and demanded conkers. A wilder thing I have not known.
Lost me a year’s pocket money. For what? Conkers.”
”The captain was this really amazing guy, Yooden Vranx,” said Zaphod.
”He gave us food, booze – stuff from really weird parts of the Galaxy –
lots of conkers of course, and we had just the most incredible time. Then
he teleported us back. Into the maximum security wing of Betelgeuse state
prison. He was a cool guy. Went on to become President of the Galaxy.”
Zaphod paused.
The scene around them was currently plunged into gloom. Dark mists
swirled round them and elephantine shapes lurked indistinctly in the shadows.
The air was occasionally rent with the sounds of illusory beings murdering
other illusory beings. Presumably enough people must have liked this
sort of thing to make it a paying proposition.
”Ford,” said Zaphod quietly.
”Yeah?”
”Just before Yooden died he came to see me.”
”What? You never told me.”
”No.”
”What did he say? What did he come to see you about?”
125
”He told me about the Heart of Gold. It was his idea that I should steal
it.”
”His idea?”
”Yeah,” said Zaphod, ”and the only possible way of stealing it was to be
at the launching ceremony.”
Ford gaped at him in astonishment for a moment, and then roared with
laughter.
”Are you telling me,” he said, ”that you set yourself up to become President
of the Galaxy just to steal that ship?”
”That’s it,” said Zaphod with the sort of grin that would get most people
locked away in a room with soft walls.
”But why?” said Ford. ”What’s so important about having it?”
”Dunno,” said Zaphod, ”I think if I’d consciously known what was so
important about it and what I would need it for it would have showed up
on the brain screening tests and I would never have passed. I think Yooden
told me a lot of things that are still locked away.”
”So you think you went and mucked about inside your own brain as a
result of Yooden talking to you?”
”He was a hell of a talker.”
”Yeah, but Zaphod old mate, you want to look after yourself you know.”
Zaphod shrugged.
”I mean, don’t you have any inkling of the reasons for all this?” asked
Ford.
Zaphod thought hard about this and doubts seemed to cross his mind.
”No,” he said at last, ”I don’t seem to be letting myself into any of my
secrets. Still,” he added on further reflection, ”I can understand that. I
wouldn’t trust myself further than I could spit a rat.”
A moment later, the last planet in the catalogue vanished from beneath
them and the solid world resolved itself again.
They were sitting in a plush waiting room full of glass-top tables and
design awards.
A tall Magrathean man was standing in front of them. ”The mice will
see you now,” he said.
126
Chapter 30
”So there you have it,” said Slartibartfast, making a feeble and perfunctory
attempt to clear away some of the appalling mess of his study. He picked up
a paper from the top of a pile, but then couldn’t think of anywhere else to
put it, so he but it back on top of the original pile which promptly fell over.
”Deep Thought designed the Earth, we built it and you lived on it.”
”And the Vogons came and destroyed it five minutes before the program
was completed,” added Arthur, not unbitterly. ”Yes,” said the old man,
pausing to gaze hopelessly round the room. ”Ten million years of planning
and work gone just like that. Ten million years, Earthman . . . can you conceive
of that kind of time span? A galactic civilization could grow from a
single worm five times over in that time. Gone.” He paused. ”Well that’s
bureaucracy for you,” he added.
”You know,” said Arthur thoughtfully, ”all this explains a lot of things.
All through my life I’ve had this strange unaccountable feeling that something
was going on in the world, something big, even sinister, and no one would
tell me what it was.”
”No,” said the old man, ”that’s just perfectly normal paranoia. Everyone
in the Universe has that.”
”Everyone?” said Arthur. ”Well, if everyone has that perhaps it means
something! Perhaps somewhere outside the Universe we know . . . ”
”Maybe. Who cares?” said Slartibartfast before Arthur got too excited.
”Perhaps I’m old and tired,” he continued, ”but I always think that the
chances of finding out what really is going on are so absurdly remote that
the only thing to do is to say hang the sense of it and just keep yourself
occupied. Look at me: I design coastlines. I got an award for Norway.”
He rummaged around in a pile of debris and pulled out a large perspex
block with his name on it and a model of Norway moulded into it.
”Where’s the sense in that?” he said. ”None that I’ve been able to make
out. I’ve been doing fjords in all my life. For a fleeting moment they become
fashionable and I get a major award.”
127
He turned it over in his hands with a shrug and tossed it aside carelessly,
but not so carelessly that it didn’t land on something soft.
”In this replacement Earth we’re building they’ve given me Africa to do
and of course I’m doing it with all fjords again because I happen to like them,
and I’m old fashioned enough to think that they give a lovely baroque feel
to a continent. And they tell me it’s not equatorial enough. Equatorial!”
He gave a hollow laugh. ”What does it matter? Science has achieved some
wonderful things of course, but I’d far rather be happy than right any day.”
”And are you?”
”No. That’s where it all falls down of course.”
”Pity,” said Arthur with sympathy. ”It sounded like quite a good lifestyle
otherwise.”
Somewhere on the wall a small white light flashed.
”Come,” said Slartibartfast, ”you are to meet the mice. Your arrival on
the planet has caused considerable excitement. It has already been hailed, so
I gather, as the third most improbable event in the history of the Universe.”
”What were the first two?”
”Oh, probably just coincidences,” said Slartibartfast carelessly. He opened
the door and stood waiting for Arthur to follow.
Arthur glanced around him once more, and then down at himself, at the
sweaty dishevelled clothes he had been lying in the mud in on Thursday
morning.
”I seem to be having tremendous difficulty with my lifestyle,” he muttered
to himself.
”I beg your pardon?” said the old man mildly.
”Oh nothing,” said Arthur, ”only joking.”
128
Chapter 31
It is of course well known that careless talk costs lives, but the full scale of
the problem is not always appreciated.
For instance, at the very moment that Arthur said ”I seem to be having
tremendous difficulty with my lifestyle,” a freak wormhole opened up in the
fabric of the space-time continuum and carried his words far far back in time
across almost infinite reaches of space to a distant Galaxy where strange and
warlike beings were poised on the brink of frightful interstellar battle.
The two opposing leaders were meeting for the last time.
A dreadful silence fell across the conference table as the commander of the
Vl’hurgs, resplendent in his black jewelled battle shorts, gazed levelly at the
G’Gugvuntt leader squatting opposite him in a cloud of green sweet-smelling
steam, and, with a million sleek and horribly beweaponed star cruisers poised
to unleash electric death at his single word of command, challenged the vile
creature to take back what it had said about his mother.
The creature stirred in his sickly broiling vapour, and at that very moment
the words I seem to be having tremendous difficulty with my lifestyle drifted
across the conference table.
Unfortunately, in the Vl’hurg tongue this was the most dreadful insult
imaginable, and there was nothing for it but to wage terrible war for centuries.
Eventually of course, after their Galaxy had been decimated over a few
thousand years, it was realized that the whole thing had been a ghastly
mistake, and so the two opposing battle fleets settled their few remaining
differences in order to launch a joint attack on our own Galaxy – now positively
identified as the source of the offending remark.
For thousands more years the mighty ships tore across the empty wastes
of space and finally dived screaming on to the first planet they came across
– which happened to be the Earth – where due to a terrible miscalculation
of scale the entire battle fleet was accidentally swallowed by a small dog.
Those who study the complex interplay of cause and effect in the history
of the Universe say that this sort of thing is going on all the time, but that
129
we are powerless to prevent it.
”It’s just life,” they say.
A short aircar trip brought Arthur and the old Magrathean to a doorway.
They left the car and went through the door into a waiting room full of
glass-topped tables and perspex awards. Almost immediately, a light flashed
above the door at the other side of the room and they entered.
”Arthur! You’re safe!” a voice cried.
”Am I?” said Arthur, rather startled. ”Oh good.”
The lighting was rather subdued and it took him a moment or so to see
Ford, Trillian and Zaphod sitting round a large table beautifully decked out
with exotic dishes, strange sweetmeats and bizarre fruits. They were stuffing
their faces.
”What happened to you?” demanded Arthur.
”Well,” said Zaphod, attacking a boneful of grilled muscle, ”our guests
here have been gassing us and zapping our minds and being generally weird
and have now given us a rather nice meal to make it up to us. Here,” he
said hoiking out a lump of evil smelling meat from a bowl, ”have some Vegan
Rhino’s cutlet. It’s delicious if you happen to like that sort of thing.”
”Hosts?” said Arthur. ”What hosts? I don’t see any . . . ”
A small voice said, ”Welcome to lunch, Earth creature.”
Arthur glanced around and suddenly yelped.
”Ugh!” he said. ”There are mice on the table!”
There was an awkward silence as everyone looked pointedly at Arthur.
He was busy staring at two white mice sitting in what looked like whisky
glasses on the table. He heard the silence and glanced around at everyone.
”Oh!” he said, with sudden realization. ”Oh, I’m sorry, I wasn’t quite
prepared for . . . ”
”Let me introduce you,” said Trillian. ”Arthur this is Benji mouse.”
”Hi,” said one of the mice. His whiskers stroked what must have been
a touch sensitive panel on the inside of the whisky-glass like affair, and it
moved forward slightly.
”And this is Frankie mouse.”
The other mouse said, ”Pleased to meet you,” and did likewise.
Arthur gaped. ”But aren’t they . . . ”
”Yes,” said Trillian, ”they are the mice I brought with me from the
Earth.”
She looked him in the eye and Arthur thought he detected the tiniest
resigned shrug.
”Could you pass me that bowl of grated Arcturan Megadonkey?” she
said.
130
Slartibartfast coughed politely.
”Er, excuse me,” he said.
”Yes, thank you Slartibartfast,” said Benji mouse sharply, ”you may go.”
”What? Oh . . . er, very well,” said the old man, slightly taken aback, ”I’ll
just go and get on with some of my fjords then.”
”Ah, well in fact that won’t be necessary,” said Frankie mouse. ”It looks
very much as if we won’t be needing the new Earth any longer.” He swivelled
his pink little eyes. ”Not now that we have found a native of the planet who
was there seconds before it was destroyed.”
”What?” cried Slartibartfast, aghast. ”You can’t mean that! I’ve got a
thousand glaciers poised and ready to roll over Africa!”
”Well perhaps you can take a quick skiing holiday before you dismantle
them,” said Frankie, acidly.
”Skiing holiday!” cried the old man. ”Those glaciers are works of art!
Elegantly sculptured contours, soaring pinnacles of ice, deep majestic ravines!
It would be sacrilege to go skiing on high art!”
”Thank you Slartibartfast,” said Benji firmly. ”That will be all.”
”Yes sir,” said the old man coldly, ”thank you very much. Well, goodbye
Earthman,” he said to Arthur, ”hope the lifestyle comes together.”
With a brief nod to the rest of the company he turned and walked sadly
out of the room.
Arthur stared after him not knowing what to say.
”Now,” said Benji mouse, ”to business.”
Ford and Zaphod clinked their glasses together.
”To business!” they said. ”I beg your pardon?” said Benji.
Ford looked round.
”Sorry, I thought you were proposing a toast,” he said.
The two mice scuttled impatiently around in their glass transports. Finally
they composed themselves, and Benji moved forward to address Arthur.
”Now, Earth creature,” he said, ”the situation we have in effect is this.
We have, as you know, been more or less running your planet for the last
ten million years in order to find this wretched thing called the Ultimate
Question.”
”Why?” said Arthur, sharply.
”No – we already thought of that one,” said Frankie interrupting, ”but it
doesn’t fit the answer. Why? – Forty-Two . . . you see, it doesn’t work.”
”No,” said Arthur, ”I mean why have you been doing it?”
”Oh, I see,” said Frankie. ”Well, eventually just habit I think, to be
brutally honest. And this is more or less the point – we’re sick to the teeth
with the whole thing, and the prospect of doing it all over again on account
of those whinnet-ridden Vogons quite frankly gives me the screaming heeby
131
jeebies, you know what I mean? It was by the merest lucky chance that Benji
and I finished our particular job and left the planet early for a quick holiday,
and have since manipulated our way back to Magrathea by the good offices
of your friends.”
”Magrathea is a gateway back to our own dimension,” put in Benji.
”Since when,” continued his murine colleague, ”we have had an offer of
a quite enormously fat contract to do the 5D chat show and lecture circuit
back in our own dimensional neck of the woods, and we’re very much inclined
to take it.”
”I would, wouldn’t you Ford?” said Zaphod promptingly.
”Oh yes,” said Ford, ”jump at it, like a shot.”
Arthur glanced at them, wondering what all this was leading up to.
”But we’ve got to have a product you see,” said Frankie, ”I mean ideally
we still need the Ultimate Question in some form or other.”
Zaphod leaned forward to Arthur.
”You see,” he said, ”if they’re just sitting there in the studio looking
very relaxed and, you know, just mentioning that they happen to know the
Answer to Life, the Universe and Everything, and then eventually have to
admit that in fact it’s Forty-two, then the show’s probably quite short. No
follow-up, you see.”
”We have to have something that sounds good,” said Benji.
”Something that sounds good?” exclaimed Arthur. ”An Ultimate Question
that sounds good? From a couple of mice?”
The mice bristled.
”Well, I mean, yes idealism, yes the dignity of pure research, yes the
pursuit of truth in all its forms, but there comes a point I’m afraid where
you begin to suspect that if there’s any real truth, it’s that the entire multidimensional
infinity of the Universe is almost certainly being run by a bunch
of maniacs. And if it comes to a choice between spending yet another ten
million years finding that out, and on the other hand just taking the money
and running, then I for one could do with the exercise,” said Frankie.
”But . . . ” started Arthur, hopelessly.
”Hey, will you get this, Earthman,” interrupted Zaphod. ”You are a last
generation product of that computer matrix, right, and you were there right
up to the moment your planet got the finger, yeah?”
”Er . . . ”
”So your brain was an organic part of the penultimate configuration of
the computer programme,” said Ford, rather lucidly he thought.
”Right?” said Zaphod.
”Well,” said Arthur doubtfully. He wasn’t aware of ever having felt an
organic part of anything. He had always seen this as one of his problems.
132
”In other words,” said Benji, steering his curious little vehicle right over to
Arthur, ”there’s a good chance that the structure of the question is encoded
in the structure of your brain – so we want to buy it off you.”
”What, the question?” said Arthur.
”Yes,” said Ford and Trillian.
”For lots of money,” said Zaphod.
”No, no,” said Frankie, ”it’s the brain we want to buy.”
”What!”
”Well, who would miss it?” inquired Benjy.
”I thought you said you could just read his brain electronically,” protested
Ford.
”Oh yes,” said Frankie, ”but we’d have to get it out first. It’s got to be
prepared.”
”Treated,” said Benji.
”Diced.”
”Thank you,” shouted Arthur, tipping up his chair and backing away
from the table in horror.
”It could always be replaced,” said Benji reasonably, ”if you think it’s
important.”
”Yes, an electronic brain,” said Frankie, ”a simple one would suffice.”
”A simple one!” wailed Arthur.
”Yeah,” said Zaphod with a sudden evil grin, ”you’d just have to program
it to say What? and I don’t understand and Where’s the tea? – who’d know
the difference?”
”What?” cried Arthur, backing away still further.
”See what I mean?” said Zaphod and howled with pain because of something
that Trillian did at that moment.
”I’d notice the difference,” said Arthur.
”No you wouldn’t,” said Frankie mouse, ”you’d be programmed not to.”
Ford made for the door.
”Look, I’m sorry, mice old lads,” he said. ”I don’t think we’ve got a deal.”
”I rather think we have to have a deal,” said the mice in chorus, all
the charm vanishing fro their piping little voices in an instant. With a tiny
whining shriek their two glass transports lifted themselves off the table, and
swung through the air towards Arthur, who stumbled further backwards into
a blind corner, utterly unable to cope or think of anything.
Trillian grabbed him desperately by the arm and tried to drag him towards
the door, which Ford and Zaphod were struggling to open, but Arthur
was dead weight – he seemed hypnotized by the airborne rodents swooping
towards him.
She screamed at him, but he just gaped.
133
With one more yank, Ford and Zaphod got the door open. On the other
side of it was a small pack of rather ugly men who they could only assume
were the heavy mob of Magrathea. Not only were they ugly themselves, but
the medical equipment they carried with them was also far from pretty. They
charged.
So – Arthur was about to have his head cut open, Trillian was unable to
help him, and Ford and Zaphod were about to be set upon by several thugs
a great deal heavier and more sharply armed than they were.
All in all it was extremely fortunate that at that moment every alarm on
the planet burst into an earsplitting din.
134
Chapter 32
”Emergency! Emergency!” blared the klaxons throughout Magrathea. ”Hostile
ship has landed on planet. Armed intruders in section 8A. Defence stations,
defence stations!”
The two mice sniffed irritably round the fragments of their glass transports
where they lay shattered on the floor. ”Damnation,” muttered Frankie
mouse, ”all that fuss over two pounds of Earthling brain.” He scuttled round
and about, his pink eyes flashing, his fine white coat bristling with static.
”The only thing we can do now,” said Benji, crouching and stroking his
whiskers in thought, ”is to try and fake a question, invent one that will
sound plausible.”
”Difficult,” said Frankie. He thought. ”How about What’s yellow and
dangerous?”
Benji considered this for a moment.
”No, no good,” he said. ”Doesn’t fit the answer.”
They sank into silence for a few seconds.
”All right,” said Benji. ”What do you get if you multiply six by seven?”
”No, no, too literal, too factual,” said Frankie, ”wouldn’t sustain the
punters’ interest.”
Again they thought.
Then Frankie said: ”Here’s a thought. How many roads must a man walk
down?”
”Ah,” said Benji. ”Aha, now that does sound promising!” He rolled
the phrase around a little. ”Yes,” he said, ”that’s excellent! Sounds very
significant without actually tying you down to meaning anything at all. How
many roads must a man walk down? Forty-two. Excellent, excellent, that’ll
fox ’em. Frankie baby, we are made!”
They performed a scampering dance in their excitement.
Near them on the floor lay several rather ugly men who had been hit
about the head with some heavy design awards.
Half a mile away, four figures pounded up a corridor looking for a way
135
out. They emerged into a wide open-plan computer bay. They glanced about
wildly.
”Which way do you reckon Zaphod?” said Ford.
”At a wild guess, I’d say down here,” said Zaphod, running off down
to the right between a computer bank and the wall. As the others started
after him he was brought up short by a Kill-O-Zap energy bolt that cracked
through the air inches in front of him and fried a small section of adjacent
wall.
A voice on a bullhorn said, ”Okay Beeblebrox, hold it right there. We’ve
got you covered.”
”Cops!” hissed Zaphod, and span around in a crouch. ”You want to try
a guess at all, Ford?”
”Okay, this way,” said Ford, and the four of them ran down a gangway
between two computer banks.
At the end of the gangway appeared a heavily armoured and spacesuited
figure waving a vicious Kill-O-Zap gun.
”We don’t want to shoot you, Beeblebrox!” shouted the figure.
”Suits me fine!” shouted Zaphod back and dived down a wide gap between
two data process units.
The others swerved in behind him.
”There are two of them,” said Trillian. ”We’re cornered.”
They squeezed themselves down in an angle between a large computer
data bank and the wall.
They held their breath and waited.
Suddenly the air exploded with energy bolts as both the cops opened fire
on them simultaneously.
”Hey, they’re shooting at us,” said Arthur, crouching in a tight ball, ”I
thought they said they didn’t want to do that.”
”Yeah, I thought they said that,” agreed Ford.
Zaphod stuck a head up for a dangerous moment.
”Hey,” he said, ”I thought you said you didn’t want to shoot us!” and
ducked again.
They waited.
After a moment a voice replied, ”It isn’t easy being a cop!”
”What did he say?” whispered Ford in astonishment.
”He said it isn’t easy being a cop.”
”Well surely that’s his problem isn’t it?”
”I’d have thought so.”
Ford shouted out, ”Hey listen! I think we’ve got enough problems on our
own having you shooting at us, so if you could avoid laying your problems
136
on us as well, I think we’d all find it easier to cope!”
Another pause, and then the bullhorn again.
”Now see here, guy,” said the voice, ”you’re not dealing with any dumb
two-bit trigger-pumping morons with low hairlines, little piggy eyes and no
conversation, we’re a couple of intelligent caring guys that you’d probably
quite like if you met us socially! I don’t go around gratuitously shooting
people and then bragging about it afterwards in seedy space-rangers bars,
like some cops I could mention! I go around shooting people gratuitously
and then I agonize about it afterwards for hours to my girlfriend!”
”And I write novels!” chimed in the other cop. ”Though I haven’t had
any of them published yet, so I better warn you, I’m in a meeeean mood!”
Ford’s eyes popped halfway out of their sockets. ”Who are these guys?”
he said.
”Dunno,” said Zaphod, ”I think I preferred it when they were shooting.”
”So are you going to come quietly,” shouted one of the cops again, ”or
are you going to let us blast you out?”
”Which would you prefer?” shouted Ford.
A millisecond later the air about them started to fry again, as bolt after
bolt of Kill-O-Zap hurled itself into the computer bank in front of them.
The fusillade continued for several seconds at unbearable intensity.
When it stopped, there were a few seconds of near quietness ad the echoes
died away.
”You still there?” called one of the cops.
”Yes,” they called back.
”We didn’t enjoy doing that at all,” shouted the other cop.
”We could tell,” shouted Ford.
”Now, listen to this, Beeblebrox, and you better listen good!”
”Why?” shouted Back Zaphod.
”Because,” shouted the cop, ”it’s going to be very intelligent, and quite
interesting and humane! Now either you all give yourselves up now and let
us beat you up a bit, though not very much of course because we are firmly
opposed to needless violence, or we blow up this entire planet and possibly
one or two others we noticed on our way out here!”
”But that’s crazy!” cried Trillian. ”You wouldn’t do that!”
”Oh yes we would,” shouted the cop, ”wouldn’t we?” he asked the other
one.
”Oh yes, we’d have to, no question,” the other one called back.
”But why?” demanded Trillian. ”Because there are some things you
have to do even if you are an enlightened liberal cop who knows all about
sensitivity and everything!”
”I just don’t believe these guys,” muttered Ford, shaking his head.
137
One cop shouted to the other, ”Shall we shoot them again for a bit?”
”Yeah, why not?”
They let fly another electric barrage.
The heat and noise was quite fantastic. Slowly, the computer bank was
beginning to disintegrate. The front had almost all melted away, and thick
rivulets of molten metal were winding their way back towards where they
were squatting. They huddled further back and waited for the end.
138
Chapter 33
But the end never came, at least not then.
Quite suddenly the barrage stopped, and the sudden silence afterwards
was punctuated by a couple of strangled gurgles and thuds.
The four stared at each other.
”What happened?” said Arthur.
”They stopped,” said Zaphod with a shrug.
”Why?”
”Dunno, do you want to go and ask them?”
”No.”
They waited.
”Hello?” called out Ford.
No answer.
”That’s odd.”
”Perhaps it’s a trap.”
”They haven’t the wit.”
”What were those thuds?”
”Dunno.”
They waited for a few more seconds.
”Right,” said Ford, ”I’m going to have a look.”
He glanced round at the others.
”Is no one going to say, No you can’t possibly, let me go instead?”
They all shook their heads.
”Oh well,” he said, and stood up.
For a moment, nothing happened.
Then, after a second or so, nothing continued to happen. Ford peered
through the thick smoke that was billowing out of the burning computer.
Cautiously he stepped out into the open.
Still nothing happened.
Twenty yards away he could dimly see through the smoke the space-suited
figure of one of the cops. He was lying in a crumpled heap on the ground.
139
Twenty yards in the other direction lay the second man. No one else was
anywhere to be seen.
This struck Ford as being extremely odd.
Slowly, nervously, he walked towards the first one. The body lay reassuringly
still as he approached it, and continued to lie reassuringly still as he
reached it and put his foot down on the Kill-O-Zap gun that still dangled
from its limp fingers.
He reached down and picked it up, meeting no resistance.
The cop was quite clearly dead.
A quick examination revealed him to be from Blagulon Kappa – he was a
methane-breathing life form, dependent on his space suit for survival in the
thin oxygen atmosphere of Magrathea.
The tiny life-support system computer on his backpack appeared unexpectedly
to have blown up.
Ford poked around in it in considerable astonishment. These miniature
suit computers usually had the full back-up of the main computer back on the
ship, with which they were directly linked through the sub-etha. Such a system
was fail-safe in all circumstances other than total feedback malfunction,
which was unheard of.
He hurried over to the other prone figure, and discovered that exactly the
same impossible thing had happened to him, presumably simultaneously.
He called the others over to look. They came, shared his astonishment,
but not his curiosity.
”Let’s get shot out of this hole,” said Zaphod. ”If whatever I’m supposed
to be looking for is here, I don’t want it.” He grabbed the second Kill-O-Zap
gun, blasted a perfectly harmless accounting computer and rushed out into
the corridor, followed by the others. He very nearly blasted hell out of an
aircar that stood waiting for them a few yards away. The aircar was empty,
but Arthur recognized it as belonging to Slartibartfast.
It had a note from him pinned to part of its sparse instrument panel. The
note had an arrow drawn on it, pointing at one of the controls.
It said, This is probably the best button to press.
140
Chapter 34
The aircar rocketed them at speeds in excess of R17 through the steel tunnels
that lead out onto the appalling surface of the planet which was now in the
grip of yet another drear morning twilight. Ghastly grey lights congealed on
the land.
R is a velocity measure, defined as a reasonable speed of travel that
is consistent with health, mental wellbeing and not being more than say
five minutes late. It is therefore clearly an almost infinitely variable figure
according to circumstances, since the first two factors vary not only with
speed taken as an absolute, but also with awareness of the third factor. Unless
handled with tranquility this equation can result in considerable stress, ulcers
and even death.
R17 is not a fixed velocity, but it is clearly far too fast.
The aircar flung itself through the air at R17 and above, deposited them
next to the Heart of Gold which stood starkly on the frozen ground like
a bleached bone, and then precipitately hurled itself back in the direction
whence they had come, presumably on important business of its own.
Shivering, the four of them stood and looked at the ship.
Beside it stood another one.
It was the Blagulon Kappa policecraft, a bulbous sharklike affair, slate
green in colour and smothered with black stencilled letters of varying degrees
of size and unfriendliness. The letters informed anyone who cared to read
them as to where the ship was from, what section of the police it was assigned
to, and where the power feeds should be connected.
It seemed somehow unnaturally dark and silent, even for a ship whose twoman
crew was at that moment lying asphyxicated in a smoke-filled chamber
several miles beneath the ground. It is one of those curious things that is
impossible to explain or define, but one can sense when a ship is completely
dead.
Ford could sense it and found it most mysterious – a ship and two policemen
seemed to have gone spontaneously dead. In his experience the Universe
141
simply didn’t work like that.
The other three could sense it too, but they could sense the bitter cold
even more and hurried back into the Heart of Gold suffering from an acute
attack of no curiosity.
Ford stayed, and went to examine the Blagulon ship. As he walked, he
nearly tripped over an inert steel figure lying face down in the cold dust.
”Marvin!” he exclaimed. ”What are you doing?”
”Don’t feel you have to take any notice of me, please,” came a muffled
drone.
”But how are you, metalman?” said Ford.
”Very depressed.”
”What’s up?”
”I don’t know,” said Marvin, ”I’ve never been there.”
”Why,” said Ford squatting down beside him and shivering, ”are you
lying face down in the dust?”
”It’s a very effective way of being wretched,” said Marvin. ”Don’t pretend
you want to talk to me, I know you hate me.”
”No I don’t.”
”Yes you do, everybody does. It’s part of the shape of the Universe. I
only have to talk to somebody and they begin to hate me. Even robots hate
me. If you just ignore me I expect I shall probably go away.”
He jacked himself up to his feet and stood resolutely facing the opposite
direction.
”That ship hated me,” he said dejectedly, indicating the policecraft.
”That ship?” said Ford in sudden excitement. ”What happened to it?
Do you know?”
”It hated me because I talked to it.”
”You talked to it?” exclaimed Ford. ”What do you mean you talked to
it?”
”Simple. I got very bored and depressed, so I went and plugged myself in
to its external computer feed. I talked to the computer at great length and
explained my view of the Universe to it,” said Marvin.
”And what happened?” pressed Ford.
”It committed suicide,” said Marvin and stalked off back to the Heart of
Gold.
142
Chapter 35
That night, as the Heart of Gold was busy putting a few light years between
itself and the Horsehead Nebula, Zaphod lounged under the small palm tree
on the bridge trying to bang his brain into shape with massive Pan Galactic
Gargle Blasters; Ford and Trillian sat in a corner discussing life and matters
arising from it; and Arthur took to his bed to flip through Ford’s copy of The
Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy. Since he was going to live in the place, he
reasoned, he’d better start finding out something about it.
He came across this entry.
It said: ’The History of every major Galactic Civilization tends to pass
through three distinct and recognizable phases, those of Survival, Inquiry and
Sophistication, otherwise known as the How, Why and Where phases.
”For instance, the first phase is characterized by the question How can
we eat? the second by the question Why do we eat? and the third by the
question Where shall we have lunch?”
He got no further before the ship’s intercom buzzed into life.
”Hey Earthman? You hungry kid?” said Zaphod’s voice.
”Er, well yes, a little peckish I suppose,” said Arthur.
”Okay, baby, hold tight,” said Zaphod. ”We’ll take in a quick bite at the
Restaurant at the End of the Universe.”
143

It is with something more than the natural 
deference of a tyro at the loveliest, most arduous and 
perverse of the arts in the presence of a master- 
craftsman that I lay this book before you. You know 
(none better) the joys of the clean hearth and the 
rigour of the game. But perhaps I may be permitted 
to take this opportunity of explaining to you, a little 
more fully than I have hitherto hinted, something of 
the disabilities under which I have laboured to produce 
the pages now open beneath your hand. 

As you know, I have spent some ten years of my 
creative life in the meaningless and vulgar bustle of 
newspaper oflBices. God alone knows what the effect 
has been on my output of pure literature. I dare 
not think too much about it — even now. There are 
some things (like first love and one’s first reviews) at 
which a woman in her middle years does not care to 
look too closely. 

The effect of these locust years on my style (if I may 
lay claim to that lovely quality in the presence of a 
writer whose grave and lucid prose has permanently 
enriched our literature) has been perhaps even more 
serious. 



The life of the journalist is poor, nasty, brutish and 
short. So is his style. You, who are so adept at the 
lovely polishing of every grave and lucent phrase, will 
realise the magnitude of the task which confronted me 
when I found, after spending ten years as a journalist, 
learning to say exactly what I meant in short sentences, 
that I must leam, if I was to achieve literature and 
favourable reviews, to write as though I were not 
quite sure about what I meant but was jolly well 
going to say something all the same in sentences as 
long as possible. 

Far be it from me to pretend that the following 
pages achieve what fibrst burned in my mind with pure 
lambency ten years ago- Which of us does ? But the 
thing’s done ! Ecco I £ finito ! And such as it is, 
and for what it is worth, it is yours. 

You see, Tony, I have a debt to pay. Your books 
have been something more to me, in the last ten years, 
them books. They have been springs of refreshment, 
loafings for the soul, eyes in the dark. They have 
given me (in the midst of the vulgar and meaningless 
bustle of newspaper offices) joy. It is just possible 
that it was not quite the kind of joy you intended them 
to give, for which of us is infallible ? But it was joy 
all light. 

I must confess, too, that I have more than once 
hesitated before the thought of trying to repay some 
fraction of my debt to you by offering you a book that 
was meant to be . . . funny. 

For your own books are not . . . funny. They are 
records of intense spiritual struggles, staged in the wild 
setting of mere, berg or fen. Your characters are 


X 



ageless and elemental beings, tossed like straws on the 
seas of passion. You paint Nature at her rawest, in 
man and in landscapes. The only beauty that lights 
your pages is the grave peace of fulfilled passion, and 
the ripe humour that lies over your minor characters 
like a mellow light. You can paint everyday domestic 
tragedies (are not the entire first hxmdred pages of “ The 
Fulfilment of Martin Hoare ” a masterly analysis of a 
bUious attack ?) as vividly as you paint soul cataclysms. 
Shall I ever forget Mattie Elginbrod? I shall not. 
Your books are more like thunderstorms than books. 
I can only say, in all simplicity, “ Thank you, Tony.” 

But funny. . . . No. 

However, I am sure you are big enough, in every 
sense of the word, to forgive my book its imperfections. 

And it is only because I have in mind all those 
thousands of persons not unlike myself, who work in 
the vulgar and meaningless bustle of ofiBces, shops and 
homes, and who are not always sure whether a sentence 
is Literature or whether it is just sheer flapdoodle, that 
I have adopted the method perfected by the late Herr 
Baedeker, and firmly marked what I consider the 
finer passages with one, two or three stars. In such a 
manner did the good man deal with cathedrals, hotels 
and paintings by men of genius. There seems no 
reason why it should not be applied to passages in 
novels. 

It ought to help the reviewers, too. 

Talking of men of genius, what a constellation bums 
in our midst at the moment ! Even to a tyro as 
unpractised as myself, who has spent the best creative 
years of her life in the vulgar and meaningless bustle 

xi 



of newspaper offices, there is some consolation, some 
sudden exaltation into a serener and more ardent air, 
in subscribing herself. 

Ever, my dear Tony, 

Your grateful debtor, 

Stella Gibbons. 


Watford. 

Lyons’ Corner House. 
Boulogne-sur-Mer. 

January 1931— February 1932. 



CHAPTER I 


T he education bestowed on Flora Poste by her 
parents had been expensive, athletic and pro- 
longed ; and when they died within a few weeks of one 
another during the annual epidemic of the influenza 
or Spanish Plague which occurred in her twentieth 
year, she was discovered to possess every art and grace 
save that of earning her own living. 

Her father had always been spoken of as a wealthy 
man, but on his death his executors were disconcerted 
to find him a poor one. After death duties had been 
paid and the demands of creditors satisfied, his child 
was left with an income of one hundred pounds a year, 
and no property. 

Flora inherited, however, from her father a strong 
will and from her mother a slender ankle. The one 
had not been impaired by always having her own way 
nor the other by the violent athletic sports in which 
she had been compelled to take part, but she reahsed 
that neither was adequate as an equipment for earning 
her keep. 

She decided, therefore, to stay with a friend, a 
Mrs, Smiling, at her house in Lambeth until she could 
decide where to bestow herself and her hundred pounds 
a year. 

The death of her parents did not cause Flora much 
grief, for she had barely known them. They were 



addicted to travel, and spent only a month or so of 
each year in England. Flora, from her tenth year, 
had passed her school holidays at the house of Mrs. 
S miling ’s mother ; and when Mrs. Smiling married. 
Flora spent them at her friend’s house instead. It 
was therefore with the feelings of one who returns 
home that she entered the precincts of Lambeth upon 
a glopmy afternoon in February, a fortnight after her 
father’s frneral. 

Mrs. Smiling was forttmate in that she had inherited 
house property in Lambeth before the rents in that 
district soared to ludicrous heights, following the tide 
of fashion as it swung away from Mayfair to the other 
side of the river, and the stone parapets bordering the 
Thames became, as a consequence, the sauntering 
ground of Argentinian women and their bull-terriers. 
Her husband (she was a widow) had owned three 
houses in Lambeth which he had bequeathed to her. 
One, in Mouse Place, was the pleasantest of the three, 
and faced with its shell faiJight the changing Thames ; 
here Mrs. Smiling lived, while of the other two, one 
had been pulled down and a garage perpetrated upon 
its site, and the third, which was too small and incon- 
venient for any other purpose, had been made into 
the Old Diplomacy Club. 

The white porcelain geraniums which hung in 
baskets from the little iron balconies of i. Mouse Place, 
did much to cheer Flora’s spirits as her taxi stopped 
before its door. 

Turning, from the taxi to the house, she saw that the 
door had already been opened by Mrs. Smiling’s 
butler, Sneller, who was looking down upon her with 

2 



dim approval. He was, she reflected, almost rudely 
like a tortoise ; and she was glad her friend kept none 
as pets or they might have suspected mockery. 

Mrs. Smiling was awaiting her in the drawing-room 
overlooking the river. She was a small Irishwoman of 
twenty-six years, with a fair complexion, large grey 
eyes and a little crooked nose. She had two interests 
in life. One was the imposing of reason and modera- 
tion into the bosoms of some fifteen gentlemen of birth 
and fortune who were madly in love with her, and who 
had flown to such remote places as the Jhonsong La, 
Lake M’Luba-M’Luba and the Kwanhattons because 
of her refusal to marry them. She wrote to them all 
once a week, and they (as her friends knew to their 
cost, for she was for ever reading aloud'^ long, boring 
bits from their letters) wrote to her. 

These gentlemen, because of the hard work they 
did in savage foreign parts and of their devotion to 
Mrs. Smiling, were known collectively as ‘‘ Mary’s 
Pioneers-O,” a quotation firom the spirited poem by 
Walt Whitman. 

Mrs. Smiling’s second interest was her collection of 
brassieres, and her search for a perfect one. She was 
reputed to have the largest and finest collection of 
these garments in the world. It was hoped that on 
her death it would be left to the nation. 

She was an authority on the cut, fit, colour, con- 
struction and proper functioning of brassieres ; and 
her friends had learned that her interest, even in 
moments of extreme emotional or physical distress, 
could be aroused and her composure restored by the 
hasty utterance of the phrase : 

3 



“ I saw a brassiere to-day, Mary, that would have 
interested you. . . 

Mrs. Smiling’s character was firm and her tastes 
civilised. Her method of dealing with wayward 
human nature when it insisted on obtruding its gross- 
ness upon her scheme of life was short and effective ; 
she pretended things were not so : and usually, after 
a time, they were not. Christian Science is perhaps 
a larger organisation, but seldom so successful. 

“ Of course, if you encourage people to think they’re 
messy, they will be messy,” was one of Mrs. Smiling’s 
favourite maxims. Another was, “ JVbnsense, Flora. 
You imagine things.” 

Yet Mrs. Smiling herself was not without the softer 
graces of imagination. 

“ Well, darling,” said Mrs. Smiling — and Flora, 
who was tall, bent and kissed her cheek — “ will you 
have tea or a cocktail ? ” 

Flora said that she would have tea. She folded her 
gloves and put her coat over the back of a chair, and 
took the tea and a ciimamon wafer. 

“ Was the funeral awful ? ” enquired Mis. Smiling. 
She knew that Mr. Poste, that large man who had 
been serious about games and contemptuous of the 
arts, was not regretted by his child. Nor was Mrs. 
Poste, who had wished people to live beautiful lives 
and yet be ladies and gentlemen. 

Flora replied that it had been horrid. She added 
that she was bound to say all the older relatives seemed 
to have enjoyed it no end. 

“ Did any of them ask you to go and live with 
them? I meant to warn you about that. Relatives 

4 



are always wanting you to go and live with them^” 
said Mrs. Smiling. 

No. Remember, Mary, I have only a hundred 
pounds a year now ; and I cannot play Bridge.” 

Bridge ? What is that ? ” enquired Mrs. Smiling, 
glancing vaguely out of the window at the river. 
“ What curious ways people have of passing their time, 
to be sure. I think you are very fortunate, darling, 
to have got through all those dreadful years at school 
and college, where you had to play all those games, 
without getting to like them yourself. How did you 
manage it ? ” 

Flora considered. 

“ Well — ^first of all, I used to stand quite still and 
stare at the trees and not think about anything. 
There were usually some trees about, for most games, 
you know, are played at in the open air, and even in 
the winter the trees are still there. But I found that 
people would bump into me, so I had to give up standing 
still, and run, like the others. I always ran after the 
ball because, after all, Mary, the ball is important in 
a game, isn’t it? until I found they didn’t like me 
doing that, because I never got near it or hit it or did 
whatever you are supposed to do to it. 

“ So then I ran away from it instead, but they didn’t 
seem to like that cither, because apparently people in 
the audience wondered what I was doing out on the 
edge of a field all by myself, and running away from 
the ball whenever I saw it coming near me. 

“ And then a whole lot of them got at me one 
day after one of the games was over, and told me I 
was no good. And the Games Mistress seemed quite 

5 


2 



worried and asked me if I really didn’t care about 
lacrosse (that was the name of the game), and I said 
no, I was afraid I didn’t, really ; and she said it was a 
pity, because my father was so ‘ keen,’ and what did 
I care about ? 

“ So I said, well, I was not quite sure, but on the 
whole I thought I liked having everything very tidy 
and calm all round me, and not being bothered to do 
things, and laughing at the kind of joke other people 
didn’t think at all ftmny, and going for country walks, 
and not being asked to express opinions about things 
(like love, and isn’t so-and-so peculiar ?). So then she 
said, oh, well, didn’t I think I could ^ to be a little 
less slack, becaixse of Father, and I said no, I was 
afraid I couldn’t ; and after that she left me alone. 
But all the others stiU said I was no good” 

Mrs. S miling nodded her approval, but she told 
Flora that she talked too much. She added : 

“ Now about this going to live with someone. Of 
course, you can stay here as long as you like, darling ; 
but I suppose you will want to take up some kind of 
work some time, won’t you, and earn enough to have 
a flat of your own ? ” 

“ What kind of work ? ” asked Flora, sitting upright 
and graceful in her chair. 

“ Well — organizing work, like I used to do.” (For 
Mrs. Smiling had been an organizer for the L.G.G. 
before she married “ Diamond ” Tod S milin g, the 
racketeer.) “ Do not ask me what that is, exactly, 
for I’ve forgotten. It is so long since I did any. But 
I am sure you could do it. Or you might do journal- 
ism. Or book-keeping. Or bee-keeping.” 

6 



Flora shook her head. 

“ I’m afraid I couldn’t do £iny of those things, 
Mary.” 

“ Well . . . what then, darling ? Now, Flora, 
don’t ht feeble. You know perfectly well that you will 
be mirerable if you haven’t got a job, when all your 
friends have. Besides, a hundred poxmds a year won’t 
even keep you in stockings and fans. What will you 
live on ? ” 

“ My relatives,” replied Flora. 

Mrs. Smiling gave her a shocked glance of enquiry, 
for, though civilised in her tastes, she was a strong- 
minded and moral woman. 

“ Yes, Mary,” repeated Flora firmly, “ I am only 
nineteen, but I have already observed that, whereas 
there still lingers some absurd prejudice against living 
on one’s friends, no limits are set, either by society or 
by one’s own conscience, to the amount one may 
impose upon one’s relatives. 

“ Now I am peculiarly (I think if you could see some 
of them you would agree that that is the word) rich 
in relatives, on both sides of the family. There is a 
bachelor cousin of Father’s in Scotland. There is a 
sister of Mother’s at Worthing (as though that were 
not enough, she breeds dogs). A female cousin of 
Mother’s lives in Kensington. And there are also 
some distant cousins, connections of Mother’s, I believe, 
who live in Sussex. . . .” 

“ Sussex ...” mused Mrs. Smiling. " I don’t 
much like the sound of that. Do they live on a 
decaying farm ? ” 

“ I am afraid they do,” confessed Flora, reluctantly. 

7 



“ However, I need not try them unless everything else 
fails. I propose to send a letter to the relatives I have 
mentioned, explaining the situation and asking them 
if they are willing to give me a home in exchange for 
my beautiful eyes and a hundred pounds a year.” 

“ Flora, how insane ! ” cried Mrs. Smiling ; “ you 
must be mad. Why, you would die after the first week. 
You know that neither of us have ever been able to 
abide relatives. You must stay here with me, and 
learn typing and shorthand, and then you can be 
somebody’s secretary and have a nice little flat of your 
own, and we can have lovely parties . . .” 

“ Mary, you know I hate parties. My idea of hell 
is a very large party in a cold room where everybody 
has to play hockey properly. But you put me off 
what I was going to say. When I have found a 
relative who is willing to have me, I shall take him or 
her in hand, and alter his or her character and mode of 
living to suit my own taste. Then, when it pleases 
me, I shall marry.” 

“ Who, pray ? ” demanded IMrs. Smiling, rudely ; 
she was much perturbed. 

“ Somebody whom I shall choose. I have definite 
ideas about marriage, as you know. I have always 
liked the soimd of the phrase ‘ a marriage has been 
arranged.’ And so it should be arranged ! Is it not 
the most important step a mortal creature can take ? 
I prefer the idea of aixcingement to that other state- 
ment, that marriages are made in Heaven. My 
marriage, Mary,, will be arranged into Heaven.” 

Mrs. Smiling shuddered at the compelling, the 
almost Gdlic, cynicism of Flora’s speech. For Mrs. 

8 



Smiling believed that marriages should arise naturally 
from the union of two loving natures, and that they 
shorild take place in churches, with all the usual 
paraphernalia and hugaboo ; and so had her own 
marriage arisen and been celebrated. 

“ But what I wanted to ask you was this,” continued 
Flora. “ Do you think a circular letter to all these 
relatives would be a good idea? Would it impress 
them with my eflficiency ? ” 

“ No,” returned Mrs. Smiling, coldly, “ I do not 
think it would. It would be too putting-off. You 
must write to them, of course (making it an entirely 
different letter each time. Flora) expl ainin g the situation 
— ^that is, if you really are going to be so insane as to go 
on with the idea.” 

“ Don’t fuss, Mary. I will write the letters to- 
morrow, before lunch. I would write them to-night, 
only I think we ought to dine out — don’t you? — ^to 
celebrate the inauguration of my career as a parasite. 
I have ten pounds, and I will take you to the New 
River Club — angelic place ! ” 

“ Don’t be silly. You know perfectly well we must 
have some men.” 

“ Then you can find them. Are any of the 
Pioneers-O home on leave ? ” 

Mrs. Smiling’s face sissumed that brooding and 
maternal look which was associated in the minds of 
her firiends with thoughts of the Pioneers-O. 

“ Bikki is,” she said. (All the Pioneers-O had 
short, brusque nicknames rather like the cries of 
strange animals, but this was quite natural, for they 
all came from places full of strange animals.) 

9 



“And your second cousin, Charles Fairford, is in 
town,” continued Mrs. Smiling. “ The tall, serious, 
dark one.” 

“ He will do,” said Flora, with approval. “ He has 
such a funny httle nose.” 

Accordingly, about twenty minutes to nine that 
night Mrs. Smiling’s car drove away from Mouse 
Place carrying herself and Flora in white dresses, with 
absurd httle wreaths of flowers at the side of their 
heads ; and opposite sat Bikki, and Charles, whom 
Flora had only met half a dozen times before. 

Bikki, who had a shocking stammer, talked a great 
deal, as people with stammers always love to do. He 
was plain and thirtyish, and home on leave from 
Kenya. He pleased them by corroborating all the 
awfid rumours they had heard about the place. 
Charles, who looked weU in tails, spoke hardly at all. 
Occasionally he gave a loud, deep, musical “ Ha ! 
Ha ! ” when amused at anything. He was twenty- 
three, and was to be a parson. He stared out of the 
window most of the time, and hardly looked at 
Flora. 

“ I don’t think Sneller approves of this excursion,” 
observed Mrs. Smiling, as they drove away. “ He 
looked all dim and concerned. Did you notice ? ” 

“ He approves of me, because I look serious,” said 
Flora. “ A strsdght nose is a great help if one wishes 
to look serious.” 

“ I do not wish to look serious,” said Mrs. S miling , 
coldly. “ There will be time enough to do that when 
I have to come and rescue you from some impossible 
relations living in some ungetatable place because you 

10 



can’t bear it any longer. Have you told Charles 
about it ? ” 

Good heavens, no ! Charles is a relation. He 
might think I wanted to go and live with him and 
Cousin Helen in Hertfordshire, and was angling for 
an invitation.” 

Well, you could if you liked,” said Charles, turning 
from his study of the glittering streets gliding past the 
windows. There is a swing in the garden and 
tobacco flowers in the summer, and probably Mother 
and I would quite like it if you did.” 

“ Don’t be silly,” said Mrs. Smiling. Look — 
here we are. Did you get a table near the river, 
Bikki?” 

Bikki had managed to do that ; and when they were 
seated facing the flowers and lights on their table they 
could look down through the glass floor at the moving 
river, and watch it between their slippers, as they 
danced. Through the glass walls they could see the 
barges going past, bearing their romantic red and 
green lights. Outside it had begun to rain, and the 
glass roof was soon trickling with silver. 

In the course of supper Flora told Charles of her 
plan. He was silent at first ; and she thought he was 
shocked. For though Charles had not a straight nose, 
it might have been written of him, as Shelley wrote of 
himself in the Preface to ‘‘Julian and Maddalo,” 
“Julian is rather serious.” 

But at last he said, looking amused : 

“ Well, if you get very sick of it, wherever you are, 
’phone me and I will come and rescue you in my 
’plane.” 


II 



“ Have you a ’plane, Charles ? I don’t think an 
embryo parson should have a ’plane. What breed 
is it ? ” 

“ A Twin Belisha Bat. Its name is Speed Cop II.” 

“But really, Charles, do you think a parson ought 
to have a ’plane ? ” continued Flora, who was in a 
foolish mood. 

“ What has that to do with it ? ” said Charles, 
calmly. “ Anyway, you let me know and I will come 
along.” 

Flora promised that she would, for she liked Charles, 
and then they danced together ; and all four sat a long 
time over coffee ; and then it was three o’clock and 
they thought it time to go home. 

Charles put Flora into her green coat, and Bikki 
put Mrs. Smiling into her black one, and soon they 
were driving home through the rainy streets of Lam- 
beth, where every house had windows alight with 
rose, orange or gold, behind which parties were going 
on, card or musical or merely frivolous ; and the lit 
shop windows displayed a single frock or a Tang horse 
to the rain. 

“ There’s the Old Diplomacy,” said Mrs. Smiling, 
interestedly, as they passed that ludicrous box, with 
baskets of metal flowers tipping off the narrow sills of 
its windows, and music coming from its upper rooms. 
“ How glad I am that poor Tod left it to me. It does 
bring in such a lot of money.” For Mrs. Smiling, like 
all people who have been disagreeably poor and have 
become deliciously rich, had never grown used to her 
money, and was always mentally turning it over in 
her hands and positively revelling in the thought of 

12 



what a lot of it she had. And this delighted all her 
friends, who looked on with approval, just as they 
would have looked upon a nice child with a toy. 

Charles and Bikki said good-night at the door 
because Mrs. Smilipig was too afraid of SneUer to ask 
them in for a last cocktail, and Flora muttered that it 
was absurd ; but all the same she felt rather subdued 
as the two wandered to bed up the narrow, black- 
carpeted staircase. 

“ To-morrow I will write my letters,” said Flora, 
yawning, with one hand on the slender white baluster. 
“ Good-night, Mary.” 

Mrs. Smiling said “ Good-night, darling.” She 
added that to-morrow Flora would have thought better 
of it. 


13 



CHAPTER 11 


N evertheless, Flora wrote her letters the 
next morning. Mrs. Smiling did not help her, 
because she had gone down into the slums of Mayfair 
on the track of a new kind of brassiere which she had 
noticed in a Jew-shop while driving past in her car. 
Besides, she disapproved so heartily of Flora’s plan 
that she would have scorned to assist in the concoction 
of a single oily sentence. 

“ I think it’s degrading of you. Flora,” cried Mrs. 
Smiling at breakfast. “ Do you truly mean that you 
don’t ever want to work at anything ? ” 

Her friend replied after some thought : 

“ Well, when I am fifty-three or so I would like to 
write a novel as good as ‘ Persuasion,’ but with a 
modern setting, of course. For the next thirty years 
or so I shall be collecting material for it. If anyone 
asks me what I work at, I shall say, ‘ Collecting 
material.’ No one can object to that. Besides, so I 
shall be.” 

Mrs. Smiling drank some coffee in silent disap- 
proval. 

“ If you ask me,” continued Flora, “ I think I have 
much in common with Miss Austen. She liked every- 
thing to be tidy and pleasant and comfortable about 
her, and so do I. You see, Mary ” — and here Flora 
began to grow earnest and to wave one finger about — 
14 



“ unless everything is tidy and pleasant and comfortable 
all about one, people cannot even begin to enjoy life. 
I cannot endure messes.” 

“ Oh, neither can I,“ cried Mrs. Smiling, with 
fervour. “ If there is one thing I do detest it is a mess. 
And I do think jOK are going to be messy, if you go and 
live with a lot of obscure rdations.” 

“ Well, my naind is made up, so there is no purpose 
in arguing,” said Flora. “ After all, if I find I caimot 
abide Scotland or South Kensington or Sussex,' I can 
always come back to London and gracefully give in, 
and learn to work, as you suggest. But I am not 
anxious to do that, because I am sure it would be 
more amusing to go and stay with some of these dire 
relatives. Besides, there is sure to be a lot of material 
I can collect for my novel ; and perhaps one or two 
of the relations will have messes or miseries in their 
domestic circle which I can clear up.” 

“ You have the most revolting Florence Nightingale 
complex,” said Mrs. Smiling. 

“ It is not that at all, and well you know it. On 
the whole, I dislike my feUow-beings ; I find them so 
difficult to understand. But I have a tidy mind, and 
untidy lives irritate me. Also, they are tmcivilised.” 

The introduction of this word closed, as usual, their 
argument, for the fidends were united in their dislike 
of what they termed “ xmcivilised behaviour ” : a 
vague phrase, which was nevertheless defined in their 
two minds with great precision, to their mutual 
satisfaction. 

Mrs. Smil in g then went away, her face lit by diat 
remote expression which characterises the collector 

15 



when upon the traU of a specimen ; and Flora began 
on her letters. 

The oleaginous sentences flowed easily from her pen 
during the next hour, for she had a great gift of the 
gab, and took a pride in varying the style in which 
each letter was written to suit the nature of its recipient. 

That addressed to the aunt at Worthing was offen- 
sively jolly, yet tempered by a certain inarticulate 
Public School grief for her bereavement. The one to 
the bachelor uncle in Scotland was sweetly girlish, and 
just a wee bit arch ; it hinted that she was only a poor 
little orphan. She wrote to the cousin in South 
Kensington a distant, dignified epistle, grieved yet 
business-like. 

It was while she was pondering over the best style 
in which to address the unknown and distant relatives 
in Sussex that she was struck by the singularity of their 
address : 

Mrs. Judith Starkadder, 

Cold Comfort Farm, 

Howling, Sussex. 

But she reminded herself that Sussex, when all was 
said and done, was not quite like other counties, and 
that when one observed that these people lived on a 
farm in Sussex, the address weis no longer remarkable. 
For things seemed to go wrong in the country more 
easily and more frequently, somehow, than they did 
in Town, and such a tendency must naturally reflect 
itself in local nomenclature. 

Yet she could not decide in what way to address 
them, so she ended (for by now it was nearly one 

i6 



o’clock and she was somewhat exhausted) by sending 
a straightforward letter explaining her position, and 
requesting an early reply as her plans were so un- 
settled, and she was anxious to know what would 
happen to her. 

Mrs. Smiling returned to Mouse Place at a quarter 
after the hour, and found her friend sitting back in an 
armchair with her eyes shut and the four letters, ready 
for the post, lying in her lap. She looked rather 
green. 

“ Flora ! What is the matter ? Do you feel sick ? 
Is it your tummy again ? ” cried Mk. Smihng, in 
alarm. 

“ No. That is, not physically sick. Only rather 
nauseated by the way I have achieved these letters. 
Really, Mary ” — she sat upright, revived by her own 
words — “ it is rather fiightening to be able to write 
so revoltingly, yet so successfully. AU these letters are 
works of art, except, perhaps, the last. They are 
positively oily." 

“This afternoon,” observed Mrs. Smiling, leading 
the way to lunch, “ I think we will go to a flick. Give 
Sneller those ; he will post them for you.” 

“ No. ... I think I wiU post them myself,” said 
Flora, jealously. “Did you get the brassiere, darl- 
ing?” 

A shadow fell upon Mrs. Smiling’s face. 

“ No. It was no use to me. It was just a variation 
on the ‘ Venus ’ design made by Waber Brothers in 
1938 ; it had three elastic sections in front, instead of 
two, as I hoped, and I have it already in my collection. 
I only saw it firom the car as I drove past, you know ; 

17 



I was misled by the way it was folded as it himg in the 
window. The third section was folded back, so that 
it looked as though there were only two.” 

“ And would that have made it more rare ? ” 

“But, naturally. Flora. Two-section brassieres are 
extremely rare. I intended to buy it — but, of course, it 
was useless.” 

“ Never mind, my dove. Look — ^nice hock. Drink 
it up and you’ll feel more cheerful.” 

That afternoon, before they went to the Rhodopis, the 
great cinema in Westminster, Flora posted her letters. 

When the morning of the second day brought no 
reply to any of the letters, Mrs. Smiling expressed the 
hope that none of the relatives were going to answer. 
She said : 

“ And I only pray that if any of them do answer, it 
won’t be those people in Sussex. I think the names 
are awful : too ageing and putting-off.” 

Flora agreed that the names were certainly not 
propitious. 

“ I think if I find that I have any third cousins 
living at Cold Comfort Farm (young ones, you know, 
children of Cousin Judith) who are named Seth, or 
Reuben, I shall decide not to go.” 

“Why?” 

“ Oh, because highly-sexed yoimg men living on 
farms are always called Seth or Reuben, and it would 
be such a nuisance. And my cousin’s name, remem- 
ber, is Judith. That in itself is most ominous. Her 
husband is almost certain to be called Amos ; and if 
he is, it will be a typical farm, and you know what 
they are like.” 

i8 



Mrs. S milin g said sombrely : 

“ I hope there will be a bathroom.” 

“ Nonsense, Mary ! ” cried Flora, paling. “ Of 
course there will be a bathroom. Even in Sussex — ^it 
would be too much . . 

“ Well, we shall see,” said her friend. “ And mind 
you wire me (if you do hear from them and do decide 
to go there) if either of your cousins is called Seth or 
Reuben, or if you want any extra boots or anything. 
There are sure to be masses of mud.” 

Flora said that she would. 


M!rs. Smiling’s hopes were dashed. On the third 
morning, which was a Friday, four letters came to 
Mouse Place for Flora, including one in the cheapest 
kind of yellow envelope addressed in so barbed and 
illiterate a hand that the postman had some difficulty 
in deciphering it. The envelope was also dirty. The 
postmark was ‘ Howling.’ 

“ There you are, you see ! ” said Mrs. Smiling, when 
Flora showed her this treasure at breakfast. “ How 
revolting ! ” 

“ Well, wait now while I read the others and we will 
save this one till the last. Do be quiet. I want to 
see what Aunt Gwen has to say.” 

Aunt Gwen, after sympathising with Flora in her 
sorrow, and remindmg her that we must keep a stiff 
upper Up and play the game (“ Always these games ! ” 
muttered Flora), said that she would be deUghted to 
have her niece. Flora would be coming into a real 
“ homey ” atmosphere, with plenty of fun. She would 

19 



not mind giving a hand with the dogs sometimes? 
The air of Worthing was bracing, and there were some 
jolly young people living next door. “ Rosedale ” 
was always full of people, and Flora would never have 
time to be lonely. Peggy, who was so keen ou her 
Guiding, would love to share her bedroom with Flora. 

Shuddering slightly, Flora passed the letter to Mrs. 
Smiling ; but that upright woman failed her by saying 
stoutly, after reading it, “ Well, I think it’s a very 
kind letter. You couldn’t ask for anything kinder. 
After all, you didn’t think any of these people would 
offer you the kind of home you want to live in, did 
you ? ” 

“ I cannot share a bedroom,” said Flora, “ so that 
disposes of Aunt Gwen. This one is from Mr. Mc- 
Knag, Father’s cousin in Perthshire.” 

Mr. McKnag had been shocked by Flora’s letter ; 
so shocked that his old trouble had returned, and he 
had been in bed with it for the last two days. This 
explained, and he trusted that it excused, his delay in 
replying to her suggestion. He would, of course, be 
ddighted to shelter Flora under his roof for as long as 
she cared to fold the white wings of her girlhood there 
(“ The old lamb j ” crowed Flora and Mrs. Smiling), 
but he feared it would be a little dull for Flora, with 
no company save that of himself— and he was often in 
bed with his old trouble — ^his man. Hoots, and the 
housekeeper, who was elderly and somewhat deaf. 
The house was seven miles from the nearest village ; 
that, also, might be a disadvantage. On the other 
hand, if Flora was fond of birds, there was some most 
interesting bird-life to be observed in the marshes 


20 



which surrounded the house on three sides. He must 
end his letter now, he feared, as he felt his old trouble 
coming on again, and he was hers affectionately. 

Flora and Mrs. Smiling looked at one another, and 
shook their heads. 

“ There you are, you see,’^ said Mrs. Smiling, once 
more. ‘‘ They are all quite hopeless. You had much 
better stay here with me and learn how to work.’* 

But Flora was reading the third letter. Her mother’s 
cousin in South Kensington said that she would be very 
pleased to have Flora, only there was a little difficulty 
about the bedroom. Perhaps Flora would not mind 
using the large attic, which was now used as a meeting- 
room for the Orient-Star-in-the-West Society on 
Tuesdays, and for the Spiritist Investigators’ League 
on Fridays. She hoped that Flora was not a sceptic^ 
for manifestations sometimes occurred in the attic, 
and even a trace of scepticism in the atmosphere of 
the room spoiled the conditions, and prevented 
phenomena, the observations of which provided the 
Society with such valuable evidence in favour of 
Survival. Would Flora mind if the parrot kept his 
corner of the attic ? He had grown up in it, and at 
his age the shock of removal to another room might 
well prove fatal. 

Again, you see, it means sharing a bedroom,” 
said Flora. “ I do not object to the phenomena, but 
I do object to the parrot.” 

Do open the Howling one,” begged Mrs. Smiling, 
coming round to Flora’s side of the table. 

The last letter was written upon cheap lined paper, 
in a bold but illiterate hand : 


3 


21 



“ Dear Niece, 

‘‘ So you are after your rights at last. Well, I have 
expected to hear from Robert Posters child these last 
twenty years. 

“ Child, my man once did your father a great wrong. 
If you will come to us I will do my best to atone, but 
you must never ask me what for. My lips are sealed. 

“ We are not like other folk, maybe, but there have 
always been Starkadders at Cold Comfort, and we will 
do our best to welcome Robert Posters child. 

“ Child, child, if you come to this doomed house, 
what is to save you? Perhaps you may be able to 
help us when our hour comes. 

“ Yr, affec. Aunt, 

“ J, Starkadder.” 

Flora and Mrs. Smiling were much excited by this 
unusual epistle. They agreed that at least it had the 
negative merit of keeping silence upon the subject of 
sleeping arrangements. 

“And there is nothing about spying on birds in 
marshes or anything of that kind/^ said Mrs. Smiling. 
“ Oh, I do wonder what it was her man did to your 
father. Did you ever hear him say anything about a 
Mr. Starkadder ? ” 

“ Never. The Starkadders are only connected with 
us by marriage. This Judith is a daughter of Mother’s 
eldest sister, Ada Doom. So, you see, Judith is really 
my cousin, not my aunt. (I suppose she got muddled, 
and Fm sure I’m not surprised. The conditions under 
which she seems to live are probably conducive to 
muddle.) Well, Aunt Ada Doom was always rather 
a misery, and Mother couldn’t abide her because she 


22 



really loved the country and wore artistic hats. She 
ended by marrying a Sussex farmer. I suppose his 
name was Starkadder. Perhaps the farm belongs to 
Judith now, and her man was carried off in a tribal 
raid from a neighbouring village, and he had to take 
her name. Or perhaps she married a Starkadder. I 
wonder what has happened to Aunt Ada ? She would 
be quite old now ; she was fifteen years or so older 
than Mother.” 

“ Did you ever meet her ? ” 

“ No, I am happy to say. I have never met any of 
them. I found their adiress in a list in Mother’s 
diary ; she used to send them cards every Christmas.” 

“ Well,” said Mrs. Smiling, “ it sounds an appalling 
place, but in a different way from all the others. I 
mean, it does soimd interesting and appalling, while 
the others just sound appalling. If you have reaUy 
made up your mind to go, and if you wiU not stay 
here with me, I think you had best go to Sussex. You 
will soon grow tired of it, einyhow, and then, when 
you have tried it out and seen what it is really like to 
live with relatives, you will be all ready to come 
sensibly back here and learn how to work.” 

Flora thought it wiser to ignore the last part of this 
speech. 

“ Yes, I think I will go to Sussex, Mary. I am 
anxious to see what Cousin Judith means by ‘ rights.* 
Oh, do you think she means some money? Or 
perhaps a little house ? I should like that even better. 
Anyway, !¦ shall find out when I get there. And when 
do you think I had better go? To-day is Friday. 
Suppose I go down on Tuesday, after limch ? ” 

23 



“ Well, surely you needn’t go quite so soon. After 
all, there is no hurry. Probably you will not be there 
for longer than three days, so what does it matter 
when you go? You’re all eager about it, aren’t 
you ? ” 

“ I want my rights,” said Flora. “ Probably they 
are something too useless, like a lot of used-up mort- 
gages ; but if they are mine I am going to have them. 
Now you go away, Mary, because I am going to write 
to all these good souls and that will take time.” 

Flora had never been able to understand how rail- 
way time-tables worked, and she was too conceited to 
ask Mrs. Smiling or Snellcr about trains to Howling. 
So in her letter she asked her cousin Judith if she 
would just mention a few trains to Howling, and what 
time they got in, and who would meet her, and how. 

It was true that in novels dealing with agricultural 
life no one ever did anything so courteous as to meet a 
train, unless it was with the object of cutting-in under 
the noses of the other members of the family with some 
sordid or passionate end in view ; but that was no 
reason why the Starkadders, at least, should not begin 
to form civilised habits. So she wrote firmly : “ Do 
let me know what trains there are to Howling, and 
which ones you will meet,” and sealed her letter with 
a feeling of satisfaction. Sneller posted it in time for 
the cormtry collection that evening. 


Mrs. Smiling and Flora passed their time pleasantly 
during the next two days. 

In the morning they went ice-skating at the River 
24 



Park Ice Club with Charles and Bikki and another of 
the Pioneers-O whose nickname was Swooth and who 
came from Tanganyika. Though he and Bikki were 
extremely jealous of one another, and in consequence 
suffered horrid torments, Mrs. Smiling had them both 
so well in hand that they did not dare to look miserable 
but listened seriously while she told them, each in his 
turn, as they glided round the rink holding her hands, 
how distressed she was about yet a third of the 
Pioneers-O named Goofi, who was on his way to 
China and from whom she had not heard for ten 
days. 

“ I’m afraid the poor child may be worrying,” Mrs. 
S miling would say, vaguely, which was her way of 
indicating that Goofi had probably committed suicide, 
out of the depths of unrequited passion. And Bikki 
or Swooth, knowing from their own experience that 
this was indeed probably the case, would respond 
cheerfully, “ Oh, I shouldn’t fret, if I were you, Mary,” 
and feel happier at the thought of Goofi’s sufferings. 

In the afternoons the five went flying or to the Zoo 
or to hear music ; and in the evenings they went to 
parties ; that is, Mrs. Smiling and the two Pioneers-O 
went to parties, where yet more yotmg men fell in 
love with Mrs. Smiling, and Flora who, as we know, 
loathed parties, dined quietly with intelligent men : a 
way of passing the evening which she adored, because 
then she could show-off a lot and talk about herself. 

No letter had come by Monday evening at tea-time ; 
and Flora thought that her departure would probably 
have to be postponed until Wednesday. But the last 
post brought her a limp postcard ; and she was 

as 



reading it at half-pa^t ten on her return from one of 
the showing-off dinners when Mrs. Smiling came in, 
having wearied of a nasty party she had been attending. 

“ Does it give the times of the trains, my dove ? ” 
asked Mrs. Smiling. “ It is dirty, isn’t it ? I can’t 
help rather wishing it were possible for the Starkadders 
to send a clean letter.” 

“ It says nothing about trains,” replied Flora, with 
reserve. “ So far as I can make out, it appears to be 
some verses, with which I must confess I am not 
familiar, from the Old Testament. There is also a 
repetition of the assurance that there have always been 
Starkadders at Cold Comfort, though why it should 
be necessary to impress this upon me I am at a loss to 
imagine.” 

** Oh, do not say it is signed Seth or Reuben,” cried 
Mrs. Smiling, fearfully. 

“ It is not signed at all. I gather that it is from 
some member of the family who does not welcome the 
prospect of my visit. I can distinguish a reference, 
among other things, to vipers. I must say that I 
think it would have been more to the point to give a 
list of the trains ; but I suppose it is a little illogical 
to expect such attention to petty details from a doomed 
family living in Sussex. Well, Mary, I shall go down 
to-morrow, after lunch, as I planned. I will wire 
them in the morning to say I am coming.” 

“ Shall you fly ? ” 

“ No. There is no landing-stage nearer than 
Brighton. Besides, I must save money. You and 
SneUer can work out a route for me ; you will enjoy 
fussing over that.” 


26 



“ Of course, darling,” said Mrs. Smiling, who was 
by now beginning to feel a little unhappy at the 
prospect of losing her friend. “ But I wish you would 
not go.” 

Flora put the postcard in the fire ; her determination 
remained unmoved. 

The next morning Mrs. Smiling looked up trains to 
Howling, while Flora superintended the packing of her 
trunks by Riante, Mrs. Smiling’s maid. 

Even Mrs. Smiling could not find much comfort in 
the time-table. It seemed to her even more confused 
than usual. Indeed, since the aerial routes and the 
well-organised road routes had appropriated three- 
quarters of the passengers who used to make their 
journeys by train, the remaining railway companies 
had fallen into a settled melancholy ; an idle and 
repining despair invaded their literature, and its 
influence was noticeable even in their time-tables. 

There was a train which left London Bridge at half- 
past one for Howling. It was a slow train. It 
reached Godmere at three o’clock. At Godmere the 
traveller changed into another train. It was a slow 
train. It reached Beershom at six o’clock. At 
Beershom this train stopped ; and there was no more 
idle chatter of the arrival and departure of trains. 
Only the simple sentence “ HowHng (see Beershom) ” 
mocked, in its self-sufiicing entity, the traveller. 

So Flora decided to go to Beershom, and try her 
luck. 

“ I expect Seth will meet you in a jaunting-car,” 
said Mrs. Snailing, as they sat at an early lunch. 

Their spirits were rather low by this time ; and to 
27 



look out of the window at Lambeth, where the gay 
Kttle houses were washed by pale sunshine, and to 
think that she was to exchange the company of Mrs. 
Smiling, and flying and showing-off dinners, for the 
rigours of Gold Comfort and the grossnesses of the 
Starkadders did not make Flora more cheerful. 

She snapped at poor Mrs. Smiling. 

“ One does not have jaunting-cars in England, 
Mary. Do you never read anything but ‘ Haussman- 
Hafl&iitz on Brassieres ’ ? Jaunting-cars are indigenous 
to Ireland. If Seth meets me at aU, it will be in a 
waggon or a buggy.” 

“ Well, I do hope he won’t be called Seth,” said 
Mrs. Smiling, earnestly. “ If he is. Flora, mind you 
wire me at once, and about gum-boots, too.” 

Flora had risen, for the car was at the door, and 
was adjusting her hat upon her dark gold hair. “ I 
will wire, but do not see what good it will do,” she 
said. 

She was feeling downright morbid, and her sensa- 
tions were unpleasingly complicated by the knowledge 
that it was entirely due to her own obstinacy that she 
was setting out at all upon this absurd and disagreeable 
pilgrimage. 

“ Oh, but it will, because then I can send things.” 

“What things?” 

“ Oh, proper clothes and cheerful fashion papers.” 

“ Is CWles coming to the station ? ” asked Flora, 
as they took their seats in the car. 

“ He said he might. Why ? ” 

“ Oh — I don’t know. He rather amuses me, and 
I quite like him.” 


38 



The journey through Lambeth was unmarked by 
any incident, save that Flora pointed out to Mrs. 
Smiling that a flower-shop named Orchidaceous, Ltd., 
had been opened upon the site of the old police station 
in Caroline Place. 

Then the car drew into London Bridge yard ; and 
there was Flora’s train, and Charles csirrying a bunch of 
flowers, and Bikki and Swooth looking pleased because 
Flora was going away and Mrs. Smiling (so they 
feverishly hoped) would have more time to spend in 
their company, 

“ ’Curious how Love destroys every vestige of that 
politeness which the human race, in its years of 
evolution, has so painfully acquired,” reflected Flora, 
as she leaned out of the carriage window and observed 
the faces of Bikki and Swooth. “ Shall I tell them that 
Mig is expected home from Ontario to-morrow ? No, 
I think not. It would be downright sadistic.” 

“ Good-bye, darling ! ” cried Mrs. Smiling, as the 
train began to move. 

“ Good-bye,” said Charles, putting his dafibdils, 
which he had forgotten until that moment, into Flora’s 
hands. “ Don’t forget to ’phone me if it gets too much 
for you, and I will come and take you away in Speed 
Cop II.” 

“ I won’t forget, Charles dear. Thank you very 
much — ^though I am quite sure I shall find it very 
amusing and not at all too much for me.” 

“ Good-bye,” cried Bikki and Swooth, falsely com- 
posing their faces into some semblance of regret. 

“ Good-bye. Don’t forget to feed the parrot ! ” 
shrieked Flora, who disliked this prolongation of the 

29 



ceremony of saying farewell, as every civilised traveller 
must. 

“ What parrot ? ” they all shrieked back from the 
fast-receding platform, just as they were meant to do. 

But it was too much trouble to reply. Flora con- 
tented herself with muttering “ Oh, any parrot, bless 
you all,” and with a final affectionate wave of her hand 
to Mrs. Smiling, she drew back into the carriage and, 
opening a fashion journal, composed herself for the 
journey. 


30 



CHAPTER III 


** AWN crept over the Downs like a sinister white 

J->' animal, followed by the snarling cries of a wind 
eating its way between the black boughs of the thorns. 
The wind was the furious voice of this sluggish animal 
light that was baring the dormers and muUions and 
scullions of Gold Comfort Farm. 

The farm was crouched on a bleak hillside, whence 
its fields, fanged with flints, dropped steeply to the 
village of Howling a mile away. Its stables and out- 
houses were built in the shape of a rough octangle 
surrounding the farmhouse itself, which was built in 
the shape of a rough triangle. The left point of the 
triangle abutted on the farthest point of the octangle, 
which was formed by the cowsheds, which lay parallel 
with the big bam. The outhouses were built of rough- 
cast stone, with thatched roofs, while the farm itself 
was built partly of local flint, set in cement, and 
partly of some stone brought at great trouble and 
enormous personal expense from Perthshire. 

The farmhouse was a long, low building, two- 
storied in parts. Other parts of it were three-storied. 
Edward the Sixth had originally owned it in the form 
of a shed in which he housed his swineherds, but he 
had grown tired of it, and had had it rebuilt in Sussex 
day. Then he pulled it down. Elizabeth had rebuilt 
it, with a good many chimneys in one way and another. 

31 



The Charleses had let it alone; but William and 
Mary had pulled it down again, and George the First 
had rebuilt it. George the Second, however, burned 
it down. George the Third added another wing. 
George the Fourth pulled it down again. 

By the time England began to develop that magnifi- 
cent blossoming of trade and imperial expansion which 
fell to her lot under Victoria, there was not much of 
the original building left, save the tradition that it 
had always been there. It crouched, like a beast 
about to spring, under the bulk of Mockuncle Hill. 
Like ghosts embedded in brick and stone, the archi- 
tectural variations of each period through which it 
had passed were mute history. It was known locally 
as “ The King’s Whim.” 

The fi:ont door of the farm faced a perfectly inacces- 
sible ploughed field at the back of the house ; it had 
been the whim of Red Raleigh Starkadder, in 1835, to 
have it so ; and so the family always used to come in 
by the back door, which abutted on the general yard 
facing the cowsheds. A long corridor ran half-way 
through the house on the second storey and then 
stopped. One could not get into the attics at all. It 
was all very awkward. 

. . . Growing with the viscuous light that was 
invading the sky, there came the solemn, tortured-snake 
voice of the sea, two miles away, falling in sharp folds 
upon the mirror-expanses of the beach. 

Under the ominous bowl of the sky a man was 
ploughing the sloping field immediately below the 
farm, where the flints shone bone-sharp and white in 
the growing light. The ice-cascade of the wind leaped 

3a 



over him, as he guided the plough over the flinty 
runnels. Now and again he called roughly to his 
team : 

“ Upidee, Travail ! Ho, there. Arsenic ! Jug- 
jug ! ” But for the most part he worked in silence, and 
silent were his team. The light showed no more of 
his face than a grey expanse of flesh, expressionless as 
the land he ploughed, from which looked out two 
sluggish eyes. 

Every now and again, when he came to the corner of 
the field and was forced to tilt the scranlet of his 
plough almost on to its axle to make the turn, he 
glanced up at the farm where it squatted on the gaunt 
shoulder of the hill, and something like a possessive 
gleam shone in his dull eyes. But he only turned his 
team again, watching the crooked passage of the 
scranlet through the yeasty earth, and muttered : 
“ Hola, Arsenic ! Belay there. Travail ! ” while the 
bitter light wanned into full day. 

Because of the peculiar formation of the outhouses 
surrounding the farm, the light was always longer in 
reaching the yard than the rest of the house. Long 
after the sunlight was shining through the cobwebs on 
the uppermost windows of the old house the yard was 
in damp blue shadow. 

It was in shadow now, but sharp gleams sprang from 
the ranged milk-buckets along the ford-piece outside 
the cowshed. 

Leaving the house by the back door, you came up 
sharply against a stone wall r unning right across the 
yard, and turning abruptly, at right angles, just before 
it reached the shed where the bull was housed, and 

33 



running down to the gate leading out into the ragged 
garden where mallows, dog’s-body and wild turnip 
were running riot. The bull’s shed abutted upon the 
right comer of the dairy, which faced the cowsheds. 
The cowsheds faced the house, but the back door 
faced the bull’s shed. From here a long-roofed barn 
extended the whole length of the octangle until it 
reached the front door of the house. Here it took a 
quick turn, and ended. The dairy was awkwardly 
placed ; it had been a thorn in the side of old Fig 
Starkadder, the last owner of the farm, who had died 
three years ago. The dairy overlooked the front door, 
in face of the extreme point of the triangle which 
formed the ancient buildings of the farmhouse. 

From the dairy a wall extended which formed the 
right-hand boundary of the octangle, joining the bull’s 
shed and the pig-pens at the extreme end of the right 
point of the triangle. A staircase, put in to make it 
more difficult, ran pzirallel with the octangle, half-way 
round the yard, against the wall which led down to the 
garden gate. 

The spurt and regular ping ! of milk against metal 
came from the reeking interior of the sheds. The 
bucket was pressed between Adam Lambsbreath’s 
knees, and his head was pressed deep into the flank of 
Feckless, the big Jersey. His gnarled hands mechani- 
cally stroked the teat, while a low crooning, mindless 
as the Down wind itself, came from his lips. 

He was asleep. He had been awake all night, 
wandering in thought over the indifferent bare 
shoulders of the Downs after his wild bird, his little 
flower. . . . 


34 



Elfine. The name, unspoken but sharply musical 
as a glittering bead shaken from a fountain’s tossing 
necklace, hovered audibly in the rancid air of the shed. 

The beasts stood with heads lowered dejectedly 
against the wooden hoot-pieces of their stalls. Grace- 
less, Pointless, Feckless and Aimless awaited their turn 
to be milked. Sometimes Aimless ran her dry tongue, 
with a rasping sound sharp as a file through silk, 
awkwardly across the bony flank of Feckless, which was 
still moist with the rain that had fallen upon it through 
the roof during the night, or Pointless turned her large 
dull eyes sideways as she swung her head upwards to 
tear down a mouthful of cobwebs from the wooden 
runnet above her head. A lowering, moist, steamy 
light, almost like that which gleams below the eyelids 
of a man in fever, filled the cowshed. 

Suddenly a tortured bellow, a blaring welter of 
sound that shattered the quiescence of the morning, 
tore its way across the yard, and died away in a croak 
that was almost a sob. It was Big Business, the bull, 
wakening to another day, in the clammy darkness of 
his cell. 

The sound woke Adam. He lifted his head from the 
flank of Feckless and looked around him in bewilder- 
ment for a moment ; then slowly his eyes, which 
looked small and wet and lifeless in his primitive face, 
lost their terror as he realised that he was in the cow- 
shed, that it was half-past six on a winter morning, 
and that his gnarled fingers were about the task which 
they had performed at this hour and in this place for 
the past eighty years and more. 

He stood up, sighing, and crossed over to Pointless, 

35 



who was eating Graceless’s tail. Adam, who was 
linked to all dumb brutes by a chain forged in soil and 
sweat, took it out of her mouth and put into it, instead, 
his neckerchief— the last he had. She mumbled it, 
while he milked her, but stealthily spat it out so soon 
as he passed on to Aimless, and concealed it under the 
reeking straw with her hoof. She did not want to 
hurt the old man’s feelings by declining to cat his gift. 
There was a close bond : a slow, deep, primitive, 
silent down-dragging link between Adam and all 
living beasts ; they knew each other’s simple needs. 
They lay close to the earth, and something of earth’s 
old fierce simplicities had seeped into their beings. 

Suddenly a shadow fell athwart the wooden stan- 
chions of the door. It was no more than a darkening 
of the pallid paws of the day which were now em- 
bracing the shed, but all the cows instinctively stiffened, 
and Adam’s eyes, as he stood up to face the new-comer, 
were again piteously full of twisted fear. 

“ Adam,” uttered the woman who stood in the door- 
way, “how many pails of iDiilk will there be this 
morning ? ” 

“ I duimamany,” responded Adam, cringingly ; 
“ ’tes hard to tell. If so be as our Pointless has got 
over her indigestion, maybe ’twill be four. If so be as 
she htiin’t, maybe tluree.” 

Judith Starkadder made an impatient movement. 
Her large hands had a quality which made them seem 
to sketch vast horizons with their slightest gesture. 
She looked a woman without boundaries as she stood 
wrapped in a crimson shawl to protect her bitter, 
magnificent shoulders from the splintery cold of the 

36 



early air. She seemed fitted for any stage, however 
enormous. 

‘‘ Well, get as many buckets as you can,’’ she said, 
lifelessly, half-turning away. “ Mrs. Starkadder ques- 
tioned me about the milk yesterday. She has been 
comparing our output with that from other farms in 
the district, and she says we are five-sixteenths of a 
bucket below what our rate should be, considering 
how many cows we have.” 

A strange film passed over Adam’s eyes, giving him 
the lifeless primaeval look that a lizard has, basking in 
the swooning Southern heat. But he said nothing. 

And another thing,” continued Judith, “ you will 
probably have to drive down into Beershorn to-night 
to meet a train. Robert Poste’s child is coming to 
stay with us for a while. I expect to hear some time 
this morning what time she is arriving, I will tell you 
later about it.” 

Adam shrank back against the gangrened flank of 
Pointless. 

“ Mun I ? ” he asked, piteously. Mun I, Miss 
Judith ? Oh, dunna send me. How can I look into 
her fiddle flower-face, and me knoWin’ what I know ? 
Oh, Miss Judith, I beg of ’ce not to send me. Besides,” 
he added, more practically, “ ’tes close on sixty-five 
years since I put hands to a pair of reins, and I might 
upset the maidy.” 

Judith, who had slowly turned from him while he 
was speaking, was now half-way across the yard. 
She turned her head to reply to him with a slow, 
graceful movement. Her deep voice clanged like a 
bell in the frosty air : 


4 


37 



“ No, you must go, Adam. You must forget what 
you know — as we all must, while she is here. As for 
the driving, you had best harness Viper to the trap, 
anrl drive down into Howling and back six times this 
afternoon, to get your hand in again.” 

“ Could not Master Seth go instead o’ me ? ” 

Emotion shook the frozen grief of her face. She 
said low and sharp : 

“ You remember what happened when he went to 
meet the new kitchenmaid. . . . No. You must go.” 

Adam’s eyes, little blind pools of water in his primi- 
tive face, suddenly grew cunning. He turned back to 
Aimless and resumed his mechanical stroking of the 
teat, saying in a sing-song rhythm : 

“ Ay, then I’ll go. Miss Judith. I dunnamany 
times I’ve thought as how this day might come. . . . 
And now I mun go to bring Robert Poste’s child back 
to Cold Comfort. Ay, ’tes strange. The seed to the 
flower, the flower to the fruit, the fruit to the belly. 
Ay, so ’twill go.” 

Judith had crossed the muck and rabble of the yard, 
and now entered the house by the back door. 

In the large kitchen, which occupied most of the 
middle of the house, a suUen fire burned, the smoke 
of which wavered up the blackened walls and over the 
deal table, darkened by age and dirt, which was 
roughly set for a meal. A snood full of coarse porridge 
hung over the fire, and standing with one arm resting 
upon the high mantel, looking moodily down into the 
heaving contents of the snood, was a tall young man 
whose riding-boots were splashed with mud to the 
thigh, and whose coarse linen shirt was open to his 

38 



waist. The 'firelight lit up his diaphragm muscles as 
they heaved slowly in rough rhythm with the porridge. 

He looked up as Judith entered, and gave a short, 
defiant laugh, but said nothing. Judith slowly crossed 
over until she stood by his side. She was as taU as he. 
They stood in silence, she staring at him, and he down 
into the secret crevasses of the porridge. 

“ Well, mother mine,” he said at last, “ here I am, 
you see. I said I would be in time for breakfast, and 
I have kept my word.” 

His voice had a low, throaty, animal quality, a 
sneering warmth that woimd a velvet ribbon of 
sexuality over the outward coarseness of the man. 

Judith’s breath came in long shudders. She thrust 
her arms deeper into her shawl. The porridge gave 
an ominous, leering heave ; it might almost have been 
endowed with life, so uncannily did its movements 
keep pace with the hrnnan passions that throbbed 
above it. 

“ Cur,” said Judith, levelly, at last. “ Coward 1 
Liar ! Libertine ! Who were you with last night ? 
Moll at the mill or Violet at the vicarage ? Or Ivy, 
perhaps, at the ironmongery? Seth — ^my son . . .” 
Her deep, dry voice quivered, but she whipped it 
back, and her next words flew out at him like a 
lash. 

“ Do you want to break my heart ? ” 

“ Yes,” said Seth, with an elemental simplicity. 

The porridge boiled over. 

Judith knelt, and hastily and absently ladled it oil 
the floor back into the snood, biting back her tears. 
While she was thus engaged, there was the confused 

39 



blur of voices and boots in the yard outside. The men 
were coming in to breakfast. 

The meal for the men was set on a long trestle at 
the farther end of the kitchen, as far away from the 
fire as possible. They came into the room in awkward 
little clumps, eleven of them. Five were distant cousins 
of the Starkadders, and two others were half-brothers 
of Amos, Judith’s husband. This left only foiu: men 
who were not in some way connected with the family ; 
so it will readily be understood that the general 
feeling among the farm-hands was not exactly one of 
hilarity. Mark Dolour, one of the four, had been 
heard to remark : “ Happen it had been another 
kind o’ eleven, us might ha’ had a cricket team, wi’ 
me fer umpire. As ut is, ’twould be more befittin’ if 
we was to hire oursen out for carryin’ coffins at sixpence 
a mile.” 

The five half-cousins and the two half-brothers came 
over to the table, for they took their meals with the 
family. Amos liked to have his kith about him, 
though, of course, he never said so or cheered up when 
they were. 

A strong family likeness wavered in and out of the 
fierce, earth-reddened faces of the seven, like a 
capricious light. Micah Starkadder, mightiest of the 
cousins, was a ruined giant of a man, paralysed in one 
knee and wrist. His nephew, Urk, was a little, red, 
hard-bitten man with foxy ears. Urk’s brother, Ezra, 
was of the same physical type, but horsy where Urk 
was foxy. Caraway, a silent man, wind-shaved and 
lean, with long wandering fingers, had some of Seth’s 
animal grace, and this had been passed on to his son, 

40 



Harkaway, a young, silent, nervous man given to 
bursts of fury about very little, when you came to 
sift matters. 

Amos’s half-brothers, Luke and Mark, were thickly 
built and high-featured ; gross, silent men with an eye 
to the bed and the board. 

When all were seated two shadows darkened the 
sharp, cold light pouring in through the door. They 
were no more than a growing imminence of humanity, 
but the porridge boiled over again. 

Amos Starkadder and his eldest son, Reuben, came 
into the kitchen. 

Amos, who was even larger and more of a wreck 
than Micah, silently put his pruning-snoot and reaping- 
hook in a corner by the fender, while Reuben put the 
scranlet with which he had been ploughing down 
beside them. 

The two men took their places in silence, and after 
Amos had muttered a long and fervent grace, the 
meal was eaten in silence. Seth sat moodily tying and 
untying a green scarf round the magnificent throat he 
had inherited from Judith ; he did not touch his 
porridge, and Judith only made a pretence of eating 
hers, playing with her spoon, patting the porridge up 
and down and idly building castles with the burnt bits. 
Her eyes burned under their penthouses, sometimes 
straying towards Seth as he sat sprawling in the lusty 
pride of casual manhood, with a good many buttons 
and tapes undone. Then those same eyes, dark as 
prisoned king-cobras, would slide round until they 
rested upon the bitter white head and raddled red neck 
of Amos, her husband, and then, like praying mantises, 

41 



they would retreat between their lids. Secrecy pouted 
her full mouth. 

Suddenly Amos, looking up from his food, asked 
abruptly : 

“ Where’s Elfine ? ” 

“ She is not up yet. I did not wake her. She 
hinders more than she helps o’ mornings,” replied 
Judith. 

Amos grunted. 

“ ’Tes a godless habit to lie abed of a working day, 
and the reeking red pits of the Lord’s eternal wrathy 
fires lie in wait for them as do so. Ay ” — ^his blazing 
blue eyes swivelled round and rested upon Seth, who 
was stealthily looking at a packet of Parisian art 
pictures under the table — “ ay, and for those who 
break the seventh commandment, too. And for 
those ” — the eye rested on Reuben, who was hopefully 
studying his parent’s apoplectic countenance — “ for 
those as waits for dead men’s shoes.” 

“ Nay, Amos, lad ” remonstrated Micah, 

heavily. 

“ Hold your peace,” thundered Amos ; and Micah, 
though a fierce tremor rushed through his mighty 
form, held it. 

When the meal was done the hands trooped out to 
get on with the day’s work of harvesting die swedes. 
This harvest was now in full swing ; it took a long time 
and was very difficult to do. The Starkadders, too, 
rose and went out into the thin rain which had begun 
to fall. They were engaged in digging a well beside 
the dairy ; it had been started a year ago, but it was 
taking a long time to do because things kept on going 

42 



wrong. Once — a terrible day, when Nature seemed 
to hold her breath, and release it again in a furious 
gale of wind — Harkaway had fallen into it. Once 
Urk had pushed Caraway down it. Still, it was nearly 
finished ; and everybody felt that it would not be long 
now. 

In the middle of the morning a wire came firom 
London announcing that the expected visitor would 
arrive by the six o’clock train. 

Judith received it alone. Long after she had read it 
she stood motionless, the rain driving through the 
open door against her crimson shawl. Then slowly, 
with dragging steps, she mounted the staircase which 
led to the upper part of the house. Over her shoulder 
she said to old Adam, who had come into the room to 
do the washing up : 

“ Robert Poste’s child will be here by the six o’clock 
train at Beershom. You must leave to meet it at five. 
I am going up to tell Mrs. Starkadder that she is 
coming to-day.” 

Adam did not reply. And Seth, sitting by the 
fire, was growing tired of looking at his postcards, 
which were a three-year-old gift from the vicar’s son, 
with whom he occasionally went poaching. He knew 
them all by now. Meriam, the hired girl, would not 
be in until after dinner. When she came, she would 
avoid his eyes, and tremble and weep. 

He laughed insolently, triumphantly. Undoing 
another button of his shirt he lounged out across the 
yard to the shed where Big Business, the bull, was 
imprisoned in darkness. 

Laughing softly, Seth struck the door of the shed. 

43 



And as though answering the deep call of male to 
male, the bull uttered a loud, tortured bellow that rose 
undefeated through the dead sky that brooded above 
the farm. 

Seth undid yet another button, and lounged away. 


Adam Lambsbreath, alone in the kitchen, stood 
looking down unseeingly at the dirtied plates which it 
was his task to wash, for the hired girl, Meriam, would 
not be here until after dinner, and when she came she 
would be all but useless. Her hour was near at hand, 
eis all Howling knew. Was it not February, and the 
earth a-teem with newing life ? A grin twisted Adam’s 
writhen lips. He gathered up the plates one by one 
and carried them out to the pump, which stood in a 
comer of the kitchen, above a stone sink. Her hour 
was nigh. And when April Hke an over-lustful lover 
leaped upon the lush flanks of the Downs there would 
be yet another child in the wretched hut down at 
Nettle Flitch Field, where Meriam housed the firuits 
of her shame. 

“Ay, dog’s-fennel or beard’s-crow, by their firuits 
they shall be betrayed,” muttered Adam, shooting a 
stream of cold water over the coagulated plates. 
“ Come cloud, come sun, ’tes aye so.” 

While he was listlessly dabbing at the crusted edges 
of the porridge-plates with a thorn twig, a soft step 
descended the stairs outside the door which closed off 
the staircase firom the kitchen. Someone paused on 
the threshold. 

The step was light as thistledown. If Adam had not 

44 



had the rush of the running water in his ears too 
loudly for him to be able to hear any other noise, he 
might have thought this delicate, hesitant step was 
the beating of his own blood. 

But, suddenly, something like a kingfisher streaked 
across the kitchen in a glimmer of green skirts and 
flying gold hair, and the chime of a laugh was followed 
a second later by the slam of the gate leading through 
the starveling garden out on to the Downs. 

Adam flung round violently on hearing the sound, 
dropping his thorn twig and breaking two plates. 

“ Elfine . . . my Hddle bird,” he whispered, starting 
towards the open door. 

A brittle silence mocked his whisper ; through it 
wound the rank odours of rattan and barn. 

“ My pharisee . . . my cowdling . . .” he whis- 
pered, piteously. His eyes had again that look as of 
waste grey pools, sightless primaeval wastes reflecting 
the wan evening sky in some lonely marsh, as they 
wandered about the kitchen. 

His hands fell slackly against his sides, and he 
dropped another plate. It broke. 

He sighed, and began to move slowly towards the 
open door, his task forgotten. His eyes were fixed 
upon the cowshed. 

“ Ay, the beasts . . .” he muttered, dully ; “ the 
dumb beasts never fail a man. They know. Ay, I’d 
’a’ done better to cowdle our Feckless in my bosom 
than liddle Elfine. Ay, wild as a marshtigget in May, 
’tes. And a will never listen to a word firom annyone. 
Well, so t’must be. Sour or sweet, by bam or bye, 
so ’twill go. Ah, but if he ” — the blind grey pools 

45 



grew suddenly terrible, as though a storm were blo wing 
in across the marsh from the Atlantic wastes — “ if he 
but harms a hair o’ her liddle goldy head I’ll kill un.” 

So muttering, he crossed the yard and entered the 
cowshed, where he untied the beasts from their hoot- 
pieces and drove them across the yard, down the 
muddy rutted lane that led to Nettle Flitch Field. He 
was enmeshed in his grief. He did not notice that 
Graceless’s leg had come off and that she was mana g in g 
as best she could with three. 

Left alone, the kitchen fire went out. 


46 



CHAPTER IV 


T he timeless leaden day merged imperceptibly 
towards eve. After the rude midday meal Adam 
was bid by Judith to put Viper, the vicious gelding, 
between the shafts of the buggy and to drive backwards 
and forwards to Howling six times to revive his know- 
ledge of the art of managing a horse. His attempt to 
stave off this event by having a fit during the rude 
meal was unfortunately robbed of its full effect by the 
collapse of Meriam, the hired girl, while in the act of 
passing a dish of greens to Seth. 

Her hour had come upon her rather sooner than 
was anticipated, and in the ensuing scene Adam’s fit, 
which he had staged in the cowshed out of regard for 
his personal comfort and safety, passed almost un- 
noticed except as a sort of Greek chorus to the main 
drama. 

Adam was therefore left without any excuse, and 
spent the afternoon driving backwards and forwards 
between Howling and the farm, much to the indignation 
of the Starkadders, who could see him from their 
position at the side of the well they were supposed to 
be getting on with ; they thought he was an idle old 
man, and said as much. 

“ How shall I know the maidy ? ” pleaded Adam of 
Judith, as they stood together while he lit the lanthom 
hanging on the side of the buggy. Its dim flame 

47 



flowered up slowly under the vast, uncaring bowl of 
the darkening sky, and hung heavily, like a brooding 
corpse-light, in the windless dusk. “ Robert Poste 
was aye like a bullock : a great moitherin’ man, aye 
playin’ wi’ batses and ballses. Do ’ee think his maid 
will be like him ? ” 

“ There are not so many passengers as all that at 
Beershom,” replied Judith, impatiently. “ Wait until 
everybody has left the station. Robert Poste’s child 
will be the last ; she will wait to see if there is anyone 
to meet her. Be off wi’ you,” and she struck the 
gelding upon his hocks. 

The great beast bounded forward into the gloom 
before Adam could check him. They were gone. 
Darkness fell, a clouded bell of dark glass, eclipsing 
the soggy landscape. 


By the time the buggy reached Beershom, which 
was a good seven miles from Howling, Adam had 
forgotten what he was going there for. The reins lay 
between his knotted fingers, and his face, unseeing, was 
lifted to the dark sky. ?’"?From the stubborn inter- 
woven strata of his sub-conscious, thought seeped up 
into his dim conscious ; not as an integral part of that 
consciousness, but more as an impalpable emanation, 
a crepuscular addition, from the vmsleeping life in the 
restless trees and fields smrotmding him. The coimtry 
for miles, under the blanket of the dark which brought 
no peace, was in its annual tortured ferment of spring 
growth ; worm jarred with worm and seed with seed. 
Frond leapt on root and hare on hare. Beetle and 

48 



finch-fly were not spared. The trout-sperm in the 
muddy hollow under Nettle Flitch Weir were agitated, 
and well they might be. The long screams of the 
hunting owls tore across the night, scarlet lines on 
black. In the pauses, every ten minutes, they mated. 
It seemed chaotic, but it was more methodically 
arranged than you might think. But Adam’s deafness 
and blindness came from within, as well as without ; 
earthy calm seeped up from his sub-conscious and met 
descending calm in his conscious. Twice the buggy 
was pulled out of hedges by a passing farm-hand, and 
once narrowly shaved the vicar, driving home from 
tea at the Hall. 

‘‘ Where are you, my birdling ? ” Adam’s blind lips 
asked the unanswering darkness and the loutish shapes 
of the unbudded trees. Did I cowdle . thee as a 
mommet for this ? ” 

He knew that Elfine was out on the Downs, striding 
on her unsteady colt’s legs towards the Hall and the 
bright, sardonic hands of Richard Hawk-Monitor. 
Adam’s mind played uneasily, in bewildered pain, 
with the vision of his nurseling between those casual 
fingers. . . . 

But the buggy reached Beershorn at last, and 
safely : there was only one road, and that led to the 
station. 

Adam pulled Viper up on his haunches just as the 
great gelding was about to canter through the entrance 
to the booking-hall, and knotted the reins on the 
rennet-post near the horse-trough. 

Then animation fell fi:om him, a sucked straw. His 
body sunk into the immemorial posture of a man 

49 



thought-whelmed. He was a tree-trunk ; a toad on 
a stone ; a pie-thatched owl on a bough. Humanity 
left him abruptly. 

For some time he brooded, but time conveyed to him 
nothing of itself. It spxm endlessly upon a bright 
point in space, repeating the names of Elfine and 
Richaird Hawk-Monitor. If time passed (and presum- 
ably it did, for a train came in, and its passengers got 
out, and were driven away) there was no time for 
Adam. 

He was at last roused by an obscure agitation which 
seemed to be taking place on the floor of the buggy. 

The straw which had lain upon the floor for the past 
twenty-five years was being energetically kicked out 
into the road by a small foot shod in a stout but 
shapely shoe. The light of the lantern showed 
notliing above this save a slender ankle and a green 
skirt, considerably agitated by the movements of the 
leg which it covered. 

A voice from the darkness above his head was 
remarking, “ How revolting ! ” 

“ Eh . . . eh,” muttered Adam, peering blindly up 
into the vague air beyond the lantern’s rays. “ Nay, 
niver do that, soul. That straw was good enough for 
Miss Judith’s wedding-trip to Brighton, and it must 
serve. Straw or chaff, leaf or fhiit, we mun’ all 
come to’t.” 

“ Not while I can prevent myself,” the voice assured 
him. “ And I can believe mst things about Sussex 
and Cold Comfort, but not that Cousin Judith ever 
went to Brighton. Now, shall we be getting along, if 
you have finished brooding ? My trunk is coming up 

50 



to the farm by the carrier’s van to-morrow. Not” 
(the voice went on, with a certain tartness), that yon 
would be likely to care if it stayed down here until it 
seeded.” 

Robert Poste’s child,” murmured Adam, staring 
up at the face he could now dimly see beyond the 
circle of lantern light. ‘‘ Eh, but I was sent here to 
meet ’ee, and I niver saw ’ee.” 

I know,” said Flora. 

Child, child ” began Adam, his voice rising to 

a wail. 

But Flora thought otherwise. She checked him by 
asking him if he would prefer her to drive Viper, and 
this so affronted his male pride that he unhitched the 
reins from the rennet-post and the buggy drove off 
without any more delay. 

Flora sat with her fur jacket drawn close round her 
throat against the chill air, nursing her small case 
containing her nightgown and toilet articles upon her 
knees. She had not been able to resist the impulse to 
slip into this small case, at the last moment, her 
dearly-loved copy of the Pensees of the Abbe Fausse- 
Maigre ; her other books would come up in her trunk 
to-morrow, but she had felt that she would find it 
easier to meet the Starkadders in a proper and civilised 
frame of mind if she had her copy of the Pensees 
(surely the wisest book ever compiled for the guidance 
of a truly civilised person) close at hand. 

The Abbe’s other and greater work, The Higher 
Common Sense,” which had won for him a Doctorate 
of the University of Paris at the age of twenty-five, was 
in her trunk. 


51 



She thought of the Pensees as the buggy left the 
lights of Beershorn behind and began to mozint the 
road which led to the invisible Downs. Her spirits 
were somewhat discomposed. She was chilly, and felt 
soiled (though indeed she did not look it) by the 
rigours of her journey. The prospect of what she would 
find at Cold Comfort was not calculated to cheer 
her spirits. She thought of the Abba’s warning : 
“ Never confront an enemy at the end of a journey, 
unless it happens to be his journey,” and was not 
consoled. 

Adam did not say a word to her during the drive. 
But that was all right, because she did not want him 
to ; he could be coped with later. The drive did not 
last so long as she had feared, because Viper seemed to 
be a pretty good horse and went at a smart pace 
(Flora supposed that the Starkadders had not owned 
him for long), and in less than an hour the lights of a 
village appeared in the distance. 

“ Is that Howling ? ” asked Flora. 

“ Ay, Robert Poste’s child.” 

There did not seem to be anything more to say. 
She fell into a slightly more comfortable muse, wonder- 
ing what her rights were, those rights which her 
Cousin Judith had mentioned in her letter, and who 
had sent the postcard with the reference to a genera- 
tion of vipers, and what was the wrong done by 
Judith’s man to her father, Robert Postc ? 

The buggy now began to climb a hill, leaving 
Howling behind. 

“ Are we nearly there ? ” 

“ Ay, Robert Poste’s child.” 

52 



And in another five minutes Viper stopped, of his 
own will, at a gate which Flora could just see in the 
obscurity. Adam struck him with the whip. He did 
not move. 

I think we must be there,” observed Flora. 

‘‘ Nay, niver say that.” 

“ But I do say it. Look — ^if you drive on we shall 
go slam into a hedge.” 

‘‘ ’Tes all one, Robert Posters child.” 

It may be all right for you, and all one, but it isn’t 
to me. I shall get down.” 

So she did ; and found her way slowly, through 
darkness only lit by faint winter starlight, along a 
villainous muddy path between hedges, which was too 
narrow for the buggy to enter. 

Adam followed her, carrying the lantern, and 
leaving Viper at the gate. 

The buildings of the farm, a shade darker than the 
sky, could now be distinguished in the gloom, a little 
distance on, and as Flora and Adam were slowly 
approaching them, a door suddenly opened and a beam 
of light shone out. Adam gave a joyful cry. 

’Tes the cowshed ! ’Tes our Feckless openin’ the 
door fer me ! ” And Flora saw that it was indeed ; 
the door of the shed, which was lit by a lantern, was 
being anxiously pushed open by the nose of a gaunt 
cow. 

This was not promising. 

But immediately a deep voice was heard : Is that 
you, Adam ? ” and a woman came out of the cowshed, 
carrying the lantern, which she lifted high above her 
head to look at the travellers. Flora dimly discerned 



an unnecessarily red and voluminous shawl on her 
shoulders, and a tumbling mass of hair. 

“ Oh, how do you do ? ” she called. “ You must 
be my Cousin Judith. Pm so glad to see you. How 
nice of you to come out in all this cold. Terribly nice 
of you to have me, too. Isn’t it curious we should 
never have met before ? ” 

She put out her hand, but it was not taken at once. 
The lantern was lifted higher while Judith steadily 
looked into her face, in silence. The seconds passed. 
Flora wondered if her lipstick were the wrong shade. 
It then occurred to her that there was a less fnvolous 
cause for the silence which had fallen, and for the 
steady regard with which her cousin confronted her. 
So, Flora mused, must Columbus have felt when the 
poor Indian fixed his solemn, imwavering gaze upon 
the great sailor’s face. For the first time a Starkadder 
looked upon a civilised being. 

But one could weary even of this ; and Flora soon 
did. She asked Judith if Judith would think her 
terribly rude if she did not meet the rest of the family 
that evening. Might she. Flora, just have a morsel of 
food in her own room ? 

“ It is cold there,” said Judith, draggingly, at last. 

“ Oh, a fire will soon warm it up,” said Flora, 
firmly. “Too nice of you, I do think, to take so 
much care of me.” 

“ My sons, Seth and Reuben ” Judith choked 

on the words, then recovered, and added in a lower 
voice, “ My sons are waiting to see their cousin.” 

This seemed to Flora, in conjunction with their 
ominous names, too like a cattle show, so she smiled 

54 



vaguely and said it was so nice of them^ but she 
thought, all the same, she would see them in the 
morning. 

Judith’s magnificent shoulders rose and fell in a 
slow, billowy shrug which agitated her breasts. 

“ As you will. The chimney, perhaps, smokes ” 

I should think it more than probable,” smiled 
Flora. “ But we can see to all that to-morrow. Shall 
we go in now ? But first ” — ^she opened her bag and 
took out a pencil and tore a leaf from a little diary — 
“ I want Adam to send this wire for me.” 

She had her way. Half an hour later she sat 
beside a smoky fire in her room, pensively eating two 
boiled eggs. She thought these were safest to ask for ; 
Starkadder bacon, especially if cooked by Adam, 
might interfere with the long night’s rest which she 
proposed to take, and for which, a short time later, 
she began to prepare. 

She was really too sleepy to notice much of her sur- 
roundings, and too bored. She wondered if she had 
been wise to come. She reflected on the length, the 
air of neglect and the intricate convolutions of the 
corridors through which Judith had led her to her bed- 
room, and decided that if these were typical of the rest 
of the house, and if Judith and Adam were typical of 
the people who lived in it, her task would indeed be 
long and difficult. However, her hand was on the 
handle of the plough, and she would not turn back, 
because, if she did, Mrs. Smiling would make a parti- 
cular sort of face, which in another and more old- 
fashioned woman would have meant : I told you 
so.” 


55 



And, indeed, Mrs. SmiKng, far away in Mouse 
Place, was at that moment reading with some satis- 
faction a telegram, saying : 

" Worst fears realised darling seth and reuben too send 
gumboots.” 


56 



CHAPTER V 


B ut her resolve to sleep late into the next morning 
was partly frustrated by a shocking row which 
broke out below her window in what she, muttering 
sleepily and furiously from her bed, described as the 
middle of the night. 

Male voices were raised in anger, coming up out of 
the blanket of dead, sullen darkness pierced by the 
far-off shrilling of cockerels. Flora fancied she knew 
one of the voices. 

‘‘ Shame on ’ee, Mus* Reuben, to bite the hand that 
fed thee as a cowdling. Who should know the wants 
of the dumb beasts better nor me ? ’Tes not for 
nought I nursed our Pointless when she was three days 
old and blind as a wren. I know what’s in her heart 
better than I know whafs in the hearts o’ some 
humans.” 

‘‘ Be that as it may,” shouted another voice, strange 
to Flora, “ Graceless has lost a leg ! Where is it ? 
Answer me that, ye doithering old fool of a man. 
Who will buy Graceless now when I take her down to 
Beershorn Market ? Who wants a cow wi’ only three 
legs, saving some great old circus man looking round 
for freakies to put in his show ? ” 

There was a piercing cry of dismay. 

Niver put our Graceless in one o’ they circuses ! 
The shame of it would kill me, Mus’ Reuben.” 

37 



“ Ay, and I would, tu, if I could get hold of anyone 
to buy her, circus or no circus. But no one will. Ay, 
’tes all the same. Cold Comfort stock ne’er finds a 
buyer. Wi’ the Queen’s Bane blighting our com, and 
the King’s Evil laying waste the clover and the Prince’s 
Forfeit bringin’ black ruin on the hay and the sows as 
barren as come-ask-it— ay, ’tes the same tale ivery- 
where all over the farm. Wheer’s that leg ? Answer 
me that ? ” 

“ I don’t know, Mus’ Reuben. And if I did, I 
wouldn’t tell ’ee. I know what goes on in the hearts 
of the dumb beasts, wi’out spyin’ round on them to 
see where they leaves their legs, from mom till eve. A 
beast needs solitude, same as a man does. I’d take 
shame to myself, Mus’ Reuben, to watch over them 
beasts like you do, awaitin’ for dead men’s shoes, and 
a-countin’ every blade of sporran and mouthful the 
dumb beasts eat.” 

“ Ay,” said another voice, meaningly, “ and countin’ 
the very feathers the chickens let fall to see as no one 
makes off wi’ ’em.” 

“ Well, and why should I not ? ” shouted the voice 
called Mus’ Reuben. “Do I pay ’ee wages, Mark 
Dolour, to steal the chickens’ feathers and carry them 
off into Beershorn and sell them for good money ? ” 

“ I doan’t sell the feathers. May I niver set hand 
to plough again if I do. ’Tes my Nancy. I takes ’em 
whoam to my Nancy.” 

“ Oh, ye do, do ye ? And for why ? ” 

“Ye know well why,” returned the third voice, 
sullenly. 

“ Ay, ye told me a pack o’ talcs about trimmin’ 

58 



dolls’ hats wi’ the good chicken feathers. As though 
there was no other use for them feathers them chickens 
drop than to trim the hat of a lot of idle, worthless 
dolls. Now hark ye, Mark Dolour ” 

Here Flora found it useless to try to pretend herself 
back into sleep any longer, so she got crossly out of 
bed and felt her way across the room to the glimmering 
grey square which marked the window. She pushed 
it open a little wider and called down into the dark- 
ness : 

“ I say, do you think you would mind not talking 
quite so loudly, please. I am so sleepy, and I should 
be so grateful if you would.” 

Silence, emphatic as a thunderclap, followed her 
request. She felt, half-asleep as she was, that it was a 
flabbergasted silence. She hoped, drowsily, that it 
would last long enough for her to drift off into sleep 
again ; and it did. 


When she again awoke it was daylight. She rolled 
over in bed and dutifully did her morning stretch and 
looked at her watch. It was half-past eight. 

Not a soxmd came up from the yard outside nor 
from the depths of the old house. Everybody might 
have died in the night. 

‘‘ Not a hope of hot water, of course,” thought 
Flora, wandering round the room in her dressing- 
gown. However, she rubbed a little of the water in 
the ewer (yes, there was a ewer) between her palms, 
and was pleased to find that it was soft water. So she 
did not mind washing in cold. The regiment of 

59 



small porcelain jars and pots on her dressing-table 
would help her to protect her fair skin from any 
rigours of climate, but it was pleasant to know that the 
water was her ally. 

She dressed in pleasant leisure, studying her room. 
She decided that she liked it. 

It was square, and unusually high, and papered 
with a bold though faded design of darker red upon 
crimson. The fireplace was elegant ; the grate was 
basket-shaped, and the mantelpiece was of marble, 
floridly carved, and yellowed by age and exposure. 
Upon the mantelpiece itself rested two large shells, 
whose gentle curves shaded from white to the richest 
salmon-pink ; these were reflected in the large old 
silvery mirror which himg directly above it. 

The other mirror was a long one ; it stood in the 
darkest comer of the room, and was hidden by a cup- 
board door when the latter was opened. Both mirrors 
reflected Flora without flattery or malice, and she felt 
that she could easily learn to rely upon them. Why 
was it, she wondered, that people seemed to have 
forgotten how to make mirrors ? The old mirrors 
one found in deserted commercial and family hotels 
in places like Gravesend, or in the houses of Victorian 
relatives at Cheltenham, were always superb. 

One w£ill was almost filled by a large mahogany 
wardrobe. A roimd tablp to match stood in the middle 
of the worn red and yellow carpet, which was covered 
with a design of big flowers. The bed was high, and 
made of mahogany ; the quilt was a honeycomb, and 
white. 

There were two steel engravings upon the walls, in 
6o 



frames of light yellow wood. One showed the Grief 
of Andromache on Beholding the Dead Body of 
Hector.” The other showed the Captivity of 
Zenobia, Queen of Palmyra.” 

Flora pounced on some books which lay on the 
broad window-sill : Macaria, or Altars of Sacrifice/’ 
by A. J. Evans- Wilson ; “ Home Influence,” by Grace 
Aguilar ; “ Did She Love Him ? ” by James Grant, 
and ‘‘ How She Loved Him,” by Florence Marryat. 
She put these treasures away in a drawer, promising 
herself a gloat when she should have time. She liked 
Victorian novels. They were the only kind of novel 
you could read while you were eating an apple. 

The curtains were magnificent. They were of 
soiled but regal red brocade, and kept much of the 
light and air out of the room. Flora looped them 
back, and decided that to-day they must be washed. 
Then she went down to breakfast. 

She followed a broad corridor, lit by dirty windows 
hung with soiled lace curtains, until it came to a flight 
of stairs ; and at the foot of the stairs, through an 
open door, she could see into a room with a stone floor. 
She paused here for a second, and noticed a tray on 
which was the remainder of what had obviously been 
a large breakfast, lying on the floor outside a closed 
door a little way along the corridor. Good. Some- 
one had breakfasted in their room, and if someone else 
could, so could she. 

A smeU of burnt porridge floated up from the depths. 
This did not seem promising, but she went down the 
stairs, her low heels clipping firmly on the stone. 

At first she thought the kitchen was empty. The 

6x 



jSre was almost out, and ash was blowing along the 
floor, and the table was covered with the intimidating 
remnants of some kind of a meal in which porridge 
seemed to have played the chief part. The door 
leading into the yard was open and the wind blew 
sluggishly in. Before she did anything else. Flora went 
across and crisply shut it. 

“ Eh ! ” protested a voice from the back of the 
kitchen, near the sink. “ Niver do that, Robert 
Poste’s child. I cannot cletter the dishes and watch 
the dumb beasts in the cowshed both together if ye 
shut the door. Ay, and there’s something else I’m 
watchin’ for, too.” 

Flora recognised one of the voices which had dis- 
turbed her in the middle of the night. It belonged to 
old Adam Lambsbreath. He had been listlessly slicing 
turnips over the sink, and had interrupted his work to 
make his protest. 

“ I am so sorry,” she replied, firmly, “ but I never 
could eat breakfast with a draught in the room. You 
can have it open again as soon as I have finished. Is 
there any breakfast, by the way ? ” 

Adam shuffled forward into the light. His eyes 
were like slits of primitive flint in their worn sockets. 
Flora wondered if he ever washed. 

“ There’s porridge, Robert Poste’s child.” 

“ Is there any bread and butter and some tea ? I 
don’t much care for porridge. And have you a piece 
of clean newspaper I could just put on the corner of 
this table (a half-sheet will be enough) to protect me 
from the porridge. It seems to have got tossed about 
a bit this morning, doesn’t it ? ” 

62 



“ There’s tea i’ the jar, yonder, and bread and 
butter i’ the crocket. Ye mun find ’em yourself, 
Robert Poste’s child. I have my task to do and my 
watch to keep, and I cannot run here and run there to 
fetch newspapers for a capsy wennet. Besides, we’ve 
troubles enough at Gold Comfort wi’out bringing in 
sich a thing as a clamourin’ newspaper to upset us and 
fritten us.” 

“ Oh, have you ? What troubles ? ” asked Flora, 
interestedly, as she busily made fresh tea. It occurred 
to her that this might be a good opportunity to learn 
something about the other members of the family. 
“ Haven’t you enough money ? ” 

For she knew that this is what is the matter with 
nearly everybody over twenty-five. 

“ There’s money enough i’ the farm, Robert Poste’s 
child, but ’tes all turned to sourness and ruin. I tell 
ye ” — ^here Adam advanced nearer to the interested 
Flora and thrust his lined and wrinkled face, indelibly 
etched by the corrosive adds of his dim, monotonous 
years, almost into hers — “ there’s a curse on Gold 
Comfort.” 

“ Indeed ! ” said Flora, withdrawing slightly. 
“ What sort of a curse ? Is that why everything looks 
so gone to seed and what-not ? ” 

“ There’s no seeds, Robert Poste’s child. That’s 
what I’m tellin’ ye. The seeds wither as they fall 
into the ground, and the earth will not nourish ’em. 
The cows are barren and the sows are farren and the 
Kin g ’s Evil and the Queen’s Bane and the Prince’s 
Heritage ravages our crops. ’Cos why ? ’Cos there’s 
a curse on us, Robert Poste’s child.” 

63 



“ But, look here, couldn’t something be done about 
it? I mean, surely Cousin Amos could get a man 
down from London or something. — (This bread is 
really not at all bad, you know. Surely you don’t b2ike 
it here.) — Or perhaps Cousin Amos could sell the farm 
and buy another one, without any curse on it, in 
Berkshire or Dorsetshire ? ” 

Adam shook his head. A curious veil, like the 
withdrawing of intelligence from the eyes of a tortoise, 
flickered across his face. 

“Nay. There have always been Starkadders at 
Cold Comfort. ’Tes impossible for any on us to dream 
o’ leavin’ here. There’s reasons why we can’t. Mrs. 
Starkadder, she’s sot on us stayin’ here. ’Tes her life, 
’tes the life in her veins.” 

“ Cousin Judith, you mean ? Well, she doesn’t 
seem very happy here.” 

“ Nay, Robert Poste’s child. I mean the old lady 
— old Mrs. Starkadder.” His voice sunk to a whisper, 
so that Flora had to bend her tall head to catch the 
last words. 

He glanced upwards, as though indicating that old 
Mrs. Starkadder was in heaven. 

“ Is she dead, then ? ” asked Flora, who was pre- 
pared to hear anything at Cold Comfort, even that 
all the family was kept in order by a domineering 
ghost. 

Adam laughed : a strange sound like the whickering 
snicker of a teaizle in anger. 

“ Nay. She’m alive, right enough. Her hand lies 
on us like iron, Robert Poste’s child. But she never 
leaves her room, and she never sees no one but Miss 

64 



Judith. She’s never left the farm this last twenty 
years.” 

He stopped suddenly, as though he had said too 
much. He began to withdraw to his dark comer of 
the kitchen. 

“ I mun cletter the dishes now. Leave me be in 
peace, Robert Poste’s child.” 

“ Oh, all right. But I do wish you would call me 
Miss Poste. Or even Miss Flora, if you’d rather be 
all feudal. I do feel that ‘ Robert Poste’s child ’ every 
time is rather a mouthful, don’t you ? ” 

“ Leave me in peace ; I mun cletter the dishes.” 

Seeing that he was really bent on doing some work. 
Flora let him be, and thoughtfully finished her break- 
fast. 

So that was what it was. Mrs. Starkadder was the 
curse of Cold Comfort. Mrs. Starkadder was the 
Dominant Grandmother Theme, which was found in 
all typical novels of agricultural fife (and sometimes in 
novels of urban life, too). It was, of comse, right and 
proper that Mrs. Starkadder should be in possession 
at Cold Comfort ; Flora should have suspected her 
existence from the beginning. Probably it was Mrs. 
Starkadder, otherwise Aunt Ada Doom, who had sent 
the postcard with the reference to generations of 
vipers. Flora was sure that the old lady was Aunt 
Ada Doom, and none other. It was a most Aunt 
Ada-ish thing to do, to send a postcard like that. 
Flora’s mother would have said at once. Flora was 
sure, “ That’s typical of Ada.” 

If she intended to tidy up life at Cold Comfort, she 
would find hersdf opposed at every turn by the 

65 



influence of Aunt Ada. Flora was sure that this would 
be so. Persons of Aunt Ada’s temperament were not 
fond of a tidy life. Storms were what they liked ; 
plenty of rows, and doors being slammed, and jaws 
sticking out, and faces white with fury, and faces 
brooding in corners, and faces making unnecessary 
fuss at breakfast, and plenty of opportunities for 
gorgeous emotional wallowings, and partings for ever, 
and misunderstandings, and interferings, and spyings, 
and, above all, managing and intriguing. Oh, they 
did enjoy themselves ! They were the sort that went 
trampling aU over your pet stamp collection, or what- 
ever it was, and then spent the rest of their lives atoning 
for it. But you would rather have had your stamp 
collection. 

Flora thought of “ The Higher Common Sense,” by 
the Abbe Fausse-Maigre. This work had been 
written as philosophic treatise ; it was an attempt, 
not to explain the Universe, but to reconcile Man to 
its inexplicability. But, in spite of its impersonal 
theme, “ The Higher Common Sense ” provided a guide 
for civilised persons when confronted with a dilemma of 
the Aunt Ada type. Without actually laying down 
rules of conduct, “The Higher Common Sense” 
outlined a philosophy for the Civilised Being, and the 
rules of conduct followed automatically. Where “ The 
Higher Common Sense ” was silent, the Pensdes of 
the same author often gave guidance. 

With such guides to follow, it was not possible to 
get into a mess. 

Flora decided that before she tackled Aunt Ada she 
would refresh her spirit by re-reading part of “ The 

66 



Higher Common Sense ” ; the famous chapter on 
“ Preparing the Mind for the Twin Invasion by 
Prudence and Daring in Dealing with Substances not 
Included in the Outline.” Probably she would only 
have time to study a page or two, for it was not easy 
to read, and part of it was in German and part in 
Latin. But she thought that the case was sufficiently 
serious to justify the use of “The Higher Common 
Sense.” The Pensees were aU very well to fortify one’s 
spirit against everyday pricks and scourges ; Aunt 
Ada Doom, the crux of life at Cold Comfort, was 
another matter. 

While she was eating the last piece of bread and 
butter. Flora was thinking that there might be a 
difficulty about her food while she was at Cold Com- 
fort, for possibly Adam was cook to the family, and eat 
food prepared by Adam she could not and would not. 
She would probably have to approach her Cousin 
Judith, and have what older people love to call a little 
talk about it. 

On the whole. Cold Comfort was not without its 
promise of mystery and excitement. She had hopes 
that Aimt Ada Doom would provide both ; and she 
wished that Charles could have been there to enjoy 
it all with her. Charles dearly loved a gloomy mystery. 

Adam, meanwhile, had finished slicing turnips and 
had gone out into the yard, where a thom-tree grew, 
and returned with a long thom-spiked twig tom firom 
its branches. Flora watched him with interest while 
he turned the cold water on to the crusted plates, and 
began picking at the incrustations of porridge with 
his twig. 


67 



She bore it as long as she could, for she could 
hardly believe her own eyes, and then she said : 

“ What on earth are you doing ? ” 

“ Cletterin’ the dishes, Robert Poste’s child.” 

“ But surely you could do it much more easily with 
a little mop? A nice little mop with a handle? 
Cousin Judith ought to get you one. Why don’t you 
ask her? It would get the dishes cleaner, and it 
would be so much quicker, too.” 

“ I don’t want a liddle mop wi’ a handle. I’ve used 
a thorn twig these fifty years and more, and what was 
good enough then is good enough now. And I don’t 
want to cletter the dishes more quickly, neither. It 
passes the time away, and takes me thoughts off me 
liddle wild bird.” 

“But,” suggested the cunning Flora, remembering 
the conversation which had roused her that morning 
at dawn, “ if you had a little mop and could wash the 
dishes more quickly, you could have more time in the 
cowshed with the dumb beasts.” 

Adam stopped his work. This had evidently struck 
home. He nodded once or twice, without turning 
roxmd, as though he were pondering it ; and Flora 
hastily followed up her advantage. 

“ Anyway, I shall buy one for you when I go into 
Beershom to-morrow.” 

At this moment there came a soft rap at the closed 
door which led out into the yard ; and a second later 
it was repeated. Adam shuffled across to the door, 
muttering “ My liddle wennet ! ” and flung it wide. 

A figure which stood outside, wrapped in a long 
green doak, rushed across the room and up the stairs 

68 



so quickly that Flora only had the merest glimpse 
of it. 

She raised her eyebrows. “ Who was that ? ” she 
asked, though she was sure that she knew. 

“ My cowdling — ^my liddle Elfine,” said Adam, 
listlessly picking up his thorn twig, which had fallen 
into the snood of porridge on the hearth. 

“ Indeed, and does she always charge about like 
that ? ” enquired Flora, coldly ; she considered her 
cousin deficient in manners. 

“ Ay. She’s as wild and shy as a Pharisee of the 
woods. Days she’ll be away from home, wanderin’ 
on the hills, wi’ only the v^d birds and the liddle 
rabbits an’ the spyin’ maggies for company. Ay, and 
o’ nights, too. . . .” His face darkened. “ Ay, she’s 
away then, too, wanderin’ far from those that loves her 
and cowdled her in their bosoms when she was a 
mommet. She’ll break my heart into liddle sippets, 
so she will.” 

“ Does she go to school ? ” asked Flora, looking dis- 
tastefully in a cupboard for a rag with which to dust 
her shoes. “ How old is she ? ” 

“ Seventeen. Nay, niver talk o’ school for my 
wennet. Why, Robert Poste’s child, ye might as soon 
send the white hawthorn or the yellow dafiydowndilly 
to school as my Elfine. She learns from the skies an’ 
the wild marsh-tiggets, not out o’ books.” 

“ How trying,” observed Flora, who was feeling 
lonely and rather cross. “ Look here, where is every- 
body this morning ? I want to see Miss Judith before 
I go out foj a walk.” 

“ Mus’ Amos, he’s down seein’ the well drained for 

fi 69 



Sairy-Lucy’s Polly we think sHe’s fallen into it ; Mus’ 
Reuben, he’s down Nettle Flitch, ploughin’ ; Mus’ 
Seth, he’s oflF a-moUocking somewheres in Howling ; 
Miss Judith, she’s upstairs a-layin’ out the cards.” 

“ Well, I shall go up and find her. What does 
mollocking mean ? . . . No, you need not tell me. I 
can guess. What time is limch ? ” 

“The men has their dinner at twelve. We has 
ours an hour later.” 

“ Then I’ll come in at one. Does — do — are — 1 
mean, who cooks it ? ” 

“ Miss Judith, she cooks the dinner. Ah, was ye 
feared I would cook it, Robert Poste’s child ? Set yer 
black heart at rest ; I wouldn’t set me hand to cook 
even a runnet of bacon for the Starkadders. I cooks 
for the men, and that’s all.” 

Flora had the grace to colour at his accurate reading 
of her thoughts, and was glad to hurry upstairs out of 
his accusing presence. But it was a relief about the 
cooking. At least she would not have to starve during 
her visit to Gold Comfort. 

She had no notion where Judith’s bedroom might 
be, but she found a guide to take her there. As she 
reached the head of the stairs the tall girl in the green 
cloak, who had just dashed through the kitchen, came 
running lightly down the corridor towards her. She 
stopped, as though shot, at the sight of Flora, and 
stood poised as though for instant flight. “ Doing the 
startled bird stunt,” thought Flora, giving her a 
pleasant smile ; or rather, smiling at the hood which 
half concealed her cousin’s face. 

“ What do you want ? ” whispered Elfine, stonily. 
70 



“ Cousin Judith’s bedroom,” returned Flora. 
“ Would you be a lamb and show me the way ? It’s 
so easy to get lost in a large house when everything is 
strange to one.” 

A pair of large blue eyes looked at her steadily 
above the green hand-woven hood. Flora pensively 
noted that tibey were fine eyes, and that the hood was 
the wrong green. 

She said, persuasively, “ Do forgive my saying so, 
but I would love to see you in blue. Some shades of 
green are good, of course, but dull greens are very 
trying, I always think. If I were you, I should try 
blue — something really well cut, of course, and very 
simple — ^but definitely blue. You try it, and see.” 

Elfine made a brusque, boyish movement, and said 
off-handedly, “ This way.” 

She strode along the corridor with a long, swinging 
step, letting the hood fall back so that Flora could see 
the back of her unbrushed mane of hair ; it might 
have been a good gold if it had been properly dressed 
and cared for. It aU seemed deplorable to Flora. 

“ Here,” jerked out Elfine, stopping in firont of a 
closed door. 

Flora thanked her so much, and Elfine, after 
another long stare at her, strode away. 

“ She will have to be taken in hand at once,” 
thought Flora. “ Another year, and there will be no 
doing anything with her ; for even if she escapes from 
this place, she will only go and keep a tea-room in 
Brighton and go all arty-and-crafty about the feet 
and waist.” 

And sighing a little at the greatness of the task 

71 



which she had set herself to perform. Flora rapped at 
Judith’s bedroom door, and, in reply to a muttered 
“ Come in,” entered. 

Two hundred photographs of Seth, aged from six 
weeks to twenty-four years, decorated the walls of 
Judith’s bedroom. She sat by the window in a soiled 
red dressing-gown with a dirty pack of cards on the 
table in front of her. The bed was not made. Her 
hair hung about her face, a nest of lifeless black 
snakes. 

“ Good-morning,” said Flora. “ I’m so sorry to 
interrupt you if you are busy writing letters ; I just 
wanted to know if you would like me to amuse myself 
and make my own arrangements, or would you like 
me to come in and see you about this time every 
morning. Personally, I think it’s much easier if a 
guest wanders round and finds her own ways of 
passing the time. I am sure you are far too busy to 
want to bother with looking after me.” 

Judith, after a long stare at her young cousin, flung 
back her head with its load of snakes. The raw air 
splintered before the harsh onslaught of her laugh. 

“ Busy ! Busy weaving my own shroud, belike. 
Nay, do what you please, Robert Poste’s child, if so be 
as you don’t break in on my loneliness. Give me 
time, and I will atone for the wrong my man did to 
your father. Give . . . us . . . aU . . . time . . — 

the words came draggingly and unwillingly — “ and we 
will all atone.” 

“ I suppose,” suggested Flora, courteously, “ you 
would not care to tell me what the wrong was ? I do 
fed it would make matters a little easier. . . 

7a 



Judith thrust the words aside with a heavy move- 
ment of her hand, like the blind outflinging of a 
tortured beast. 

Haven’t I told you my lips are sealed ? ” 

Just as you like, of course, Cousin Judith. And 
there is another thing . . 

Then Flora, as delicately as possible, asked her 
cousin when and how she should pay to her the first 
instalment of the hundred pounds a year which Flora 
had anticipated that she would have to hand over to 
the Starkadders for her keep. 

“ Keep it — ^keep it,” said Judith, violently. We 
will never touch a halfpenny of Robert Posters money. 
While you are here, you are here as the guest of Gold 
Comfort. Every middock you eat is paid for with our 
sweat. ’Tes as it should be, seeing the way things are.” 

Flora politely thanked her cousin for her generosity, 
but she privately resolved that, as soon as it was 
possible, she would make the acquaintance of Aunt 
Ada Doom, and find out if the old lady approved of 
this prodigal arrangement. Flora felt sure that she 
would not approve ; and Flora herself was irritated by 
Judith’s remark. For, if she lived at Cold Comfort as a 
guest, it would be unpardonable impertinence were she 
to interfere with the family’s mode of living ; but if 
she were paying her way, she could interfere as much 
as she pleased. She had observed a similar situation 
in houses where there were both poor relations and 
paying guests. 

But this was a point which could be settled at some 
other time ; just now there was something more 
important to discuss. She said : 

73 



“ By the way, I adore my bedroom, but do you think 
I could have the curtains washed ? I believe they are 
red ; and I should so like to make sure.” 

Judith had sunk into a reverie. 

“ Curtains ? ” she asked, vacantly, lifting her 
magnificent head. “ Child, child, it is many years 
since such trifles broke across the web of my sohtude.” 

“ I’m sure it is ; but do you think I might have 
them washed, all the same ? Could Adam do them ? ” 

“Adam? His frail arms have not the strength. 
Meriam, the hired girl, might have done them, 
but ” 

Her gaze strayed again to the window, past whose 
open casements a fine rain was blowing. 

Flora, who was willing to try anything once, gazed 
too. Judith was looking at a little hut which stood at 
the far end of Nettle Flitch Field, and almost abutted 
upon the sag-pieces which railed in the yard. From 
this hut came distinct cries of distress in a female voice. 

Flora looked at her cousin with enquiring eyebrows. 
Judith nodded, lowering her eyelids while a slow 
scarlet wave of blood swept over her breasts and 
cheeks. 

“ ’Tes the hired girl in labour,” she whispered. 

“ What — without a doctor or anything ? ” asked 
Flora, in alarm. “ Hadn’t we better send Adam down 
into Howling for one ? I mean — ^in that grim-looking 
hut and everything ” 

Judith again made the blind animal gesture of 
repudiation which seemed to thrust a sodden wall of 
negation between herself and the world of living things. 
Her face was grey. 


74 



** Leave her in peace . . . animals like Meriam are 
best alone at such times. . . . ’Tes not the first time.” 

“ Too bad,” said Flora, sympathetically. 

“ ’Tes the fourth time,” whispered Judith, thickly. 

Every year, in the fulness o’ summer, when the 
sukebind hangs heavy from the wains . . . ’tes the 
same. And when the spring comes her hour is upon 
her again. ’Tes the hand of Nature, and we women 
cannot escape it.” 

Oh, can’t we ? ” thought Flora, with spirit, but 
aloud she only made such noises of tut-tutting regret 
as she felt were appropriate to the occasion.) 

Well, she’s out of the question, anyway,” she said, 
briskly. 

“ What question ? ” asked Judith, after a pause. 

She had fallen into a trance-like muse. Her face 
was grey. 

I mean the cxnrtains. She can’t wash them if she’s 
just had a baby, can she ? ” 

“ She will be about again to-morrow. Such wenches 
are like the beasts of the field,” said Judith, indiffer- 
ently. 

She seemed bowed under the gnawing weight of 
a sorrow that had left her too exhausted for anger ; 
but, as she spoke, an asp-like gleam of contempt 
darted into her overlidded eyes. She looked quicldy 
across at a photograph of Seth which stood on the 
table. It showed him in the centre of the Beershom 
Wanderers Football Club. His young man’s limbs, 
sleek in their dark male pride, seemed to disdain the 
covering ofiered them by the brief shorts and striped 
jersey. His body might have been naked, like his 



full, muscled throat, which rose, round and proud as 
the male organ of a flower, from the neck of his 
sweater. 

“ He is a thought too fat, but really very handsome,” 
mused Flora, following Judith’s glance. “ I don’t 
suppose he plays football any more — ^probably mol- 
locks, instead.” 

“ Ay,” suddenly whispered Judith, “ look at him — 
the shame of our house. Cursed be the day I brought 
him forth and the nourishment he drew from my 
bosom, and the wooing tongue God gave him to bring 
disgrace upon weak women.” 

She stood up, and looked out into the drizzling rain. 

**The cries from the litde hut had stopped. An 
exhausted silence, brinuned with the eneivating weak- 
ness which follows a stupendous effort, mounted from 
the stagnant air in the yard, like a miasma. All the 
surrounding surface of the countryside — ^the huddled 
Downs lost in rain, the wet fields fanged abruptly with 
flints, the leafless thorns thrust sideways by the eternal 
pawing of the wind, the lush breeding miles of meadow 
through which the lifeless river wandered — ^seemed to 
be folding inwards upon themselves. Their dumbness 
said : “ Give up. There is no answer to the riddle ; 
only that bodies return exhausted, hour by hour, 
minute by minute, to the all-forgiving and all-compre- 
hending primaeval slime.” 

“ Well, Cousin Judith, if you really think she will 
be about again in a few days, perhaps I might look in 
at her hut this morning, and arrange about the cur- 
tains,” said Flora, preparing to go. Judith did not 
answer at first. 


76 



The fourth time/’ she whispered at last. ** Four 
of them. Love-children. Pah ! That animal, and 
love ! And he ” 

Here Flora realised that the conversation was not 
likely to take a turn in which she could join with any 
benefit, so she went quickly away. 

So they all belong to Seth/’ she thought, while 
putting on her mackintosh in her bedroom. Really, 
it is too bad. I suppose on any other farm one would 
say that it set a bad example, but of course that does 
not apply here. I must see, I think, what can be 
done about Seth. . . 

She picked her way through the mud and rancid 
straw which carpeted the yard without encountering 
anyone except a person whom she took from his em- 
ployment to be Reuben himself. He was feverishly 
collecting the feathers dropped by the chickens straying 
about the yard, and comparing them in number with 
the empty feather-sockets on the bodies of the chickens ; 
this, she supposed, must be a precautionary measure, 
to prevent any feathers being taken away by Mark 
Dolour to his daughter Nancy. 

Reuben (if it were he) was so engrossed that he did 
not observe Flora. 


77 



CHAPTER VI 


F lora approached the hut in some trepidation. 

Her practical experience of confinements was 
non-existent, for such of her fnends as were married 
had not yet any children and most of them were still 
too young to think of marriage as anything but a state 
infinitely remote. 

But she had a lively acquaintance with confinements 
through the works of women novelists, especially those 
of the immarried ones. Their descriptions of what 
was coming to their less fortunate married sisters 
usually ran to four or five pages of close print, or eight 
or nine pages of staccato lines containing seven words, 
and a great many dots arranged in threes. 

Another school dismissed confinements with a care- 
ful brightness, a “ So-sorry-rm-late-darling-I’ve- 
just-been-having-a-baby-where-shall-we-go-for-supper- 
afterwards ? ” sangfiroid which Flora, curiously enough, 
found equally alarming. 

She sometimes wondered whether the old-fashioned, 
though doubtless lazy, method of describing the event 
in the phrase, “ She was brought to bed of a fine boy,” 
was not the best way of putting it. 

A third type of woman novelist combined literature 
and motherhood by* writing a good, serious first novel 
when they were twenty-six ; then marrying, and 
having a baby, and the confinement over, writing 

78 



articles for the Press on “ How I shall Bring Up my 
Daughter,” by Miss Gwenyth Bludgeon, the brilliant 
young novelist, who gave birth to a daughter this 
morning. Miss Bludgeon is in private life Mis. Neil 
Mclntish. 

Some of Flora’s friends had been exceedingly 
frightened, not to say revolted, by these painstaking 
descriptions of confinements ; and had been compelled 
to rush off to the Zoo and bribe the keepers to assure 
them that the lionesses, at least, got through the 
Greatest Event of Their Lives in decent solitude. It 
was comforting, too, to watch the lionesses cuffing their 
fubsy cubs about in the sunlight. The lionesses, at 
least, did not write articles for the papers on how they 
would Bring Up their Cubs. 

Flora had also learned the degraded art of “ tasting ” 
unread books, and now, whenever her skimming eye 
lit on a phrase about heavy shapes, or sweat, or howls 
or bedposts, she just put the book back on the shelf, 
unread. 

Musing thus, she was relieved when a voice replied : 
“ Go’s there ? ” to her tap upon the door of the hut. 

“ Miss Poste, from the farm,” she answered, com- 
posedly. “ May I come in ? ” 

There was a silence ; a starded one. Flora felt. At 
length the voice called suspiciously : 

“ What do ’ee want wi’ me and mine ? ” 

Flora sighed. It was curious that persons who 
lived what the novelists call a rich emotional life 
always seemed to be a bit slow on the uptake. The 
most ordinary actions became, to such persons, en- 
tangled in complicated webs of apprehension and 

79 



suspicion. She prepared to make a long explanatory 
statement — ^but suddenly changed her mind. Why 
should she explain? Indeed, what was there to 
explain ? 

She pushed the door open and walked in. 

To her relief, there were no sweat nor howls nor bed- 
posts. There was only a young woman whom she 
presumed to be Meriam, the hired girl, sitting over 
an oil stove and reading what Flora, who had a nice 
sense of atmosphere, at once identified as “ Madame 
Olga’s Dream Book.” Baby there was none, and she 
was puzzled. But she was too relieved to wonder 
much what the explanation could be. 

The hired girl (who was, of course, rather sullen- 
looking and like a ripe firuit) was staring at her. 

“ Good-moming,” Flora began, pleasantly, “ are 
you feeling better ? Mrs. Starkadder seems to think 
you will be about again in a day or two, and if you 
feel well enough, I want you to wash the curtains in 
my be^oom. When can you come up to the farm 
and fetch them ? ” 

The hired girl huddled closer over the oil stove, 
looking at Flora in what the latter interestedly recog- 
nised aa the Tortured Dumb Beast manner. When 
she spoke, her voice was low and drawling : 

“ Why do ye come here, mockin’ me in me shame — 
and me only out of me trouble yesterday ? ” 

Flora started, and stared a little. 

“Yesterday? I thought it was to-day. Surely 
you — er — didn’t I hear ? — ^that is, weren’t you crying 
out, only about ten minutes ago ? Mrs. Starkadder 
and I both heard you.” 


8o 



The beginnings of a sullen smile, rather like a plum 
in quality, touched the hired girl’s sensueil lips. 

“ Ay, I moithered out a bit. I was rememberin’ me 
trouble yesterday. Mrs. Starkadder she weren’t in 
the kitchen when me time came on me. How should 
she know what I bin through, and when I bin through 
it? Not that I ever says much while it’s goin’ on. 
’Tain’t so bad as some people make out. Mother says 
it’s because I keeps me spirits up and eats hearty 
aforehand.” 

Flora was pleasantly surprised to hear this, and for 
a second wondered if the women novelists had been 
misinformed about confinements ? But no : she 
recollected that they usually left themselves a loophole 
by occasionally creating a primitive woman, a creature 
who was as close to the earth as a bloomy greengage 
and rather like one to look at and talk to, and t^ 
greengage creature never had any bother with her 
confinements, but just took them in her stride, as it 
were. Evidently, Meriam belonged in the greengage 
category. 

“ Indeed,” said Flora, “ I am glad to hear it. When 
can you take the curtains down? The day after 
to-morrow ? ” 

“ I never said as I’d wash your curtains. Haven’t 
I enough to bear, wi’ three children to find food for, 
and me mother lookin’ after a fourth? And who’s 
to know what will happen to me when the sukebind is 
out in the hedges again, and I feels so strange on the 
long summer evenings ? ” 

“ Nothing will happen to you, if only you use your 
intelligence and see that it doesn’t,” retorted Flora, 

8i 



firmly. And if I ihay sit down on this stool — thank 
you, no, I will use my handkerchief as a cushion — I 
will tell you how to see that nothing happens. And 
never mind about the sukebind for a minute (what is 
til is sukebind, anyway?) Listen to me.” 

And carefully, in detail, in cool phrases. Flora 
explained exactly to Meriam how to forestall the 
disastrous effect of too much sukebind and too many 
long summer evenings upon the female system. 

Meriam listened, with eyes widening and widening. 

“ ’Tes wickedness ! ‘Tes flying in the face of 
Nature ! ” she burst out fearfiilly at last. 

“ Nonsense ! ” said Flora. “ Nature is all very well 
in her place, but she must not be allowed to make 
thing s untidy. Now remember, Meriam — ^no more 
sukebind and summer evenings without some prepara- 
tions beforehand. As for your children, if you will 
wash the curtains for me, I will pay you, and that can 
go towards buying some of whatever it is children have 
to eat.” 

Meriam seemed unconvinced by the argument for 
coping with sukebind, but she finally agreed to wash 
the curtains on the next day, much to Flora’s satis- 
faction. 

While Flora was making the final arrangements, her 
glance was wandering thoughtfully round the hut. 
It was of the variety known as “ miserable,” but it 
was plain to Flora’s experienced eyes that, unlikely as 
this seemed, somebody had been tidying it up. She 
was sure that the greengage had never even heard of 
such a process and wondered very much who had been 
at work. 


82 



While she was drawing on her gloves, there came a 
sharp tap at the door. 

’Tes mother/’ said Meriam, and she called : 

Come in, mother.” 

The door then opened and on the threshold, taking 
in Flora from heels to beret with snapping little black 
eyes, stood a rusty black shawl with a hat alighting 
perilously upon the knob of hair which crowned the 
top of its head. 

“ Good morning, miss. A nasty day,” snapped the 
shawl, furling a large umbrella. 

Flora was so startled at being addressed in a respect- 
ful and normal manner by anyone in Sussex that she 
almost forgot to answer, but habit is strong, and she 
recovered her wits sufficiently to agree graciously that 
the day was, indeed, nasty. 

She comes firom up at the farm. She wants me to 
wash her bedroom curtains — and me with me trouble 
only a day behind me,” said Meriara. 

“ Who’s ‘ she ’ ? The cat’s mother ? ” snapped the 
shawl. Speak properly to the young lady. You 
must excuse her, miss ; she’s more like father’s side o’ 
the family. Ah ! it was a black day for me when I 
took up with Agony Beetle and left Sydenham for 
Sussex (all my people live in Sydenham, miss, and have 
these forty years). Wash them? Well, I never 
thought I’d live to hear of anyone up at Cold Comfort 
wanting a bit of washing done. They might begin on 
that old Adam of theirs, or whatever he calls himself, 
and no harm would be done. I’ll lay. She’ll wash 
them for you, miss. I’ll bring them along myself 
to-morrow afternoon and put them up for you.” 

83 



Flora replied that this would do very well, and it 
says much for the cumulative effect of the atmosphere 
of Cold Comfort that she felt almost moved as she spoke 
the words to one who seemed to possess some of the 
attributes of an ordinary human being, and who 
seemed to perceive (however dimly) that curtains 
must be washed and life generally tidied up before 
anyone could even begin to think of enjoying it. 

She wondered if she should enquire after the welfare 
of the baby, and had just decided that this might be a 
little tactless when Mrs. Beetle demanded of her 
daughter : 

“ Well, ain’t you going to ask me ’ow ’e is ? ” 

“ I knows. There ain’t no need to ask. He’ll be 
doing fine. They alius does,” was the sullen reply. 

“ Well, you needn’t sound as though you wished 
they wouldn’t,” said the shawl, tartly. “ Lord knows, 
they wasn’t very welcome, pore little innercents ; but 
now they are ’ere, we may as well bring them up right. 
And I will, too. It’s to me advantage. Come 
another four years and I can begin makin’ use of them.” 

“ How ? ” asked Flora, pausing at the door. Was a 
flaw about to disclose itself in the hitherto admirable 
character of the shawl ? 

“ Train the four of them up into one of them jazz- 
bands,” replied Mrs. Beetle, promptly. “ I seen in 
the ‘ News of the People ’ that they earns as much as 
six pounds a night playin’ up West in night-clubs. 
Well, I thought, here’s a jazz-band ready-made to me 
’and, as you may say ; and it’s better stfll now there’s 
four of them. I’ve got ’em all under me hand in one 
family, so’s I can keep an eye on the lot of them while 

84 



they’re learnin’ to play. So that’s why I’m bringing 
them up right, on plenty of milk, and seein’ they get 
to bed early. They’ll need all dieir strength if they 
’ave to sit up till the cows come ’ome playin’ in them 
night-clubs.” 

Flora was rather shocked, but she felt that, though 
Mrs. Beetle’s scheme might be a little callous^ it was at 
least organised^ which was more than could be said of 
any other life which the four embryo musicians might 
lead if their upbringing were left to their mother or 
(a yet darker thought) to Grandfather Agony Beetle 
himself. 

So she went off, after a pleasant farewell to Meriam 
and her mother, and a statement that she would come 
in some time to see the new baby. 

**After she had gone the hut sank into a dim trough 
of languor, pierced only by the shrill beam shed by the 
personality of Mrs. Beetle, which seemed to gather 
into one all the tenuous threads of the half-formulated 
desires of the two women which throbbed about them. 

Meriam huddled on her stool, the coarsened lines 
of her body spreading like some natural growth bom 
of the travail of the endlessly teeming fields. In thick, 
lewd whispers, she began to tell her mother what Flora 
had advised her to do. Her voice rose ... fell . 
rose . . . fell ... its guttural syllables punctuated 
by the swish of Mrs. Beetle’s broom. Once Mrs. 
Beetle flung open a window, muttering that the place 
was enough to choke a black, but save for this interrup- 
tion Meriam’s voice droned on like the voice of the 
earth itself. 

“ Well, you needn’t sw-sw-sw-sw about it as though 
7 85 



you was talkin’ to someone from the Vicarage,” 
observed Mrs. Beetle at the conclusion of her confi- 
dences. “ It’s no news to me, though I wasn’t quite 
sure ’ow it was done nor ’ow much they cost. . . . 
Anyway, we know now, thanks to Miss Interference 
from up the ’ill. And I’ll lay she’s no better than she 
ought to be, a bit of a kid like ’er sailing in ’ere as bold 
as brass and talkin’ to you about such things. Still, 
she does look as if she washed ’erself sometimes, and 
she ain’t painted up like a dog’s dinner, like most of 
them nowadays. Not that I ’old with wot she told 
you, mind you. It ain’t right.” 

“ Ay,” agreed her daughter, heavily, “ ’tes wicked- 
ness. ’Tes flyin’ in the face of nature.” 

“ That’s right.” 

A pause, during which Mrs. Beetle stood with her 
broom suspended, looking firmly at the oil stove. 
Then she added : 

“ AU the same, it might be worth tryin’.” 


86 



CHAPTER VII 


F LOEA’S spirits were usually equable, but by 
lunch-time the next day the combined forces of 
the unceasing rain, the distressing manner in which 
the farmhouse and its attendant buildings seemed 
sinking into decay before her eyes, and the appearance 
and characters of her relatives, had produced in her a 
feeling of gloom which was as unusual as it was dis- 
agreeable. 

“ This will not do,” she thought, as she looked out 
on the soaking countryside from her bedroom window, 
whence she had retreated to arrange some buds and 
branches which she had picked on her morning walk. 
“ I am probably hungry ; lunch will restore my 
spirits.” 

And yet, on second thoughts, it seemed probable 
that lunch cooked by a Starkadder and partaken of in 
solitude would only make her worse. 

She had managed yesterday’s meals successfully. 
Judith had provided a cutlet and some junket for her 
at one o’clock, served beside a smoky &e, in a little 
parlour with faded green waU-paper, next door to the 
dairy. Here, too, Flora had partaken of tea and 
supper. These two meals were served by Mrs. Beetle 
— an agreeable surprise. It appeared that Mrs. Beetle 
came in to the farm and did her daughter’s work on 
those occasions when Meriam was being confined, 

87 



Flora’s arrival had coincided with one of these times, 
which, as we know, were frequent. Mrs. Beetle also 
came in each day to prepare Aunt Ada Doom’s meads. 

So Flora had thus far escaped meeting Seth and 
Reuben or any of the other male Starkadders. Judith, 
Adam, Mrs. Beetle and an occasional glimpse of 
Elfine represented her whole knowledge of the inhabi- 
tants aind servants of the farm. 

But she was not satisfied. She wished to meet her 
yoimg cousins, her Aimt Ada Doom, and Amos. How 
could she tidy up affairs at Gold Comfort if she did 
not meet any of the Starkadders ? And yet she shrank 
from boldly entering the kitchen where the family sat 
at the manger, and introducing herself. Such a move 
would lower her dignity and, hence, her future power. 
It was all very difficult. Perhaps Judith did not 
actively intend to keep Flora from meeting the rest of 
the fainily, but she had so frir achieved just this result. 

But to-day. Flora had decided, she would meet her 
cousins, Seth smd Reuben. She thought that tea-time 
would present a good opportunity on which to carry 
out her intention. If the Starkadders did not partake 
of tea (and it was probable that they did not) she 
would prepare it herself, and tell the Starkadders that 
she intended with their nominal permission to do so 
every afternoon during her visit. 

But this point could be considered later. At the 
moment, she was going down into Howling to see if 
there was a pub in which she could lunch. In any 
other household such a proceeding would be enough to 
terminate her stay. Here, they probably would not 
even notice her absence. 


88 



At one o’clock, therefore, Flora was in tiie saloon 
bar of the Condemn’d Man, the only public-house in 
Howling, asking Mrs. Murther the landlady if she 
“ did ” lunches ? 

A smile indicating a shuddering thankfulness, as of 
one who peers into a pit into which others have fallen 
while she has escaped, passed over the face of Mrs. 
Murther, as she replied that she did not. 

“At least, only for two days in August, and not 
always then,” she added, gladly. 

“ Couldn’t you pretend it is August now ? ” de- 
manded Flora, who was ravenous. 

“ No,” replied Mrs. Murther, simply. 

“ Well, if I buy a steak at the butcher’s, will you 
cook it for me ? ” 

Mrs. Murther unexpectedly said that she would ; 
and added even more surprisingly that Flora could 
have some of what they was having themselves, an offer 
which Flora a little rashly accepted. 

What they was having themselves proved to be 
apple tart and vegetables, so Flora did quite well. 
She obtained her steak after some little delay with the 
butcher, who thought she was mad ; and it seemed to 
her that a smprisingly short time elapsed between the 
purchasing of the steak and her sitting down before it, 
browned and savoury, in the parlour of the Condemn’d 
Man. 

Nor did the hovering pr^ence of Mrs. Murther cast 
an atmosphere sufficiently dismal to spoil her appetite. 
Mrs. Murther seemed resigned, rather than despairing. 
Her face and manner suggested the Cockney phrase 
dear and familiar to Flora in London : “ Oh well, 

89 



mustn’t grumble,” though Flora knew better than to 
expect to hear it in Howling, where everybody felt that 
they must grumble, and all the time at that. 

“ Now I must be off and see to my other gentlemen’s 
dinner,” said Mrs. Murther, having hovered long 
enough to see that Flora had all the salt and pepper, 
bread, forks and the rest of it that she wanted. 

“ Have you another gentleman ? ” asked Flora. 

“Yes. Stayin’ here. A book-writer,” rejoined 
Mrs. Murther. 

“ He would be,” muttered Flora. “ What’s his 
name ? ” (for she wondered if she knew him). 

“ Mybug,” was the improbable answer. 

Flora simply did not believe this, but she was too 
busy eating to start a long and exhausting argument. 
She decided that Mr. Mybug must be a genius. A 
person who was merely talented would have weakly 
changed his name by deed-poll. 

What a bore it was, she thought. Had she not 
enough to do at Cold Comfort without there being a 
genius named Mybug staying a mile away from the 
farm who would probably fall in love with her ? For 
she knew from experience that intellectuals and 
geniuses seldom fell for females of their own kidney, 
who had gone all queer about the shoes and coiffure, 
but concentrated upon reserved but normal and 
properly dressed persons like herself, who were both 
repelled and alarmed (not to say bored) by the pur- 
poseful advances of the said geniuses and intellectuals. 

“ Well — ^what kind of books does he write ? ” she 
asked. 

“ He’s doin’ one now about another yoimg fellow 

go 



who wrote books, and then his sisters pretended th^ 
wrote them, and then they all died of consumption, 
poor young mommets.” 

“ Ha ! A life of Branwell Bronte,” thought Flora. 
“ I might have known it. There has been increasing 
discontent among the male intellectuals for some time 
at the thought that a woman wrote ‘ Wuthering 
Heights.’ I thought one of them would produce 
something of this kind, sooner or later. Well, I must 
just avoid him, that’s all.” 

And she fell to finishing her apple tart a little more 
quickly than was comfortable, for she was nervous 
least Mr. Mybug should come in, and fall in love 
with her. 

“ Don’t you ’urry yourself ; ’e’s never in afore half- 
past two,” soothed Mis. Murther, reading her thoughts 
with disconcerting readiness. “ He’s up on the Downs 
in all weathers, and a nice old lot of mud ’e brings 
into the ’ouse too. Was everything aU right ? That’ll 
be one and sixpence, please.” 

Flora felt better on her return walk to the form. 
She decided that she would spend the afternoon 
arranging her books. 

There were sounds of fife in the yard as she crossed 
it. Buckets clattered in the cowshed, and the hoarse 
beUow of the bull came firom his dark shed. (“ I don’t 
believe he’s ever let out into the fields when the sun’s 
shining,” thought Flora, and made a note to see about 
him, as well as about the Starkadders.) Belligerent 
noises came firom the hen-house, but nobody was to 
be seen. 



At four o’clock she came downstairs to look for some 
tea. 

She did not bother to glance into her little parlour 
to see if her own tea were on the table. She went 
straight into the kitchen. 

Of course, there were no preparations for tea in the 
kitchen ; she realised, as soon as she saw the ashy fire 
and the crumbs and fragments of carrot left on the 
table firom dinner, that it was rather optimistic of her 
to have expected any. 

But she was not daunted. She filled the kettle, 
put some wood on the fire and set the kettle on it, 
flicked the reminders of dinner off the table with 
Adam’s drying-up towel (which she held in the tongs), 
and set out a ring of cups and saucers about a dinted 
pewter teapot. She found a loaf and some butter, 
but no jam, of course, or anything effeminate of that 
sort. 

Just as the kettle boiled and she darted forward to 
rescue it, a shadow darkened the door and there stood 
Reuben, looking at Flora’s gallant preparations with 
an expression of stricken amazement mingled with 
fury. 

“ Hullo,” said Flora, getting her blow in first. “ I 
feel sure you must be Reuben. I’m Flora Poste, your 
cousin, you know. How do you do ? I’m so glad to 
see somebody has come in for some tea. Do sit down. 
Do you take milk ? (No sugar . . . of course ... or 
do you ? I do, but most of my fiiends don’t.) ” 

?**The man’s big body, etched menacingly against 
the bleak light that stabbed in firom the low windows, 
did not move. His thoughts swirled like a beck in spate 

98 



behind the sodden grey furrows of his face. A woman. 
. . , Blast ! Blast ! Come to wrest away from him 
the land whose love fermented in his veins like slow 
yeast. She-woman. Young, soft-coloured, insolent. 
His gaze was suddenly edged by a fleshy taint. Break 
her. Break, Keep and hold and hold fast the land. 
The land, the iron furrows of frosted earth under the 
rain-lust, the fecund spears of rain, the swelling, slow 
burst of seed-sheaths, the slow smell of cows and cry 
of cows, the trampling bride-pride of the bull in his 
hour. All his, his. . . . 

Will you have some bread and butter ? asked 
Flora, handing him a cup of tea. “ Oh, never mind 
your boots. Adam can sweep the mud up afterwards. 
Do come in.” 

Defeated, Reuben came in. 

He stood at the table facing Flora and blowing 
heavily on his tea and staring at her. Flora did not 
mind. It was quite interesting : like having tea with 
a rhinoceros. Besides, she was rather sorry for him. 
Amongst all the Starkadders, he looked as though he 
got the least kick out of life. After all, most of the 
family got a kick out of something. Amos got one 
from religion, Judith got one out of Seth, Adam got his 
from cowdling the dumb beasts, and Elfine got hers 
from dancing about on the Downs in the fog in a 
peculiar green dress, while Seth got his from mollock- 
ing. But Reuben just didn’t seem to get a kick out of 
anything. 

Is it too hot ? ” she asked, and handed him the 
milk, with a smile. 

The opaque curve purred softly down into the teak 

93 



depths of the cup. He went on blowing it, and 
staring at her. Flora wanted to set him at his ease 
(if he had an ease ?) so she composedly went on with 
her tea, wishing there were some cucumber sand- 
wiches. 

After a silence which lasted seven minutes by a 
covert glance at Flora’s watch, a series of visible 
tremors which passed across the expanse of Reuben’s 
face, and a series of low, preparatory noises which pro- 
ceeded from his throat, persuaded her that he was 
about to speak to her. Cautious as a camera-man 
engaged in shooting a family of fourteen lions. Flora 
made no sign. 

Her control was rewarded. After another minute 
Reuben brought forth the following sentence : 

“ I ha’ scranleted two himdred furrows come five 
o’clock down i’ the bute.” 

It was a difficult remark. Flora felt, to which to 
reply. Was it a complaint? If so, one might say, 
“ My dear, how too sickening for you ! ” But then, it 
might be a boast, in which case the correct reply would 
be, “ Attaboy ! ” or more simply, “ Come, that’s 
capital.” Weakly she fell back on the comparatively 
safe remark : 

“ Did you ? ” in a bright, interested voice. 

She saw at once that sEe had said the wrong thing. 
Reuben’s eyebrows came down and his jaw came out. 
Horrors ! He thought she was doubting his word ! 

“Ay, I did, tu. Two hundred. Two hundred 
from Ticklepenny’s Comer down to Nettle Flitch. Ay, 
wi’out hand to aid me. Could you ha’ done that ? ” 

“No, indeed,” repEed Flora, heartily, and her 

94 



guardian angel (who must, she afterwards decided, 
have been doing a spot of overtime) impelled her to 
add : “ But then, you see, I shouldn’t want to.” 

This seemingly innocent confession had a surprising 
effect on Reuben. He banged down his cup and 
thrust his face forward, peering intently into hers. 

“ Wouldn’t you, then ? Ah, but you’d pay a hired 
man good money to do it for you, I’ll lay — wastin’ the 
farm’s takins.” 

Flora was now beginning to see what was the 
matter. He thought she had designs on the farm ! 

“ Indeed I wouldn’t,” she retorted, promptly. “ I 
wouldn’t care if Ticklepenny’s Comer wasn’t scran- 
leted at aU. I don’t want to have anything to do 
with Nettle Flitch. I’d let” — she smiled pleasantly 
up at Reuben — “ I’d let you do it all instead.” 

But this effort went sour on her, to her dismay. 

“ Let ? ” shouted Reuben, thumping the table. 
“ Let ? A mirksy, capsy word to use to a man as has 
nursed a farm like a sick mommet — ^and a man as 
knows every inch of soil and patch o’ sukebind i’ the 
place. Let ... ay, a fire word 

“ I really think we had better get this straight,” 
interrupted Flora. “ It will make things so much 
easier. I don’t want the farm. Really I don’t. In 
fact ” — she hesitated whether she should tell him that 
it seemed incredible to her that anyone could possibly 
want it, but decided that this would be rude as well as 
unkind — “ well, such an idea never came into my head. 
I know nothing about farming, and I don’t want to. 
I would much rather leave it to people who do know 
everything about it, like you. Why, just think what a 

95 



mess I should make of the sukebind harvest and 
everything. You must see that I am the last person 
in the world who would be any use at scranleting. I 
am sure you will believe me.” 

A second series of tremors, of a slightly more compli- 
cated type than the first, passed across Reuben’s face. 
He seemed about to speak, but in the end he did not. 
He slapped down his cup, gave a last stare at Flora, 
and stumped out of the kitchen. 

This was an unsatisfactory end to the interview, 
which had begun well ; but she was not disturbed. 
It was obvious that, even if he did not believe her, he 
wanted to ; and that was half the battle. He had 
even been on the verge of believing her when she 
made that lucky remark about not wanting to scranlet ; 
and only his natural boorishness and his suspicious 
nature had prevented him. The next time she assured 
bim that she was not out after Cold Comfort Farm, 
Reuben would be convinced that she spoke the truth. 

The fire was now burning brightly. Flora lit a 
candle, which she had brought down firom her bed- 
room, and took up some sewing with which to beguile 
the time until supper in her own room. She was 
making a petticoat and decorating it with drawn 
threadwork. 

A little later, as she sat peacefully sewing, Adam 
came in from the yard. He wore, as a protection firom 
the rain, a hat which had lost — ^in who knows what 
dim hintermath of time — ^the usual attributes of shape, 
colour and size, and those more subtle race-memory 
associations which identify hats as hats, and now 
resembled some obscure natural growth, some moss 

96 



or sponge or fungus, which had attached itself to 
a host. 

He was carrying between finger and thumb a bunch 
of thorn twigs, which Flora presumed that he had just 
picked firom one of the trees in the yard ; and he held 
them ostentatiously in firont of him, like a torch. 

He glanced spitefully at Flora firom under the brim 
of the hat as he crossed the kitchen, but said nothing 
to her. As he placed the twigs carefully on a shelf 
above the sink, he glanced round at her, but she 
went on sewing, and said never a word. So after re- 
arranging the twigs once or twice, and coughing, he 
muttered ; 

“ Ay, them’ll last me till Michaelmas to cletter the 
dishes wi’ — ^there’s nothin’ like a thorn twig for 
cletterin’ dishes. Ay, a rope’s as good as a halter to a 
willin’ horse. Curses, like rookses, flies home to rest 
in bosomses and bamses.” 

It was clear that he had not forgotten Flora’s advice 
about using a little mop to clean the dishes. As he 
shuffled away, she thought that she must remember to 
buy one for him the next time she went into Howling. 

Flora had scarcely time to get over this before there 
sovmded a step in the yard outside, and there entered 
a young man who could only be Seth. 

Flora looked up with a cool smile. 

“ How do you do ? Are you Seth ? I’m your 
cousin. Flora Poste. I’m afraid you’re too late for any 
tea . . . unless you would like to make some firesh for 
yourself.” 

He came over to her with the lounging grace of a 
panther, and leaned against the mantelpiece. Flora 

97 



saw at once that he was not the kind that could be 
fobbed off with offers of tea. She was for it. 

“ What’s that you’re making ? ” he asked. Flora 
knew that he hoped it was a pair of knickers. She 
composedly shook out the folds of the petticoat and 
replied that it was an afternoon tea-cloth. 

“Ay . . . womcin’s nonsense,” said Seth, softly. 
(Flora wondered why he had seen fit to drop his voice 
by half an octave.) “ Women are all alike — aye 
fussin’ over their fal-lals and bedazin’ a man’s eyes, 
when all they really want is man’s blood and his heart 
out of his body and his soul and his pride. . . 

“ Really? ” said Flora, looking in her work-box for 
her scissors. 

“Ay.” His deep voice had jarring notes which 
were ciuriously blended into an animal harmony like 
the natural cries of stoat or teazel. “ That’s all women 
want — a man’s life. Then when they’ve got him bound 
up in their fal-lals and bedazin’ ways and their softness, 
and he can’t move because of the longin’ for them as 
cries in his man’s blood — do you know what they do 
then ? ” 

“ I’m afiraid not,” said Flora. “ Would you mind 
passing me that reel of cotton on the mantelpiece, just 
by your ear ? Thank you so much.” Seth passed it 
mechanically, and continued : 

“ They eat him, same as a hen-spider eats a cock- 
spider. That’s what women do — ^if a man let’s ’em.” 

“ Indeed,” commented Flora. 

“Ay — ^but I said ‘if’ a man let ’em. Now I — I 
don’t let no women eat me. I eats them, instead.” 

Flora thought an appreciative silence was the best 

98 



policy to pursue at this point. She found it difficult, 
indeed, to reply to him in words, since this conversa- 
tion in which she had participated before, (at parties 
in Bloomsbury as well as in drawing-rooms in Chelten- 
ham) was, after all, mainly a kind of jockeying for 
place, a shifting about of the pieces on the board 
before the real game began. And if, as in her case, 
one of the players was merely a litde bored by it all 
and was wondering whether she wotdd be able to 
brew herself some hot milk before she went to bed that 
night, there was not much point in playing. 

True, in Cheltenham and in Bloomsbury gentlemen 
did not say in so many words that they ate women in 
self-defence, but there was no doubt that that was what 
they meant. 

“ That shocks you, eh ? ” said Seth, misinterpreting 
her silence. 

“Yes, I think it’s dreadful,” replied Flora, good- 
naturedly meeting him half-way. 

He laughed. It was a cruel sound like the sputter 
of the stoat as it sinks its feet into the neck of a rabbit. 

“ Dreadful ... ay ! You’re all alike. You’re just 
the same as the rest, for all your London ways. Mealy- 
mouthed as a school kid. I’ll lay you don’t under- 
stand half of what I’ve been saying, do you? . . . 
Liddle innercent.” 

“ I am afraid I wasn’t listening to all of it,” she 
replied, “ but I am sure it was very interesting. You 
must teU me all about your work some time. . . . 
What do you do, now, on the evenings when you 
aren’t — er — eating people ? ” 

“ I goes over to Beershorn,” replied Seth, rather 

99 



sulkily. The dark flame of his male pride was a little 
suspicious of having its leg pulled. 

“ To play darts ? ” Flora knew her A.P.H. 

“ Noa ... me play that kid’s game with a lot of 
old men ? That’s a good ’un, that is. No. I goes 
to the talkies.” 

And something in the inflection which Seth gave to 
the last word of his speech, the lingering, wistful, 
almost cooing note which invaded his curiously animal 
voice, caused Flora to put down her sewing in her lap 
and to glance up at him. Her gaze rested thought- 
fully upon his irregular but handsome features. 

“ The taUdes, do you ? Do you like them ? ” 

“ Better nor anything in the whoal world,” he said, 
fiercely. “ Better nor my mother nor this farm nor 
Violet down at the Vicarage, nor anything,” 

“ Indeed,” mused his cousin, still eyeing his face 
thoughtfully. “ That’s interesting. Very interesting 
indeed.” 

“ I’ve got seventy-four photographs o’ Lotta Fun- 
chal,” confided Seth, becoming in his discussion of his 
passion like those monkeys which are described as 
“ almost human.” “ Ay, an’ forty o’ Jenny Carrol, 
and fifty-five o’ Laura Vallee, and twenty o’ Carline 
Heavytrec, and fifteen of Sigrid Maelstrom. Ay, an’ 
ten o’ Penella Baxter. Signed ones.” 

Flora nodded, displaying courteous interest, but 
showing nothing of the plan which had suddenly 
occurred to her ; and Seth, after a suspicious glance at 
her, suddenly decided that he had been betrayed into 
talking to a woman about something else than love, 
and was angry. 


100 



So, muttering that he was going off to Beershom to 
see “ Sweet Sinners ” (he was evidently inflamed by 
this discussion of his passion) he took himself off. 

The rest of the evening passed quietly. Flora 
supped ofl" an omelette and some coffee, which she 
prepared in her own sitting-room. After supper she 
finished the design upon the breast of her petticoat, 
read a chapter of “ Macaria, or Altars of Sacrifice,” 
and went to bed at ten o’clock. 

All this was pleasant enough. And while she was 
imdressing, she reflected that her campaign for the 
tidying up of Cold Comfort was progressing quite well, 
when she thought that she had only been there two 
days. She had made overtures to Reuben. She had 
instructed Meiiam, the hired girl, in the precautionary 
arts, and she had gotten her bedroom curtains washed 
(they hung full and crimson in the candle-light). She 
had discovered the nature of Seth’s grande passion, and 
it was not Women but the Talkies. She had had a 
plan for makix^ the most of Seth, but she could think 
that out in detail later. She blew out the candle. 

But (she thought, settling her cool forehead against 
the cold pillow) this habit of passing her evenings in 
peaceful solitude in her own sitting-room must not 
make her forget her plan of campaign. It was clear 
that she must take some of her meals with the Stark- 
adders, and learn to know tiaem. 

She sighed : and fell asleep. 


8 


ZOI 



CHAPTER VIII 


S HE found some difficulty during the ensiling week 
in meeting her Cousin Amos, while no one so 
much as breathed a word about introducing her to 
Aimt Ada Doom. Each morning, at nine o’clock, 
Flora watched Mrs. Beetle stagger upstairs with tray 
laden with sausages, marmalade, porridge, a kipper, a 
fat black pot of strong tea and what Flora caustically 
thought of as half the loaf; but when once Mrs. 
Beetle had entered Aunt Ada’s bedroom, the door was 
shut for good. And when Mrs. Beetle came out she 
was not communicative. Once she observed to Flora, 
seeing the latter regarding the empty tray which had 
come out of Mrs. Starkadder’s bedroom : 

“ Yes . . . we’re a bit off our feed this morning, as 
you might say. We’ve only ’ad two goes of porridge, 
two soft-boiled eggs, a kipper just on the turn and 
’alf that pot o’ jam Adam stole from the Vicarage 
bazaar lars summer. StiU, there’s room for it where 
it goes, ’eaven knows, and we keep ’ealthy enough 
on it.” 

“ I have not met ihy aunt yet,” said Flora. 

Mrs. Beetle replied sombrely that Flora ’adn’t 
missed much, and they said no more on the matter. 
For Flora was not the type of person who questions 
servants. 

And even if she htid been, it was plain to her that 



Mrs. Beetle was not the type of person who gives away 
secrets. Flora gathered tibat she did not altogether 
disapprove of old Mrs. Starkadder. She had been 
heard to say that at least there was one of ’em at Cold 
Comfort as knew her own mind, even if she ’ad seen 
something narsty in the woodshed when she was two. 
Flora had no idea what this last sentence could possibly 
mean. Possibly it was a local idiom for going cuckoo. 

In any case, she could not demand to see her aunt 
if her aunt did not want to see her ; and surely if she 
had wanted to see her, she would have commanded 
that Flora be brought into the Presence. Perhaps old 
Mrs. Starkadder knew that Flora was out to tidy up 
the farm, and intended to adopt a policy of passive 
resistance ? In which case an attempt must sooner or 
later be made to invade the enemy’s fort. But that 
could wait. 

Meanwhile, there was Amos. 

She learnt from Adam that he preached twice a 
week to the Church of the Qiaivering Brethren, a 
religious sect which had its headquarters in Beershorn. 
It occurred to her that she might ask to accompany 
him there one evening, and begin working on him 
during the long drive down to the town. 

Accordingly, when Thursday evening came during 
her second week at the farm, she approached her 
cousin as he entered the kitchen after tea (for he would 
never partake of that meal, which he thought finicking) 
and said resolutely : 

Are you going down into Beershorn to preach to 
the Brethren to-night ? ” 

Amos looked at her, as though seeing her for the 
103 



first, or perhaps the second, time. ***His huge body, 
rude as a wind-tortured thorn, was printed darkly 
against the thin mild flame of the declining winter 
sun that throbbed like a sallow lemon on the westering 
lip of Mockuncle Hill, and sent its pale, sharp rays 
into the kitchen through the open door. The brittle 
air, on which the fans of the trees were etched like 
ageing skeletons, seemed thronged by the bright, 
invisible ghosts of a million dead summers. The cold 
beat in glassy waves against the eyelids of anybody 
who happened to be out in it. High up, a few chalky 
clouds doubtfully wavered in the pale sky that curved 
over against the rim of the Downs like a vast inverted 
pot-de-^chambre. Huddled in the hollow like an exhausted 
brute, the frosted roofs of Howling, crisp and purple as 
broccoli leaves, were like beasts about to spring. 

Ay,’’ said Amos, at last. He was encased in black 
fustian which made his legs and arms look like drain- 
pipes, and he wore a hard little felt hat. Flora sup- 
posed that some people would say that he walked in a 
lurid, smoky hell of his own religious torment. In 
any case, he was a rude old man. 

They’ll all bum in Hell,” added Amos, in a 
satisfied voice, “ an’ I mun surelie tell them so.” 

“ Well, may I come too ? ” 

He did not seem surprised. Indeed, she caught in 
his eye a triumphant light, as though he had long 
been expecting her to see the error of her ways and come 
to him and the Brethren for spiritual comfort. 

“Ay . , . ye can come ... ye poor miserable 
creepin’ sinner. Maybe ye think ye’ll escape hell fire 
if ye come along o’ me, and bow down and quiver. 

104 



But I’m tellin’ ye no. ’Tes too late. Ye’ll burn wi’ 
the rest. There’ll be time to say what yer sins have 
been, but there’ll be no time for more.” 

“ Do I have to say them out loud ? ” asked Flora, in 
some trepidation. It occurred to her that she had 
heard of a similar custom from friends of hers who were 
being educated at that great centre of religious life, 
Oxford. 

'' Ay, but not to-night. Nay, there’ll be too many 
sayin’ their sins aloud to-night ; there’ll be no time for 
the Lord to listen to a new sheep like you. And 
maybe the spirit won’t move ye.” 

Flora was pretty sure it would not ; so she went 
upstairs to put on her hat and coat. 

She did wonder what the Brethren would look like. 
In novels, persons who turned to religion to obtain the 
colour and excitement which everyday life did not give 
them were all grey and thwarted. Probably the 
Brethren would be all grey and thwarted . . . though 
it was too true that life as she is lived had a way of 
being curiously different from life as described by 
novelists. 

The yard was painted in sharp layers of gold light 
and towering shadows, by the rays of the new-lit 
mog’s-lanthom (this was used especially for carrying 
round the chicken-house at night to see if there were 
any stray cats after the hens : hence the name). 

Viper, the great gelding, was harnessed to the trap ; 
and Adam, who had been called from the cowshed to 
get the brute between the shafts, was being swung up 
and down in the air as he hung on to the reins. 

The great beast, nineteen hands high, jerked his 
105 



head wickedly, and Adam’s frail body flew up into 
the darkness beyond the circle of grave, gold light 
painted by the mog’s-lanthom, and was lost to sight. 

Then down he came again, a twisted grey moth 
fallin g into the light as Viper thrust his head down to 
snuff the reeking straw about his feet. 

“ Git up,” said Amos to Flora. 

“ Is there a rug ? ” she asked, hanging fire. 

“ Nay. The sins bumin’ in yer marrow will keep 
yer warm.” 

But Flora thought otherwise, and darting into the 
kitchen, she returned with her leather coat, in the 
lining of which she had been mending a tiny tear. 

Adam whisked past her head as she put her foot on 
the step, piping in his distress like a very old peewit. 
His eyes were shut. His grey face was strained into 
an exalted mask of martyrdom. 

“Do let go of the reins, Adam,” urged Flora, in 
some distress. “ He’ll hurt you in a minute.” 

“ Nay . . . ’tes exercisin’ our Viper,” said Adam, 
feebly ; and then, as Amos struck Viper on the shanks 
and the brute jerked his head as though he had been 
shot, Adam was flung out of the circle of light into the 
thick darkness, and was seen no more. 

“ Tliere . . . you see ! ” said Flora, reproachfully. 

But muttering, “ Ay, let ’im be for a moithering old 
fool,” Amos struck the horse again and the gig plunged 
forward. 

Flora quite enjoyed the drive into Beershorn. The 
coat kept her pleasantly warm and the cold wind 
dashing past her cheeks was exhilarating. She could 
see nothing except the muddy road directly under the 

io6 



swinging mog’s-lanthorn, and the large outlines of the 
Downs against the starless sky, but the budding hedges 
smelt fresh, and there was a feeling that spring was 
coming. 

Amos was silent. Indeed, none of the Starkadders 
had any general conversation ; and Flora found this 
particularly trying at meal-times. Meals at the farm 
were eaten in silence. If anyone spoke at all during 
the indigestible twenty minutes which served them for 
dinner or supper, it was to pose some awkward ques- 
tion which, when answered, led to a blazing row ; as, 
for example : “ Why has not — (whichever member of 
the family was absent from table) — come in to her 
food ? or “ Why has not — ^the barranfield been gone 
over a second time with the pruning snoot ? On 
the whole, Flora liked it better when they were silent, 
though it did rather give her the feeling that she was 
acting in one of the less cheerful German highbrow 
films. 

But now she had Amos to herself ; and the oppor- 
tunity was golden. She began : 

** It must be so interesting to preach to the Brethren, 
Cousin Amos. I quite envy you. Do you prepare 
your sermon beforehand or do you just make it up as 
you go along ? ” 

An apparent increase in Amos’s looming bulk, after 
this question had had time to sink in, convinced her 
in the midst of a disconcerting and ever-lengthening 
pause that he was swelling with fury. Cautiously she 
glanced over the side of the trap to see if she could 
jump out should he attempt to smite her. The 
ground looked disagreeably muddy and far off ; and 

107 



she was relieved when Amos at last replied in a toler- 
ably well-controlled voice : 

“ Doan’t ’ee speak o’ the word o’ the Lord in that 
godless way, as though ’twere one o’ they pagan tales 
in the ‘ Family Herald.’ The word is not prepared 
beforehand ; it falls on me mind like the manna fell 
from heaven into the bellies of the starving Israelites.” 

“ Really ! How interesting. Then you have no 
idea what you are going to say before you get there ? ” 

“ Ay. ... I alius knows ’twiU be summat about 
bumin’ ... or the eternal torment ... or sinners 
cornin’ to judgment. But I doan’t know exactly what 
the words will be \mtil I gets up in me seat and looks 
round at all their sinful faces, awaitin’ all eager for to 
hear me. Then I knows what I mun say, and I says it.” 

“ Does anyone else preach, or are you the only 
one ? ” 

“ Oanly me. Deborah Checkbottom, she tried 
onceways to get up and preach. But ’tweren’t no good. 
Her couldn’t.” 

“ Wouldn’t the spirit work or something ? ” 

“Nay, it worked. But I wouldn’t have it. I 
reckoned the Lord’s ways is dark and there’d been a 
mistake, and the spirit that was meant for me had fallen 
on Deborah. So I just struck her down wi’ the gurt 
old Bible, to let the devil out of her soul.” 

“ And did it come out ? ” asked Flora, endeavouring 
with some effort to maintain the proper spirit of 
scientific enquiry. 

“ Ay, he came out. We heard no more o’ Deborah’s 
tryin’ to preach. Now I preaches alone. No one else 
gets the word like I do.” 

io8 



Flora detected a note of complacency and took her 
opportunity. 

“ I am looking forward so much to hearing you. 
Cousin Amos. I suppose you like preaching very 
much ? ” 

“ Nay. ’Tes a fearful torment and a groanin’ to me 
soul’s marrow,” corrected Amos. (Like all true 
artists, thought Flora, he was imwilling to admit that 
he got no end of a kick out of his job.) “ But ’tes my 
mission. Ay, I mun tell the Brethren to prepare in 
time for torment, when the roarin’ red flames lick 
round their feet like the dogs lickin’ Jezebel’s blood in 
the Good Book. I mun tell everybody ” — ^here he 
moved slightly round in his seat, and Flora presumed 
that he was fixing her with a meaning stare — “ o’ hell 
fiire. Ay, the word bums in me mouth and I mun 
blow it out on to the whoal world like flames.” 

“ You ought to preach to a larger congregation than 
the Brethren,” suggested Flora, suddenly struck by a 
very good idea. “You mustn’t waste yourself on a 
few miserable sinners in Beershom, you know. Why 
don’t you go round the country with a Ford van, 
preaching on market days ? ” 

For she was sure that Amos’s religious scruples were 
likely to be in the way when she began to introduce 
the changes she desired to bring about at the farm, 
and if she could get him out of the way on a long 
preaching tour her task would be simpler. 

“ I mxm till the field nearest my hand before I go 
into the hedges and by-ways,” retorted Amos, austerely. 
“ Besides, ’twould be exaltin’ meself and puffin’ meself 
up if I was to go preachin’ all over the cormtry in one 

109 



o’ they Ford vans. ’Twould be thinMn’ o’ my own 
glory instead o’ the glory o’ the Lord.” 

Flora was surprised to find him so astute, but 
reflected that religious maniacs always derived con- 
siderable comfort firom digging into their motives for 
their actions and discovering discreditable reasons which 
covered them with good, satisfying sinfulness in which 
they could wallow to their hearts’ content. She 
thought she heard a note of wistfulness, however, in 
the words, “one o’ they Ford vans,” and gathered 
that the idea of such a tour tempted him considerably. 
She returned to the attack. 

“ But, Cousin Amos, isn’t that rather putting your 
own miserable soul before the glory of the Lord ? I 
mean, what does it matter if you do puff yourself up a 
bit and lose your holy humility if a lot of sinners are 
converted by your preaching ? You must be prepared, 
I think, to sin in order to save others — at least, that is 
what I should be prepared to do if 7 were going round 
the coimtry preaching firom a Ford van. You see 
what I mean, don’t you ? By seeming to be humble, 
and dismissing the idea of making this tour, you are 
in reality setting more value on your soul than on the 
spreading of the word of the Lord.” 

She was proud of herself at the conclusion of this 
speech. It had, she thought, the proper over-subtle 
flavour, that air of triumphantly pointing out an 
undetected and perfectly enormous sin lying slap imder 
the sinner’s nose which distinguishes all speeches in- 
tended to lay bare the workings of the religious mind. 

Anyway, it produced the right effect on Amos. 
After a pause, dming which the buggy rapidly passed 

no 



the houses on the outskirts of the town, he observed in 
a hoarse, stifled voice. 

Ay, there’s truth in what ye say. Maybe it is me 
duty to seek a wider field. I mun think of it. Ay, 
’tes terrible. A sinner never knows how the devil may 
dress himself up to deceive. ’Twill be a new sin to 
wrestle with, the sin of carin’ whether me soul is puffed 
up or not. And how can I tell, when I am feelin’ 
puffed up when I preach, whether I’m sinnin’ in me 
pride or whether I’m doin’ right by savin’ souls and 
therefore it woan’t matter if I m puffed up? Ay, 
and what right have I to puff meself up if I do save 
them ? Ay, ’tes a dark and be^vilderin’ way.” 

All this was muttered in so low a voice that Flora 
could only just hear what he was saying, but she 
distinguished enough to make her reply, firmly : 

Yes, Cousin Amos, it is all very difficult. But I 
do think, in spite of the difficulties, that you ought to 
consider seriously the possibility of letting hundreds 
more people hear your seimons. You have a Call, 
you know. No one should neglect a Call. Wouldn’t 
you like to preach to thousands ? ” 

Ay, dearly. But ’tes vainglorious to think on’t,” 
he replied, wistfully. 

‘‘ There you go again,” reproved his youthful com' 
panion. “ What does it matter if it w vainglorious — 
what does your soul matter compared with the souls 
of thousands of sinners who might be saved by your 
preaching ? ” 

At this moment the trap came to a halt outside a 
public-house, in a small yard opening off the High 
Street, and Flora was relieved, for the conversation 


III 



seemed to have entered one of those vicious circles to 
which only the death or collapse from exhaustion of 
one of the participants can put an end. 

Amos left Flora to get down from the trap as best she 
could. 

“ Hurry up,” he called. “ We mun hasten and leave 
the devil’s house,” glancing back disapprovingly at the 
warmly-lit windows of the pub, which Flora thought 
looked rather nice. 

“ Is the chapel far from here ? ” she asked,' following 
him down the High Street, where coarse yellow rays 
from the little shops shone out into the wintry dark. 

“ Nay — ’tes here.” 

They stopped in front of a building which Flora at 
first took to be an unusually large dog-kennel. The 
doors were open, and inside could be seen the seats 
and walls of plain pitch-pine. Some of the Brethren 
were already seated, and others were hurrying in to 
take their places. 

“ We mun wait till the chapel is fuU,” whispered 
Amos. 

« Why?” 

“’Tes flattenin’ for them to see their preacher 
among them like any simple soul,” he whispered, 
standing somewhat back in the shadows. “ They fear 
to have me among them, breathin’ wamin’s o’ hell fire 
and torment. ’Tes flattenin’, in a way, when I stands 
up on the platform, bellowin’, but ’tes not so cruel 
flattenin’ as if I was to stand among them before I 
begins to preach, like any one of them, sharin’ a 
hymn-book, maybe, or fixin’ one of them wi’ my eye 
to read her thoughts.” 

iia 



‘‘ But I thought you wanted to frighten them ? 

Ay, so I do, but in a grand, glorifyin' kind of a 
way. And I doan’t want to fritten’ ’em so much that 
they woan’t never come back to hear me preach 
again.” 

Flora, observing the faces of the Brethren as they 
crowded into the dog-kennel, thought that Amos had 
probably under-estimated the strength of their nerves. 
Seldom had she seen so healthy and stolid-looking an 
audience. 

As an audience, it compared most favourably with 
audiences she had studied in London ; and particularly 
with an audience seen once — ^but only once — at a Sun- 
day afternoon meeting of the Cinema Society to which 
she had, somewhat unwillingly, accompanied a friend 
who was interested in the progress of the cinema as 
an art. 

That audience had run to beards and magenta shirts 
and original ways of arranging its neckwear ; and not 
content with the ravages produced in its over-excitable 
nervous system by the remorseless workings of its critical 
intelligence, it had sat through a film of Japanese life 
called Yes,” made by a Norwegian film company in 
1915 with Japanese actors, which lasted an hour and 
three-quarters and contained twelve close-ups of water- 
lilies lying perfectly still on a scummy pond and four 
suicides, all done extremely slowly. 

All round her (Flora pensively recalled) people were 
muttering how lovely were its rhythmic patterns and 
what an exciting quality it had and how abstract was 
its formal decorative shaping. 

But there was one little man sitting next to her, 

113 



who had not said a word ; he had just nursed his hat 
and eaten sweets out of a paper bag. Something (she 
supposed) must have linked their auras together, for 
at the seventh close-up of a large Japanese face dripping 
with tears, the little man held out to her the bag of 
sweets, muttering : 

“ Peppermint creams. Must have something.” 

And Flora had taken one thankfully, for she was 
extremely hungry. 

When the lights went up, as at last they did. Flora 
had observed with pleasure that the little man was 
properly and conventionally dressed ; and, for his part, 
his gaze had dwelt upon her neat hair and well-cut 
coat with incredulous joy, as of one who should say : 
“ Dr. Livingstone, I presume ? ” 

He then, under the curious eyes of Flora’s highbrow 
friend, said that his name was Earl P. Neck, of Beverley 
Hills, Hollywood ; and he gave them his “ cyard ” 
very ceremoniously and asked if they would go and 
have tea with him ? He seemed the nicest little crea- 
ture, so Flora disregarded the raised eyebrows of her 
friend (who, like all loose-living persons, was extremely 
conventional) and said that they would like to very 
much, so off they went. 

At tea, Mr. Neck and Flora had exchanged views on 
various films of a frivolous nature which they had seen 
and enjoyed (for of “ Y€s ” they could not yet trust 
tliemselves to speak), and Mr. Neck had told them that 
he was a guest-producer at the new British studios at 
Wendover, and would Flora and her fnend come and 
visit the studios some time ? It must be soon, said Mr. 
Neck, because he was returning to Hollywood with 

1 14 



the annual batch of England’s best actors and actresses 
in the autumn. 

Somehow she had never found time to visit Wen- 
dover, though she had dined twice with ’Mr. Neck 
since their first meeting, and they liked each other 
very much. He had told Flora all about his slim, 
expensive mistress, Lily, who made boring scenes and 
took up the time and energy which he would much 
sooner have spent with his wife, but he had to have 
Lily, because in Beverley Hills, if you did not have a 
mistress, people thought you were rather queer, and if, 
on the other hand, you spent all your time with your 
wife and were quite firm about it, and said that you 
liked your wife, and, anyway, why the hell shouldn’t 
you, the papers came out with repulsive articles headed 

Hollywood Czar’s Domestic Bliss,” and you had to 
supply them with pictures of your wife pouring your 
morning chocolate and watering the ferns. 

So there was no way out of it, Mr. Neck said. 

Anyway, his wife quite understood, and they played 
a game called Dodging Lily,” which gave ihtm yet 
another interest in common. 

Now Mr. Neck was in America, but he would be 
flying over to England, so his last letter told Flora, in 
the late spring. 

Flora thought that when he came she would invite 
him to spend a day with her in Sussex. There was 
somebody about whom she wished to talk to him. 

She was reminded of Mr. Neck, as she stood pensively 
watching the Brethren going into the chapel, by the 
spectacle of the Majestic Cinema immediately opposite. 
It was showing a stupendous drama of sophisticated 

1 15 



passion called “ Other Wives’ Sins.” Probably Seth 
was inside, enjoying himself. 

The dog-kennel was nearly full. 

Somebody was playing a shocking tune on the poor 
little wheezy organ near the door. Except for this 
organ, Flora observed, peering over Amos’s shoulder, 
the chapel looked like an ordinary lecture hall, with a 
little round platform at the end farthest from the door, 
on which stood a chair. 

“ Is that where you preach. Cousin Amos ? ” 

“ Ay.” 

“ Does Judith or either of the boys ever come down 
to hear you preach ? ” She was making conversation 
because she was conscious of a growing feeling of dis- 
may at what lay before her, and did not wish to give 
way to it. 

Amos frowned. 

“ Nay. They struts like Ahab in their pride and 
their eyes drips fatness, nor do they see the pit digged 
beneath their feet by the Lord. Ay, ’tes a terrible 
wicked family I’m cursed wi’, and the hand o’ the 
Lord it lies heavy on Cold Comfort, pressin’ the bitter 
wine out o’ our souls.” 

“ Then why don’t you sell it and buy another farm 
on a really nice piece of land, if you feel like that 
about it ? ” 

“ Nay . . . there have always been Starkadders at 
Cold Comfort,” he answered, heavily. “ ’Tes old 
Mrs. Starkadder — ^Ada Doom as was, before she 
married Fig Starkadder. She’s sot against our leavin’ 
the farm. She’d never see us go. ’Tes a curse on us. 
And Reuben sits awaitin’ for me to go, so as he can 

Ii6 



have the farm. But im shall niver have un. Nay 
I’ll leave it to Adam first.” 

Before Flora could convey to him her lively sense of 
dismay at the prospect indicated in this threat, he 
moved forward saying, “ ’Tes nearly full. We mun go 
in,” and in they went. 

Flora took a seat at the end of a row near the exit ; 
she thought it would be as well to sit near the door in 
case the double effect of Amos’s preaching and no 
ventilation became more than she could bear. 

Amos went to a seat almost directly in front of the 
little platform, and sat down after directing two slow 
and brooding glances, laden with promise of terrifying 
eloquence to come, upon the Brethren sitting in the 
same row. 

The dog-kennel was now packed to bursting, and 
the organ had begun to play something like a tune. 
Flora found a hymn-book being pressed into her hand 
by a female on her left. 

^Tt’s number two hundred, ‘Whatever shall we Do, O 
Lord ’ ” said the female, in a loud conversational voice. 

Flora had supposed, from impressions gathered 
during her wide reading, that it was customary to 
speak only in whispers in a building devoted to the act 
of worship. But she was ready to learn otherwise, so 
she took the book with a pleasant smile and said, 
“ Thank you so much.” 

The hymn went like this : 

Whatever shall we do, O Lord, 

When Gabriel blows o’er sea and river, 

Fen and desert, mount and ford ? 

The earth may burn, but we will quiver* 

II7 


9 



Flora approved of this hymn, because its words indi- 
cated a firmness of purpose, a clear plan in the face of 
a disagreeable possibility, which struck an answefiag 
note in her own character. She sang industriously in 
her pleasing soprano. The singing was conducted by 
a surely excessively dirty old man with long, grey hair 
who stood on the platform and waved what Flora, 
after the first incredulous shock, decided was a kitchen 
poker. 

“ Who is that ? ” she asked her fiicnd. 

“ ’Tes Brother Ambleforth. He leads the quiverin’ 
when we begins to quiver.” 

“ And why does he conduct the music with a poker ? ” 

“To put us in mind o’ hell fire,” was the simple 
answer, and Flora had not the heart to say that as far 
as she was concerned, at any rate, this purpose was not 
achieved. 

After the hymn, which was sung sitting down, every- 
body crossed their legs and arranged themselves more 
comfortably, while Amos rose firom his seat with 
terrifying deliberation, mounted the little platform, 
and sat down. 

For some three minutes he slowly surveyed the 
Brethren, his face wearing an expression of the most 
profoimd loathing and contempt, mingled with a divine 
sorrow and pity. He did it quite well. Flora had 
never seen anything to touch it except the face of Sir 
Henry Wood when pausing to contemplate some 
latctcomers into the stalls at the Queen’s Hall just as 
his baton was raised to conduct the first bar of the 
“ Eroica.” Her heart warmed to Amos. The man 
was an artist. 

ii8 



At last he spoke. His voice jarred the silence like 
a broken beU. 

“Ye miserable, crawling worms, are ye here again, 
then ? Have ye come like Nimshi son of Rehoboam, 
secretly out of yer doomed houses to hear what’s cornin’ 
to ye ? Have ye come, old and young, sick and well, 
matrons and virgins (if there is any virgins among ye, 
which is not likely, the world bein’ in the wicked state 
it is), old men and young lads, to hear me tellin’ o’ the 
great crimson lickin’ flames o’ hell fire ? ” 

A long and effective pause, and a further imitation 
of Sir Henry. The only sound (and it, with the 
accompanying smell, was quite enough) was the 
whickering hissing of the gas flares which lit the hall 
and cast sharp shadows firom their noses across the faces 
of the Brethren. 

Amos went on : 

“ Ay, ye’ve come.” He laughed shortly and con- 
temptuously. “Dozens of ye. Hundreds of ye. like 
rats to a granary. Like field-mice when there’s harvest 
home. And what good will it do ye ? ” 

Second pause, and more Sir Henry stuff. 

“ Nowt. Not the flicker of a whisper of a bit o’ good.” 

He paused and drew a long breath, then suddenly 
he leaped firom his seat and thundered at the top of 
his voice : 

“ re^ re dl damned r* 

An expression of lively interest and satisfaction 
passed over the faces of the Brethren, and there was a 
general rearranging of arms and legs as though they 
wanted to sit as comfortably as possible while listening 
to the bad news. 

H9 



“Damned,” he repeated, his voice sinking to a 
thrilling and eflFective whisper. “ Oh, do ye ever stop 
to think what that word means when ye use it every 
day, so lightly, o’ yer wicked lives ? No. Ye doan’t. 
Ye never stop to think what anything means, do ye ? 
Well, I’ll tell ye. It means endless horrifyin’ torment, 
with yer poor sinful bodies stretched out on hot grid- 
irons in the nethermost fiery pit of heU, and demons 
mockin’ ye while they waves cooling jellies in front of 
ye, and binds ye down tighter on yer dreadful bed. 
Ay, an’ the air’ll be full of the stench of burnt flesh and 
the screams of your nearest and dearest. . , .” 

He took a gulp of water, which Flora thought he 
more than deserved. She was beginning to feel that 
she could do with a glass of water herself. 

Amos’s voice now took on a deceptively mild and 
conversational note. His protruding eyes ranged 
slowly over his audience. 

“Ye know, doan’t ye, what it feels like when ye 
bum yer hand in takin’ a cake out of the oven or wi’ a 
match when ye’re lightin’ one of they godless cigar- 
ettes ? Ay. It stings wi’ a fearful pain, doan’t it ? 
And ye run away to clap a bit o’ butter on it to take 
the pain away. Ah, but” (an impressive pause) 
“ there’ll be no butter in hell ! Yer whoal body will be 
bumin’ and stingin’ wi’ that unbearable pain, and yer 
blackened tongues will be stickin’ out of yer mouth, and 
yer cracked lips Will try to scream out for a drop of 
water, but no soimd woan’t come because yer throat is 
drier nor the sandy desert and yer eyes will be bearin’ 
like great red hot balls against yer shrivelled eye- 
lids. . . .” 


120 



It was at this point that Flora quietly rose and with 
an apology to the woman sitting next to her, passed 
rapidly across the narrow aisle to the door. She 
opened it, and went out. The details of Amos’s 
description, the close atmosphere and the smell of the 
gas made the inside of the chapel quite near enough to 
hell, without listening to Amos’s conducted tour of 
the place thrown in. She felt that she could pass the 
evening more profitably elsewhere. 

But where ? The firesh air smelled deliciously sweet. 
She regained her composure while she stood in the 
porch, putting on her gloves. She wondered if she 
should drop in to see “ Other Wives’ Sins,” but 
thought not ; she had heard enough about sin for one 
evening. 

What, then, should she do ? She could not return 
to the farm except with Amos in the buggy, for it was 
seven miles firom Beershom and the last bus to Howling 
left at half-past six during the winter months. It was 
now nearly eight o’clock and she was hungry. She 
looked crossly up and down the street ; most of the 
shops were shut, but one a few doors firom the cinema 
was open. 

It was called Pam’s Parlour. It was a tea-shop, and 
Flora thought it looked pretty grim ; there were cakes 
in its windows all mixed up with depressing little boxes 
made of white wood and rafl&a bags and linen bags 
embroidered with hollyhocks. But where there were 
cakes there might also be coffee. She crossed the road 
and went in. 

No sooner did she stand inside than she realised that 
she had gone out of heU fire into an evenii^ of boredom. 

lai 



For someone was seated at one of the tables whom she 
recognised. She seemed to remember meeting him 
at a party given by a Mrs. Polswett in London. And 
he coxild only be Mr. Mybug. That was who he 
looked Uke, and that, of course, was who he was. 
There was no one else in the shop. He had a clear 
field, and she could not escape. 


133 



4 


CHAPTER IX 

H e glanced up at her as she came in, and looked 
pleased. He had some books and papers in front 
of him and had been busily writing. 

By now Flora was really cross. Surely she had 
endured enough for one evening without having to 
listen to intelligent conversation ? Here was an 
occasion, she thought, for indulging in that deliberate 
rudeness which only persons with habitually good 
manners have the right to commit ; she sat down at a 
table with her back to the supposed Mr. Mybug, 
picked up a menu which had gnomes painted on it, 
and hoped for the best. . . . 

A waitress in a long frilly chintz dress which needed 
ironing had brought her some coffee, some plain 
biscuits and an orange, which she had dressed with 
sugar and was now enjoying. The waitress had 
warned her that we were closed, but as this did not 
seem to prevent Flora sitting in the shop and enjoying 
her sugared orange, she did not mind if we were. 

She was just beginning on her fourth biscuit when 
she became conscious of a presence approaching her 
from behind, and before she could collect her faculties 
the voice of Mr. Mybug said : 

Hullo, Flora Poste. Do you believe that women 
have souls ? And there he was, standing above her 
and looking down at her with a bold yet whimsical smile. 

123 



Flora was not surprised at being asked this question. 
She knew that intellectuals, like Mr. Kipling’s Bi- 
coloured Python-Rock-Snake, always talked like this. 
So she replied pleasantly, but from her heart : “ I am 
afraid I’m not very interested.” 

Mr. Mybug gave a short laugh. Evidently he was 
pleased. She spooned out some more orange juice and 
wondered why. 

“ Aren’t you ? Good girl ... we shall be all right 
if only you’ll be frank with me. As a matter of fact, 
I’m not very interested in whether they have souls 
either. Bodies matter more than souls. I say, may I 
sit down ? You do remember me, don’t you ? We 
met at the Polswetts in October. Look here, you don’t 
think this is butting in or anything, do you? The 
Polswetts told me you were staying down here, and I 
wondered if I should run into you. Do you know 
Billie Polswett well? She’s a charming person, I 
t h i n k ... so simple and gay, and such a genius for 
friendship. He’s charming, too ... a bit homo, of 
course, but quite charming. I say, that orange does 
look good. ... I think I’U have one too. I adore 
eating things with a spoon. May I sit here ? ” 

“ Do,” said Flora, seeing that her hour was upon her 
and that there was no escape. 

Mr. Mybug sat down and, turning roimd, beckoned 
to the waitress, who came and told him that we were 
closed. 

“ I say, that sounds vaguely indelicate,” laughed 
Mr. Mybug, glancing round at Flora. “ Well, look 
here, naiss, never mind that. Just bring me an orange 
and some sugar, will you ? ” 

134 



The waitress went away and Mr. Mybug could once 
more concentrate upon Flora. He leaned his elbows 
on the table, sunk his chin in his hands, and looked 
steadily at her. As Flora merely went on eating her 
orange, he was forced to open the game with, “ Well ? ” 
(A gambit which Flora, with a sinking heart, recognised 
as one used by intellectuals who had decided to fall in 
love with you.) 

“ You are writing a book, aren’t you ? ” she said, 
rather hastily. “ I remember that Mrs. Polswett told 
me you were. Isn’t it a life of Branwell Bronte ? ” 
(She thought it would be best to utilise the information 
artlessly conveyed to her by Mrs. Murther at the 
Condemn’d Man, and conceal the fact that she had 
met Mrs. Polswett, a protegee of Mrs. Smiling’s, only 
once, and thought her a most trying female.) 

“ Yes, it’s going to be dam’ good,” said Mr. Mybug. 
“ It’s a psychological study, of course, and I’ve got a 
lot of new matter, including three letters he wrote to 
an old aimt in Ireland, Mjs. Prunty, during the period 
when he was working on ‘ Wuthering Heights 

He glanced sharply at Flora to see if she would 
react by a laugh or a stare of blank amazement, but 
the gentle, interested expression upon her face did not 
change, so he had to explain : 

“ You see, it’s obvious that it’s his book and not 
Emily’s. No woman could have written that. It’s 
male stuff. . . . I’ve worked out a theory about his 
drunkenness, too — ^you see, he wasn’t really a drunkard. 
He was a tremendous genius, a sort of second Chatter- 
ton — ^and his sisters hated him because of his genius.” 

“ I thought most of the contemporary records agree 
185 



that his sisters were quite devoted to him,” said Flora, 
who was only too pleased to keep the conversation 
impersonal. 

“ I know. ... I know. But that was only their 
cunning. You see, they were devoured by jealousy 
of their brilliant brother, but they were afraid that 
they showed it he would go away to London for good, 
taking his manuscripts with him. And they didn’t 
want him to do that because it would have spoiled thdr 
little game.” 

“ Which little game was that ? ” asked Flora, trying 
with some difficulty to imagine Charlotte, Emily and 
Anne engaged in a little game. 

“ Passing his manuscripts off as their own, of course. 
They wanted to have him imder their noses so that 
they could steal his work and seU it to buy more 
drink.” 

“Who for— Branwell?” 

“ No — ^for themselves. They were all drunkards, 
but Anne was the worst of the lot. Branwell, who 
adored her, used to pretend to get drunk at the Black 
Bull in order to get gin for Anne. The landlord 
wouldn’t have let him have it if Branwell hadn’t built 
up — ^with what devotion, only God knows — ^that false 
reputation as a brilliant, reckless, idle drunkard. The 
landlord was proud to have young Mr. Bront6 in his 
tavern ; it attracted custom to the place, and Branwell 
could get gin for Anne on tick — ^as much as Anne 
wanted. Secretly, he worked twelve hours a day 
writing ‘ Shirley,’ and ‘ Villette ’ — and, of course, 

‘ Wuthering Heights.’ I’ve proved all this by evi- 
dence from the three letters to old Mrs. Prunty.” 

126 



“ But do the letters,” enquired Flora, who was 
fascinated by this recital, “ actually say that he is 
writing ‘ Wutheiing Heights ’ ? ” 

“ Of course not,” retorted Mr. Mybug. “ Look at 
the question as a psychologist would. Here is a man 
working fifteen hours a day on a stupendous master- 
piece which absorbs almost all his energy. He will 
scarcely spare the time to eat or sleep. He’s like a 
dynamo iiving itself on its own demoniac vitality. 
Every scrap of his being is concentrated on finishing 
‘ Wutheiing Heights.’ With what little energy he has 
left he writes to an old aunt in Ireland. Now, I ask 
you, would you expect him to mention that he was 
working on ‘ Wutheiing Heights ’ ? ” 

“Yes,” said Flora. 

Mr. Mybug shook his head violently. 

“ No — ^no — ^no ! Of course he wouldn’t. He’d 
want to get away firom it for a little while, away firom 
this all-obsessing work that was devouring his vitality. 
Of course he wouldn’t mention it — ^not even to his aunt.” 
“ Why not even to her ? Was he so fond of her ? ” 

“ She was the passion of his life,” said Mr. Mybug, 
simply, with a luminous gravity in his voice. “ Think 
— ^he’d never seen her. She was not like the rest of 
the drab angular women by whom he was surrounded. 
She symbolised mystery . . . woman . . . the eternal 
unsolvable and unfindable X. It was a perversion, of 
course, his passion for her, and that made it all the 
stronger. All we have left of this fragile, wonderfully 
delicate relationship between the old woman and the 
young man are diese three short letters. Not hing 
more.” 


127 



“ Didn’t she ever answer them ? ” 

“ If she did, her letters are lost. But his letters to 
her are enough to go on. They are little masterpieces 
of repressed passion. They’re full of tender little 
questions . . . he asks her how is her rheumatism . . . 
has her cat, Toby, ‘ recovered from his fever ’ . . . 
what is the weather like at Derrydownderry ... at 
Haworth it is not so good . . . how is Cousin Martha 
(and what a picture we get of Cousin Martha in those 
simple words, a raw Irish chit, high-cheekboned, with 
limp black hair and clear blood in her lips !).... It 
didn’t matter to Branwell that in London the Duke 
was jockeying Palmerston in the stormy Com Reforms 
of the ‘ forties.’ Armt Prunt/s health and welfare 
came first in interest.” 

Mr. Mybug paused and refreshed himself with a 
spoonful of orange juice. Flora sat pondering on 
what she had just heard. Judging by her personal 
experience among her fidends, it was not the habit of 
men of genius to refresh themselves from their labours 
by writing to old aunts ; this task, indeed, usually fell 
to the sisters and wives of men of genius, and it stmck 
Flora as far more likely that Charlotte, Aone or Emily 
would have had to cope with any old aunts who were 
clamouring to be written to. However, perhaps 
Charlotte, Anne and Emily had all decided one 
morning that it really was Branwell’s turn to write to 
Aimt Prunty, and had sat on his head in turn while 
he wrote the three letters, which were afterwards 
posted at pradently spaced intervals. 

She glanced at her watch. 

It was half-past eight. She wondered what time 
laS 



the Brethren came out of the dog-kennel. There was 
no sign of their release so far ; the kennel was thunder- 
ing to their singing, and at intervals there were pauses, 
during which Flora presumed that they were quivering. 
She swallowed a tiny yawn. She was sleepy. 

“ What are you going to call it ? ” she asked. 

She knew that intellectuals always made a great 
fuss about the titles of their bools. The titles of 
biographies were especially important. Had not 
“ Victorian Vista,” the scathing life of Thomas 
Carlyle, dropped stone cold last year from the presses 
because everybody thought it was a boring book of 
reminiscences, wldle “ Odour of Sanctity,” a rather 
dull history of Drainage Reform from 1840 to 1873, 
had sold like hot cakes because everybody thought it 
was ein attack on Victorian morality ? 

“ I’m hesitating between ‘ Scapegoat : * A Study of 
Branwell Bronte,’ and ‘ Pard-spirit : ‘ A Study of 
Branwell Bronte ’ — ^you know. ... A pard-like spirit, 

¦ beautiful and swift.” 

Flora did indeed know. The quotation was from 
Shelley’s Adonais. One of the disadvantages of almost 
universal education was the fact that all kinds of 
persons acquired a familiarity with one’s favourite 
writers. It gave one a curious feeling ; it was like 
seeing a drunken stranger wrapped in one’s dressing- 
gown. 

“ Which do you like best ? ” asked Mr. Mybug. 

“ Pard-spirit,” said Flora, unhesitatingly, not because 
she did, but because it would only lead to a long and 
boring argument if she hesitated. 

“ Really . . . that’s interesting. So do I. IP* 
189 



wilder somehow, isn’t it ? I mean, I think it does give 
one something of the feeling of a wild thing bound 
down and chained, eh? And Branwell’s colouring 
carries out the analogy — ^that wild reddish-leopard 
colouring. I refer to him as the Pard throughout the 
book. And then, of course, there’s an undercurrent 
of symbolism. . . .” 

He thinks of everything, reflected Flora. 

“ A leopard can’t change its spots, and neither could 
Branwell, in the end. He might take the blame for 
his sisters’ drunkenness and let them, out of some 
perverted sense of sacrifice, claim his books. But in 
the end his genius has flamed out, blackest spots on 
richest gold. There isn’t an intelligent person in 
Europe to-day who really believes Emily wrote the 
‘ Heights 

Flora finished her last biscuit, which she had been 
saving, and looked hopefully across at the dog-kennel. 
It seemed to her that the hymn now being sung had a 
sound like the tune of those hymns which are played 
just before people come out of church. 

In the interval of outlining his work, Mr. Mybug 
had been looking at her very steadily, with his chin 
lowered, and she was not surprised when he said, 
abruptly : 

“ Do you cah about walking ? ” 

Flora was now in a dreadful fix, and earnestly wished 
that the dog-kennel would open and Amos, like a fiery 
angel, come to rescue her. For if she said that she 
adored walking, Mr. Mybug would drag her for nules 
in the rain while he talked about sex, and if she said 
that she liked it only in moderation, he would make 

130 



her sit on wet stiles while he tried to kiss her. If, 
again, she parried his question and said that she 
loathed walking, he would either suspect that she 
suspected that he wanted to kiss her, or else he would 
make her sit in some dire tea-room while he talked 
more about sex and asked her what she felt about it. 

There really seemed no way out of it, except by 
getting up and rushing out of the shop. 

But Mr. Mybug spared her this decision by con- 
tinuing in the same low voice : 

“ I thought we might do some walks together, if 
you’d cah to? I’d better warn you — ^I’m — ^pretty 
susceptible.” 

And he gave a curt laugh, still looking sombrely at 
her. 

Then perhaps we had better postpone our walks 
until the weather is finer,” said she, pleasantly. It 
would be too bad if your book were held up by your 
catching a cold, and if you really have a weak chest 
you cannot be too careful.” 

Mr. Mybug looked as though he would have given 
much to have brushed this aside with a brutal laugh. 
He had planned that his next sentence should be, in 
an even lower voice : 

“ You see, I believe in utter firahkness about these 
things — ^Flora.” 

But somehow he did not say it. He was not used to 
talking to young women who looked as clean as Flora 
looked. It rather put him off his stroke. He said 
instead, in a toneless voice : ‘‘ Yes ... oh yes, oi 
course,” and gave her a quick glance. 

Flora was pensively drawing on her gauntlets and 



keeping her glance upon the stream of Brethren now 
issuing from the dog-kennel. She feared to miss 
Amos. 

Mr. Mybug rose abruptly, and stood looking at her 
with his hands thrust into his pockets. 

“ Are you with anybody ? ” he asked. 

“ My cousin is preaching at the Church of the 
Qpivering Brethren opposite. He is driving me 
home.” 

Mr. Mybug murmured his dear, how amusing. He 
then said : 

“ Oh ... I thought we might have walked it.” 

“ It is seven miles, and I am afraid my shoes are 
not stout enough,” countered Flora, firmly. 

Mr. Mybug gave an ironical smile and muttered 
something about “ Check to the King,” but Flora 
had seen Amos comity out of the kennel and knew that 
rescue had come, so she did not mind who was checked. 

She said, pleasantly, “ I must go, I am afraid ; 
there is my cousin looking for me. Good-bye, eind 
thank you so much for telling me about your book. 
It’s been so interesting. Perhaps we shaU meet again 
some time. . . .” 

Mr. Mybug leapt on this remark, which slipped out 
unintentionally from Flora’s social armoury, before she 
could prevent it, and said eagerly that it would be 
great fim if they could meet again. “ I’ll give you my 
C2ird.” And he brought out a large, dirty, nasty one, 
which Flora with some reluctance put into her bag. 

“ I warn you,” added Mr. Mybug, “ I’m a queer 
moody brute. Nobody likes me. I’m like a child 
that’s been rapped over the knuckles till it’s afraid to 

132 



shake hands — ^but there’s something there if you cah 
to dig for it.” 

Flora did not cah to dig, but she thanked him for 
his card with a smile, and hurried across the rdad to 
join Amos, who stood towering in the middle of it. 

As she came up to him he drew back, pointed at 
her, and uttered the single word : 

“ Fornicator ! ” 

“ No — dash it, Cousin Amos, that wasn’t a stranger ; 
it was a person I’d met before at a party in London,” 
protested Flora, her indignation a little roused by the 
unjustness of the accusation, especially when she 
thought of her real feelings for Mr. Mybug. 

“ ’Tes all one — ^ay, and worse too, cornin’ from 
London, die devil’s city,” said Amos, grimly. 

However, his protest had apparendy been a matter 
more of form than of feeling. He said nothing more 
about it, and they drove home in silence, save for a 
single remark from him to the effect that the Brethren 
had been mightily stirred by his preaching and that 
Flora had missed a good deal by not staying for the 
quivering. 

To which Flora replied that she was sure she had, 
but that his eloquence had been altogether too much 
for her wezik and sinful spirit. She added ftrmly that 
he really ought to see about going round on that Ford 
van ; and he sighed heavily, and said that no doubt 
she was a devil sent to tempt him. 

StiU, the seeds were sown. Her plans were 
maturing. 

It was not imtil she glanced at Mr. Mybug’s card in 
the candle-light of her own room that she discovered 

" 133 



that his name was not Mybug but Meyerburg, and 
that he lived in Charlotte Street — two facts which were 
not calculated to raise her spirits. But such bad been 
the varied excitements of the day that her subsequent 
sleep was deep and unbroken. 


134 



CHAPTER X 


I T was now the third week in March. Fecund 
dreams stirred in the yearlings. The sukebind 
was in bud. The swede harvest was over ; the beet 
harvest not yet begun. This meant that Micah, Urk, 
Amos, Caraway, Harkaway, Mizpah, Luke, Mark 
and four farm-hands who were not related to the 
family had a good deal of time on their hands in one 
vra.y and another. Seth, of course, was always busiest 
in the spring. Adam was employed about the beasten- 
housen with the yearling lambs. Reuben was pre- 
paring the fields for the harvest after next ; he never 
rested, however slack the season of the year. But 
the other Starkadders were simply ripe for rows and 
mischief. 

As for Flora, she was quite enjoying herself. She 
was mixed up in a good many plots. Only a person 
with a candid mind, who is usually bored by intrigues, 
can appreciate the full fun of an intrigue when they 
begin to manage one for the first time. If there are 
several intrigues and there is a certain danger of their 
getting mixed up zmd spoiling each other, the enjoy- 
ment is even keener. 

Of course, some of the plots were going better than 
others. Her plot to make Adam use a little mop to! 
clean the dishes with, instead of a thorn twig, had gone , 
sour on her. 


135 



One day, when Adam came into the kitchen just 
after breakfast, Flora had said to him : 

“ Oh, Adam, here’s your little mop. I got it in 
Howling this afternoon. Look, isn’t it a nice little 
one ? You try it, and see.” 

For a second, she had thought he would dash it 
from her hand, but gradually, as he stared at the little 
mop, his expression of fury changed to one more 
difficult to read. 

It was, indeed, rather a nice little mop. It had a 
plain handle of white wood with a little waist right at 
the tip, so that it could be more comfortably held 
in the hand. Its head was of soft white threads, each 
fibre being distinct and comely instead of being 
matted together in an unsightly lump like the heads 
of most litde mops. Most taking of aU, it had a loop 
of fine red string, with which to hang it up, knotted 
roimd its little waist. 

Adam cautiously put out his finger and poked at it. 

“’Tesmine?” 

“Ay — I mean, yes, it’s yoius. Yom very own. 
Do take it.” 

He took it between his finger and thumb and stood 
gazing at it. His eyes had filmed over like sightless 
Atlantic pools before the flurry of the storm breath. 
His gnarled fingers folded round the heindle. 

“ Ay . . . ’tes mine,” he muttered. “ Nor house 
nor Mne, sind yet ’tes mine. . . . My little mop ! ” 

He undid flie thorn twig which ffistened the bosom 
of his shirt and thrust the mop within. But then he 
witiidrew it again, and replaced the thorn. “ My little 
mop ! ” He stood staring at it in a dream. 

136 



“ Yes. It’s to cletter the dishes with,” said Flora, 
firmly, suddenly foreseeing a new danger on the horizon. 

“ Nay . . . nay,” protested Adam. “ ’Tes too 
pretty to cletter those great old dishes wi’. I mun do 
that with the thorn twigs ; they’ll serve. I’ll keep my 
liddle mop in the shed, along wi’ our Pointless and our 
Feckless.” 

“ They might eat it,” suggested Flora. 

“ Ay, ay, so they might, Robert Poste’s child. Ah, 
well, I mun hang it up by its liddle red string above 
the dish-washin’ bowl. Niver put my liddle pretty in 
that gurt old greasy washin’-up water. Ay, ’tes 
prettier nor apple-blooth, my liddle mop.” 

And shufiling across the kitchen, he hung it carefully 
on the wall above the sink, and stood for some time 
admiring it. Flora was justifiably irritated, and went 
crossly out for a walk. 

She was firequently cheered by letters firom her 
fiiends in London. Mrs. Simling was now in Egypt^ 
but she wrote often. When abroad in hot climates she 
wore a great many white dresses, said very little, and 
all the men in the hotel fell in love with her. Charles 
also wrote in reply to Flora’s little notes. Her short, 
informative sentences on two sides of deep blue note- 
paper brought details in return from Charles about the 
weather in Hertfordshire and messages from his 
mother. What little else he wrote about. Flora seemed 
to find mightily satisfying. She looked forward to his 
letters. She also heard from Julia, who collected 
books about gangsters, from Claud Hart-Hanis, and 
from all her set in general. So, though exiled, she 
was not lonely. 


137 



Occasionally, while taking her daily walk on the 
Downs, she saw Elfine : a light, rangy shape which 
had the plastic contours of a choir-boy etched by 
Botticelli, drawn against the thin cold sky of spring. 
Elfine never came near her, and this annoyed Flora. 
She wanted to get hold of Elfine, and to give her some 
tactful advice about Dick Hawk-Monitor. 

Adam had confided to Flora his fears about Elfine. 
She did not think he had done it consciously. He 
was milking at the time, and she was watching him, 
and he was talking half to himself. 

“ She’s aye a-speerin’ at the windows of Hautcouture 
Hall ” (he pronounced it “ Howchiker,” in the local 
manner) “ to get a sight of that yoimg chuck-stubbard, 
Mus’ Richard,” he had said. 

Something earthy, something dark and rooty as the 
barran that thrust its tenacious way through the 
yeasty soil had crept into the old man’s voice with the 
words. He was moved. Old tides lapped his loins. 

“ Is that the yoimg squire ? ” asked Flora, casually. 
She wanted to get to the bottom of this business without 
seeming inquisitive. 

“Ay — ^blast im fer a capsy, set-up yearling of a 
womaniser.” The reply came clotted with rage, but 
behind the rage were traces of some other and more 
obscure emotion ; a bright-eyed grubbing in the lore 
of farmyard and bin, a hint of the casual lusts of 
chicken-house and duck-pond, a racy, yeasty, posty- 
toasty interest in the sordid drama of man’s eternal 
blind attack and woman’s inevitable yielding and 
loss. 

Flora had experienced some distaste, but her wish 
138 



to tidy up Cold Comfort had compelled her to pursue 
her enquiries. 

She asked when the young people were to be 
married, knowing full weU what the answer would be. 
Adam gave a loud and unaccustomed soimd which 
she had with some difficulty interpreted as a mirthless 
laugh. 

“ When apples grow on the sukebind ye may see 
lust buy hissen a wedding garment,” he had replied, 
meaningly. 

Flora nodded, more gloomily than she felt. She 
thought that Adam took too black a view of the case. 
Probably, Richard Hawk-Monitor was only mildly 
attracted by Elfine, and the thought of behaving as 
Adam feared had never occurred to him. Even if it 
had, it would have been instantly dismissed. 

Flora knew her hunting gentry. They were what the 
Americans, bless them ! caE dumb. They hated fuss. 
Poetry (Flora was pretty sure Elfine wrote poetry) 
bored them. They preferred the society of persons 
who spoke once in twenty minutes. They liked dogs 
to be well trained and girls to be well turned out and 
frosts to be of short duration. It was most unlikely 
that Richard was planning a Lyceum betrayal of 
Elfine. But it was even less hkely that he wanted to 
marry her. The eccentricity of her dress, behaviour 
and hairdressing would put him off automatically. 
Like most other ideas, the idea would simply not have 
entered his head. 

“ So, unless I do something about it,” thought 
Flora, “ she will simply be left on my hands. And 
heaven knows nobody wiU want to marry her while 

139 



she looks like that and wears those frocks. Unless, of 
course, I fix her up with Mr. Mybug.” 

But Mr. Mybug was, temporarily at least, in love 
with Flora herself, so that was another obstacle. And 
was it quite fair to fling Elfine, aJl unprepared, to 
those Bloomsbury-cum-Charlotte-Street lions which 
exchanged their husbands and wives every other week- 
end in the most broad-minded fashion ? They always 
made Flora think of the description of the wild boars 
painted on the vases in Dickens’s story — “ each wild 
boar having his leg elevated in the air at a painful 
angle to show his perfect freedom and gaiety.” And it 
must be so discouraging for them to find each new love 
exactly resembling the old one : just like trying balloon 
after balloon at a bad party and finding they all had 
holes in and would not blow up properly. 

No. Elfine must not be thrown into Charlotte 
Street. She must be civilised, and then she must 
marry Richard. 

So Flora continued to look out for Elfine when she 
went out for walks on the Downs. 


Airnt Ada Doom sat in her room upstairs . . . 
alone. 

There was something almost symbolic in her soli- 
tude. She was the core, the matrix, the fbcusing-point 
of the house . . . and she was, like all cores, utterly 
alone. You never heard of two cores to a thing, did 
you? Well, then. Yet all the wandering waves of 
desire, passion, jealousy, lust, that throbbed through 
the hoiise converged, web-like, upon her core-solitude. 

140 



She felt herself to be a core . . . and utterly, irre- 
vocably alone. 

The weakening winds of spring fawned against the 
old house. The old woman^s thoughts cowered in the 
hot room where she sat in solitude. . . . She would 
not see her niece. . . . Keep her away. . . . 

Make some excuse. Shut her out. She had been 
here a month and you had not seen her. She thought 
it strange, did she ? She dropped hints that she would 
like to see you. You did not want to see her. You 
felt . . . you felt some strange emotion at the 
thought of her. You would not see her. Your 
thoughts wound slowly round the room like beasts 
rubbing against the drowsy walls. And outside the 
walls the winds rubbed like drowsy beasts. Half-way 
between the inside and the outside walls, winds and 
thoughts were both drowsy. How enervating was the 
warm wind of the coming spring. . . . 

When you were very small — ^so small that the 
lightest puflF of breeze blew your little crinoline skirt 
over your head — ^you had seen something nasty in the 
woodshed. 

You’d never forgotten it. 

You’d never spoken of it to Mamma — (you could 
smell, even to this day, the fresh betel-nut with which 
her shoes were always cleaned) — ^but you’d remem- 
bered all your life. 

That was what had niade you - . . different. That 
— ^what you had seen in the tool-shed — ^had made your 
marriage a prolonged nightmare to you. 

Somehow you had never bothered about what it had 
been like for your husband. . • . 

141 



That was why you had brought your children into 
the world with loathing. Even now, when you were 
seventy-nine, you could never see a bicycle go past 
your bedroom window without a sick plunge at the 
apex of your stomach ... in the bicycle shed you’d 
seen it, something nasty, when you were very small. 

That was why you stayed here in this room. You 
had been here for twenty years, ever since Judith had 
married and her husband had come to live at the farm. 
You had nm away from the huge, terrifying world 
outside these four walls against which your thoughts 
rubbed themselves like drowsy yaks. Yes, that was 
what they were like. Yaks. Exactly like yaks. 

Outside in the world there were potting-sheds where 
nasty things could happen. But nothing co\ild happen 
here. You saw to that. None of your grandchildren 
might leave the farm. Judith might not leave. Amos 
mi g ht not leave. Caraway might not leave. Urk 
might not leave. Seth might not leave. Micah might 
not leave. .Ezra might not leave. Mark and Luke 
might not leave. Harkaway might leave sometimes 
because he paid the proceeds of the farm into the bank 
at Beershom every Saturday morning, but none of the 
others might leave. 

None of them must go out into the great dirty world 
where there were cow-sheds in which nasty thing s 
could happen and be seen by little girls. 

You had them all. You curved your old wrinkled 
hand into a brown shell, and laughed to yourself. You 
held them like that ... in the hoUow of your hand, 
as the Lord held Israel. None of them had any 
money except what you gave them. You allowed 

142 



Micah, Urk, Caraway, Mark, Luke and Ezra tenpence 
a week eacli in pocket-money. Harkaway had a 
shilling, to cover his fare by bus down into Beershom 
and back. You had your heel on them all. They 
were your washpot, and you had cast your shoe out 
over them. 

Even Seth, your darling, your last and loveliest 
grandchild, you held in the hollow of your old palm. 
He had one and sixpence a week pocket-money. 
Amos had none. Judith had none. 

How like yaks were your drowsy thoughts, slowly 
winding round in the dim air of your quiet room. The 
winter landscape, breaking under spring’s pressure, 
beat urgently against the panes. 

So you sat here, living from meal to meal (Monday, 
pork ; Tuesday beef ; Wednesday, toad - in - the - 
hole ; Thursday, mutton ; Friday, veal ; Saturday, 
curry ; Sunday, cutlets). Sometimes . . . you were 
so old . . . how could you know ? . . , you dropped 
soup on yourself . . . you whimpered. . . . Once 
Judith brought up the kidneys for your breakfast and 
they were too hot and burned your tongue. . . . Day 
slipped into day, season into season, year into year. 
And you sat here, alone. You. . . . Gold Comfort 
Farm. 

Sometimes Urk came to see you, the second child of 
your sister’s man by marriage, and told you that the 
farm was rotting away. 

No matter. There have always been Starkadders 
at Cold Comfort. 

Well, let it rot. . . . You couldn’t have a farm 
without sheds (cow, wood, tool, bicycle and potting), 

143 



and where there were sheds things were bound to 
rot, . . . Besides, so far as you could see from your 
bi-weekly inspection of the farm account books, things 
weren’t doing too badly. . . . Anyway, here you were, 
and here they all stayed with you. 

You told them you were mad. You had been mad 
since you saw something nasty in the woodshed, years 
and years and years ago. If any of them went away, 
to any other part of the country, you would go much 
madder. Any attempt by any of them to get away 
from the farm made one of your attacks of madness 
come on. It was unfortunate in some ways but useful 
in others. . . . The woodshed incident had twisted 
something in your child-brain, seventy years ago. 

And seeing that it was because of that incident that 
you sat here ruling the roost and having five meals a 
day brought up to you as regularly as clockwork, it 
hadn’t been such a bad break for you, that day you 
saw something nasty in the woodshed. 


144 



CHAPTER XI 


T he bull was bellowing. The steady sound went 
up into the air in a dark red column. Seth 
leaned moodily on the hoot-piece, watching Reuben, 
who was slowly but deftly repairing a leak in the 
midden-rail. Not a bud broke the dark feathery faces 
of the thorns but the air whined with sprue’s passage. 
It was eleven in the morning. A bird sang his idiotic 
recitative from the dairy roof. 

Both brothers looked up as flora came across die 
yard dressed for her walk upon the Downs. She 
looked enquiringly at the shed, whence issued the 
shocking row made by Big Business, the bull. 

“ I think it would be a good idea if you let him 
out,” she said. Seth grinned and nudged Reuben, 
who coloiured duUy. 

“ I don’t mean for stud purposes. I meant amply 
for air and exercise,” said Flora. “ You caimot 
expect a bull to produce healthy stock if he is shut up 
in the smelly dark all day.” 

Seth disapproved of the impersonal note which the 
conversation had taken, so he lounged away. But 
Reuben was always ready to listen to advice which had 
the good of the farm at heart, and Flora had dis- 
covered this. He said, quite civilly : 

“ Ay, ’tes true. We mun let un out in the great 
field to-morrow.” He returned to his repairing of the 

145 



middcn-rail, but just as Flora was waiting away he 
looked up again and remarked : 

“ So ye went wi’ the old devil, eh ? ” 

Flora was l earnin g how to translate the Starkadder 
argot, and took this to mean that she had, last week, 
accompanied her Cousin Amos to the Chmch of the 
Qjiivcring Brethren. She replied in tones just tinged 
with polite surprise : 

“lam not quite sure what you mean, but if you mean 
did I go with Coxisin Amos to Beershom, yes, I did.” 

“ Ay, ye went. And did the old devil say anything 
about me ? ” 

Flora could only recall a remark about dead men’s 
shoes, which it would scarcely be prudent to repeat, 
so she replied that she did not remember much of 
what had been said because the sermon had been so 
powerful that it had driven ever3rthing eke out of her 
head. 

“ I was advising Cousin Amos,” she added, “ to 
address his sermons to a wider audience. I think he 
ought to go round the coimtry on a lorry, preaching 

9 > 

“ Frittenin’ the harmless birds off the bushes, more 
like ” interposed Reuben, gloonaily. 

“ at feirs and on market days. You see, if 

Cousin Amos were away a good deal it woixld mpan 
that someone eke would have to take charge of the 
form, wouldn’t it ? ” 

“ Someone eke will have to take charge of it, in any 
case, when the old devil dies,” said Reuben. Stark 
passion curdled the whites of hk eyes and hk breath 
came thraw. 


146 



‘‘ Yes, of course,” said Flora. “ He talks of leaving 
it to Adam. Now, I don't think that would be at aU 
wise, do you ? To begin with, Adam is ninety. He 
has no children (at least, he has none so far as I know, 
and, of course, I do not listen to what Mrs. Beetle says), 
and I should not think he is likely to marry, should 
you ? Nor has he the legal type of mind. I shouldn’t 
imagine he would trouble to make a will, for example. 
And if he did make one, who knows who he would 
leave the farm to ? He might leave it to Feckless, or 
even to Aimless, and that would mean a lot of legal 
trouble, for I doubt if two cows can inherit a farm. 
Then, again, Pointless and Graceless might put in a 
claim for it, and that could easily mean an endless 
lawsuit in which all the resources of the farm would 
be swallowed up. Oh, no, I hardly think it would do 
for Cousin Amos to leave the farm to Adam. I think 
it would be much better if he were persuaded to go on 
a preaching tour round England, or perhaps to retire 
to some village a long way off and write a nice long 
book of sermons. Then whoever was left in charge of 
the farm could get a good grip of affairs here, and 
when Cousin Amos did come back at last, he woxild 
see that the management of the farm must be left in 
the hands of that person in order to save all the bother 
of getting things reorganised. You see, Reuben, 
Cousin Amos could not think of leaving the farm to 
Adam then, because the person who had been manag- 
ing it would obviously be the person to leave it to.” 

She faltered a little towards the end of her speech 
as she recalled that the Starkadders rarely did what 
was obvious though they were only too embarrassingly 

147 



ready to do what was natural. Nor did her remarks 
have the wished-for efifect upon Reuben. He said, in 
a voice thick with fury : 

“ Meanin’ you ? ” 

“ No, indeed. I’ve already told you, Reuben, that 
I should be no use at all at running the farm. I do 
think you might believe me.” 

“ If ye doan’t mean you, who do ye mean ? ” 

Flora abandoned diplomacy, and said, “ You.” 

“Me?” 

“Ay, you.” She patiently dropped into Stark- 
addcr. 

He stared thickly at her. She observed with distaste 
that his chest was extremely hairy. 

“ ’Tes impossible,” he said at last. “ The old lady 
would never let him go.” 

“ Why not ? ” asked Flora. “ Why should he not 
go ? Why does Aunt Ada Doom like to keep you all 
here, as though you were all children ? ” 

“ She — she — she’s ill,” stammered Reuben, casting 
a fleeting glance at the closed, dusty windows of the 
farm high above his head, where the lin-tits were 
already building under the sheaves. “ If any on us 
says we’ll leave the farm, she gets an attack. There 
have always been Starkadders at Cold Comfort. None 
on us mun go, except Harkaway, when he takes the 
money down to the bank at Beershom every Saturday 
morning.” 

“ But you all go into Beershorn sometimes.” 

“ Ay, but ’tes a great risk. If she knew, ’twould 
bring on an attack.” 

“ An attack ? What of? ” 

148 


Flora was getting a 



litde impatient Unlike Charles, she deplored a 
gloomy mystery. 

“Her — her illness. She — she ain’t like other 
people’s grandmothers. When she was no bigger than 
a linnet, she saw 

“ Oh, Reuben, do hurry up and tell me, there’s a 
good soul. All the sun will be gone by the time I get 
up on to the Downs.” 

“ She — she’s mad.” 

Flat and dark, the word lay between them in the 
indifferent air. Time, which had been behaving 
normally lately, suddenly began to spin upon a bright 
point in endless space. It never rains but it pours. 

“ Oh,” said Flora, thoughtfully. 

So that was it. Aunt Ada Doom was mad. You 
would expect, by all the laws of probability, to find a 
mad grandmother at Cold Comfort Farm, and for 
once the laws of probability had not done you down 
and a mad grandmother there was. 

Flora observed, tapping her shoe with her walking- 
stick, that it was very awkward. 

“ Ay,” said Reuben, “ ’tes terrible. And her mad- 
ness takes the form of wantin’ to know everything as 
goes on. She has to see all the books twice a week : 
the milk book an’ the chicken book an’ the pig book 
and com book. If we keeps the books back, she has 
an attack. ’Tes terrible. She’s the head of the 
family, ye see. We mun keep her alive at all costs. 
She never comes downstairs but twice a year — on the 
first of May and on the last day of the harvest festival. 
If anybody cats too much, she has an attack. ’Tes 
terrible.” 


IX 


149 



“ It is, indeed,” agreed Flora. It struck her that 
Aunt Ada Doom’s madness had taken the most con- 
venient form possible. If everybody who went mad 
could arrange in what way it was to take them, she 
felt pretty sure they would all choose to be mad like 
Ada Doom. 

“ Is that why she doesn’t want to see me ? ” she 
asked. “ I’ve been here nearly a month, you know, 
and I have never seen her yet.” 

“ Ay . . . maybe,” said Reuben, indifferently. His 
long speech seemed to have exhausted him. Hiis face 
was sodden, sunk in on itself in defensive folds. 

“ Well, anyway,” said Flora, briskly, “ because 
Aunt Ada is mad there is no reason why you should 
not try to persuade Cousin Amos to go on a preaching 
tour, and then manage the farm while he is away. 
You have a stab at it.” 

“ Do ye think,” said Reuben, slowly, “ that if I was 
to look after th’ farm while the old devil was away, 
moitherin’ about hell fire to a lot of fiittened birds and 
cows a long way off", he’d come back and see as I could 
do it, and maybe leave it to me for my own when he’s 
gone ? ” 

“ Yes, I do,” said Flora, firmly. 

Reuben’s face became contorted with a number of 
emotions, and suddenly, even as she watched him, 
victory was hers ! 

“ Ay,” he said, hoarsely, “ dang me if I doan’t din 
into the old devil how he must be oflF speechifyin’ this 
very week.” 

And much to her smprise he held out his hand to 
her. She took it and shook it warmly. This was the 

150 



first sign of humanity she had encountered among the 
Starkadders, and she was moved by it. She felt like 
stout Cortez or Sir James Jeans on spotting yet another 
white dwarf. 

She was cheerful as she walked away towards the 
downland path. If Reuben did not overdo the per- 
suading stunt (and this was a real danger, for Amos 
was astute and would soon see through any obvious 
attempt to get rid of him) her plan should succeed. 

It was a fresh, pleasant morning and she felt the 
more disposed to enjoy her walk because Mr. Mybug 
(she could not learn to think of him as Meyerburg) 
was not with her. For the last three mornings he had 
been with her, but this morning he had said that he 
really ought to do some work. Flora did not see why, 
but one excuse was as good as another to get rid of him. 

It cannot be said that Flora really enjoyed taking 
walks with Mr. Mybug. To begin with, he was not 
really interested in anything but sex. This was under- 
standable, if deplorable. After all, many of our best 
minds have had the same weakness. The trouble 
about Mr, Mybug was that ordinary objects, which are 
not usually associated with sex even by our best minds, 
did suggest sex to Mr, Mybug, and he pointed them 
out and made comparisons and asked Flora what she 
thought about it all. Flora found it difiicult to reply 
because she was not interested. She was therefore 
obliged merely to be polite, and Mr. Mybug mistook 
her lack of enthusiasm and thought it was due to 
inhibitions. He remarked how curious it was that 
most Englishwomen (most young Englishwomen, that 
was, Englishwomen of about nineteen to twenty-four) 

151 



were inhibited. Cold, that was what young English- 
women from nineteen to twenty-four were. 

They used sometimes to walk through a pleasant 
wood of young birch trees which were just be ginnin g 
to come into bud. The stems reminded Mr. Mybug 
of phallic symbols and the buds made Mr. Mybug 
thiidc of nipples and virgins. Mr. Mybug pointed out 
to Flora that he and she were walking on seeds which 
were germinating in the womb of the earth. He said 
it made him feel as if he were trampling on the body 
of a great brown woman. He felt as if he were a 
partner in some mighty rite of gestation. 

Flora used sometimes to ask him the name of a 
tree, but he never knew. 

Yet there were occasions when he was not reminded 
of a pair of large breasts by the distant hills. Then, 
he would stand looking at the woods upon the horizon. 
He would wrinkle up his eyes and breathe deeply 
through his nostrils and say that the view reminded 1dm 
of one of Poussin’s lovely things. Or he would pause 
and peer in a pool and say it was like a painting by 
Manet. 

And, to be fair to Mr. Mybug, it must be admitted 
he was sometimes interested by the social problems of 
the day. Only yesterday, while he and Flora were 
walking through an alley of rhododendrons on an estate 
which was open to the public, he had discussed a case 
of arrest in Hyde Park. The rhododendrons made him 
think of Hyde Park. He said that it was impossible 
to sit down for five minutes in Hyde Park after seven 
o’clock in the evening without being either accosted or 
arrested. 


15a 



There were many homosexuals to be seen in Hyde 
Park. Prostitutes, too. God ! those rhododendron 
buds had a phallic, urgent look ! 

Sooner or later we should have to tackle the problem 
of homosexuality. We should have to tackle the 
problem of Lesbians and old maids. 

God ! that little pool down there in the hollow was 
shaped just like somebody’s navel ! He would like to 
drag off his clothes and leap into it. There was 
another problem. . . . We should have to tackle that, 
too. In no other country but England was there so 
much pruriency about nakedness. If we all went 
about naked, sexual desire would automatically dis- 
appear. Had Flora ever been to a party where 
everybody took off all their clothes ? Mr. Mybug 
had. Once a whole lot of us bathed in the river with 
no thing on and afterwards little Harriet Belmont 
sat naked in the grass and played to us on her flute. 
It was delicious ; so gay and simple and natural. 
And Billie Polswett danced a Haiwaian love-dance, 
making sill the gestures that are usually omitted in 
the stage version. Her husband had danced too. It 
had been lovely ; so warm and natural and real, 
somehow. 

So, taking it all rotmd, Flora was pleased to have 
her walk in solitude. 

She passed a girl riding on a pony and two young 
men walking with knapsacks and sticks, but no one 
else. She went down into a valley, filled with bushes 
of hazel and gorse, and made her way towards a little 
house built of grey stones, its roof painted turquoise 
green, which stood on the other rise of the Down. It 

153 



was a shepherd’s hut ; she could see the stone hut 
close to it in which the ewes were kept at lambing- 
time and a shallow trough from which they drank. 

If Mr. Mybug had been there, he would have said 
that the ewes were paying the female thing’s tribute to 
the Life Force. He said a woman’s success could only 
be estimated by the success of her sexual life, and 
Flora supposed he would say the same thing about 
a ewe. 

Oh, she was so glad he wasn’t there ! 

She went skipping the comer of the little sheep- 
house and saw Elfine, sitting on a turf and sunning 
herself. 

Both cousins were startled. But Flora was quite 
pleased. She wanted a chance to talk to Elfine. 

Elfine jumped to her feet and stood poised ; she had 
something of the brittle grace of a yearlmg foal. A 
dryad’s smile played on the curious sullen pmdty of her 
mouth, but her eyes were unawake and imfriendly. 
Flora thought, “ \^at a dreadful way of doiag one’s 
hair ; surely it must be a mistake.” 

“You’re Flora — I’m Elfine,” said the other girl 
simply. Her voice had a breathless, broken quality 
that suggested the fluty sexless timbre of a choir-boy’s 
notes (only choir-boys are seldom sexless, as many a 
harassed vicarcss knows to her cost). 

“ No prizes offered,” thought Flora, rather rudely. 
But she said politely : “ Yes. Isn’t it a delicious 
morning. Have you been far ? ” 

“Yes. . . . No. . . . Away over there. . . .” The 
vague gesture of her outflvmg arm sketched, in some 
curious fashion, illimitable horizons. Judith’s gestures 

154 



had the same barrierless quality ; there was not a vase 
left anywhere in the farm. 

“ I feel stifled in the house,” Elfine went on, shyly 
smd abruptly. “ I hate houses.” 

“ Indeed ? ” said Flora. 

She observed Elfine draw a deep breath, and knew 
that she was about to get well away on a good long 
description of herself and her habits, as these shy dryads 
always did if you gave them half a chance. So she sat 
down on another turf in the sun and composed herself 
to listen, looking up at the tall Elfine. 

“ Do you like poetry ? ” asked Elfine, suddenly. A 
pure flood of colour ran up under her skin. Her 
hands, biumt and bone-modeUed as a boy’s, were 
clenched. 

“ Some of it,” responded Flora, cautiously. 

“ I adore it,” said Elfine, simply. “ It says all the 
things I can’t say for myself . . . somehow. ... It 
means . . . oh, I don’t know. Just everything, some- 
how. It’s enough. Do you ever feel that ? ” 

Flora replied that she had, occasionally, felt some- 
thing of the sort, but her reply was limited by the fact 
that she was not quite sure exactly what Elfine meant. 

“ I write poetry,” said Elfine. (So I was right ! 
thought Flora). “ I’U show you some ... if you 
promise not to laugh. I can’t bear my children to be 
laughed at. ... I call my poems my children.” 

Flora felt that she could promise this with safety. 

“ And love, too,” muttered Elfine, her voice breaking 
and changing shyly like the Finnish ice under the fimt 
lusty rays and wooing winds of the Finnish spring. 
“ Love and poetry go together, somehow . . . out 

155 



here on the hills, when I’m alone with my dreams . . . 
oh, I can’t tell you how I feel. I’ve been chasing a 
squirrel all the morning.” 

Flora said severely : 

“ Elfine, are you engaged ? ” 

Her cousin stood perfectly still. Slowly the colour 
receded from her face. Her head drooped. She 
muttered : “ There’s someone. . . . We don’t want 
to spoil things by having anything definite and binding 
. . . it’s horrible ... to bind anyone down.” 

“ Nonsense. It is a very good idea,” said Flora, 
austerely, “ and it is a good thing for you to be bound 
down, too. Now what do you suppose will happen to 
you if you don’t marry this Someone ? ” 

Elfine’s face brightened. “ Oh . . . but I’ve got it 
all planned out,” she said, eagerly. “ I shall get a job 
in an arts and crafts shop in Horsham and do barbola 
work in my spare time. I shall be all right . . . and 
later on I can go to Italy and perhaps learn to be a 
little like St. Francis of Assisi.” . . . 

“ It is quite unnecessary for a yormg woman to 
resemble St. Francis of Assisi,” said Flora, coldly ; 
“ and in your case it would be dowmight suicidal. A 
large girl like you must wear clothes that fit ; and, 
Elfine, whatever you do, always wear court shoes. 
Remember — c-o-u-r-t. You are so handsome that you 
can wear the most conventional clothes and look very 
well in them ; but do, for heaven’s sake, avoid orange 
linen jumpers and hand-wrought jewellery. Oh, and 
shawls in the evening.” 

She paused. She saw by Elfine’s .expression that she 
had been progressing too quickly. Elfine looked 

156 



puzzled and extremely wretched. Flora was penitent. 
She had taken a fancy to the ridiculous chit. She said 
in a very friendly tone, drawing her cousin down to sit 
beside her : 

“ Now, what is it ? Tell me. Do you hate being at 
home ? » 

“ Yes . . . but I’m not often there,” whispered 
Elfine. “ No . . . it’s Urk.” 

Urk. . . . That was the foxy-looking little man who 
was always staring at Flora’s ankles or else spitting 
into the well. 

“ What about Urk ? ” she demanded. 

“ He . . . they ... I think he wants to marry 
me,” stammered Elfine. “ I think Grandmother 
means me to marry him when I am eighteen. He . . . 
he . . . climbs the apple-tree outside my window and 
tries to watch me going to ... to bed. I had to 
hang up three face-towels over the window, and then 
he poked them down with a fishing-rod and laughed 
and shook his fist at me. ... I don’t know what 
to do.” 

Flora was justly indignant, but concealed her nasty 
temper. It was at this moment that she resolved to 
adopt Elfin e and rescue her in the teeth of all the 
Starkadders of Gold Comfort. 

“ And does Someone know this ? ” she asked. 

« Well ... I told him.” 

“What did he say?” 

“ Oh ... he said ‘ Rotten luck, old girl ’.” 

“ It’s Dick Hawk-Monitor, isn’t it ? ” 

“ Oh . . . how did you know ? Oh ... I sup- 
pose everybody knows by now. It’s beastly.” 

157 



“ Things arc certainly in rather a mess, but I do 
not tliinlf we need go so far as to say they are beastly,” 
said Flora, more calmly. “Now, you must forgive 
my asking you these questions, Elfine, but has the 
young Hawk-Monitor actually asked you to marry 
him?” 

“ Well ... he said he thought it would be a good 
idea if we did.” 

“ Bad . . . bad . . .” muttered Flora, shaking her 
head. “Forgive me, but does he seem to love 
you ? ” 

“He ... he does when I’m there. Flora, but I 
don’t somehow think he thinks much about me when 
I’m not there.” 

“ And I suppose you care enough for him, my dear, 
to wish to become his wife ? ” 

Elfine after some hesitation admitted that she had 
sometimes been selfish enough to wish that she had 
Dick aU to herself. It appeared that there was a 
dangerous cousin named Pamela who came down 
often firom London for week-ends. Dick thought she 
was great fun. 

Flora’s expression did not change when she heard 
this piece of news, but her spirits sank. It would be 
difficult enough to win Dick for Elfine as it was ; it 
would be a thousandfold more diflScult with a rival 
in the field. 

But her spirit was of that rare brand which becomes 
cold and pleased at the prospect of a battle, and her 
dismay did not last. 

Elfine was saying : 

“ . . . And then there’s this dance. Of course, I 
158 



hate dancing unless it’s in the woods with the wind- 
flowers and the birds, but I did rather want to go to 
this one, because, you see, it’s Dick’s twenty-first 
birthday party and . . . somehow ... I think it 
would be rather fun.” 

Amusing, or diverting . . . not ^ rather fun 
corrected Flora, kindly. Have you not been in- 
vited ? ” 

Oh, no. . . . You see. Grandmother does not 
allow the Starkadders to accept invitations, unless it 
is to funerals or the churching of women. So now no 
one sends us invitations. Dick did say he wished that 
I was coming, but I think he was only being kind. 
I don’t think he really thought for a minute that I 
should be able to.” 

‘‘ I suppose it would be of no use asking your 
grandmother for permission to go ? In dealing with 
old and tyrannical persons it is wise to do the correct 
thing whenever one can ; they are then less likely to 
suspect when one does something incorrect.” 

“ Oh, I am sure she would never let me go. She 
quarrelled with Mr. Hawk-Monitor nearly thirty 
years ago and she hates Dick’s mother. She would 
be mad with rage if she thought that I even knew Dick. 
Besides, she thinks dancing is wicked.” 

An interesting survival of mediaeval superstition,” 
commented Flora. ‘‘Now listen, Elfine. I think it 
would be an excellent move if you went to this dance. 
I will try and see if I can manage it. I shall go, too, 
and keep an eye on you. It may be a little difficult 
to secure invitations for us, but I wiU do my best. 
And when we have got our invitations, I will take 

159 



you up to Town with me and we will buy you a 
frock.” 

“ Oh, Flora ! ” 

Flora was pleased to see that the wild-bird-cum- 
dryad atmosphere which hung over Elfine like a 
pestilential vapour was wearing thin. She was talking 
quite naturally. If this was the good effect of a little 
ordinary feminine gossip and a little interest in her 
poor childish affairs, the effect of a well-cut dress and 
a brushed and burnished head of hair might be miracu- 
lous. Flora could have rubbed her hands with glee. 

“ When is this dance ? ” she asked. “ Will many 
people be asked ? ” 

. “ It’s on the twenty-first of April, just a month from 
to-morrow. Oh, yes, it will be very big ; they are 
holding it in the Assembly Rooms at Godmere, and aU 
the county will be asked, because, you see, it is Dick’s 
twenty-first birthday.” 

An the better, thought Flora. It will be easier to 
work an invitation. She had so many fidends in 
London ; surely there must be among them someone 
who knew these Hawk-Monitors ? And Claud Hart- 
Harris could come down to partner her, because he 
waltzed so well, and who could be an escort for 
Elfine ? ” 

“ Does Seth dance ? ” she asked. 

“ I don’t know. I hate him,” replied Elfine, simply. 

“ I cannot say that I like him much myself,” con- 
fessed Flora, “ but if he dances, I think it would be as 
well if he came with us. You must have a partner, 
you know. Or perhaps you could ask some other 
man?” 

i6o 



But Elfine, being a dryad, naturally knew no other 
men ; and the only man Flora could think of who 
would be sure to be available for April 21st was 
Mr. Mybug. She had only to ask Um, she knew, and 
he would come bounding along to partner Elfi n e. It 
was dreadful to have no choice but Seth or Mr. Mybug, 
but Sussex was like that. 

“ Well, we can arrange these details later,” she said. 
“ What I must do now is to find out if anyone in 
London among my friends knows these Hawk- 
Monitors. I wiU ask Claud ; he knows positive herds 
of people who live in country houses. I will write to 
him this afternoon.” 

She was well disposed enough towards Elfine, but 
she really did not wish to spend with her the rest of 
an exquisite morning. So she rose to her feet and 
with a pleasant smile (having promised her cousin to 
let her know how matters were progressing) she went 
on her way. 



CHAPTER XII 


C LAUD HART-HARRIS wrote from his house at 
Chiswick Mall a few days later in reply to Flora’s 
letter. He knew the Hawk-Moniton. Papa was 
dead. Mamma was a darling old bird whose hobby 
was the Higher Thought. There was a son who was 
easy on the eye but slow on the uptake, and a healthy 
sort of daughter named Joan. He thought he coiild 
arrange four invitations for Flora, if she was sure she 
wanted them? Would it not be rather a tiresome 
affair ? But if she really wanted to go, he would write 
to Mrs. Hawk-Monitor and tell her that a friend of 
his was in exile on a farmhouse at Howling, and that 
she would love to come to the ball and bring her girl 
cousin and two young men. He, Claud, would of 
course be charmed to partner Flora, but, candidly, 
Seth sounded pretty squalid. Need he come ? 

“ Squalid or not,” said the small, clear voice of 
Flora, fifty miles away (for she thought she would 
answer his letter by telephone, as she was in a hurry 
to get the affair arranged), “ he is aU we can find, 
unless we have that Mr. Mybug I told you about. 
I would really rather we did not have him, Claud. 
You know how dreadful intelligent people are when 
you take them to dances.” 

Claud twisted the television dial and amused himself 
by studying Flora’s feir, pensive face. Her eyes were 

163 



lowered and her mouth compressed over the serious 
business of arranging Elfine’s future. He fancied she 
was tracing a pattern with the tip of her shoe. She 
could not look at him, because public telephones were 
not fitted with television dials. 

‘‘ Oh, yes, we certainly don’t want a lot of intelligent 
conversation,” he said, decidedly. “ I think we will 
rule out the Mybug. Well, then, I will write to Mrs. 
Hawk-Monitor to-day, and let you know as soon as I 
hear. Or perhaps I had better ask her to send the 
invitations direct to you, shall I ? ” 

And so it was arranged. 

Flora came out of the post office at Beershorn into 
the pleasant sunshine feeling a little ashamed of her 
schemes. Claud had said Mrs. Hawk-Monitor was a 
darling. Flora was planning to palm off Elfine on the 
darling’s only son. She strained her imagination, but 
found that it refused to present her with a picture of 
Mrs. Hawk- Monitor welcoming Elfine with joy as a 
daughter-in-law. Mrs. Hawk-Monitor’s hobby might 
be the Higher Thought, but Flora felt sure she would 
be practical enough when it was a question of con- 
sidering a wife for Richard. She would not be 
sympathetic, in spite of her own leanings, with Elfine’s 
artiness. Elfine would have to be transformed, inside 
and out, before Mrs. Hawk-Monitor could consider 
her suitable ; and even if the transformation were 
made, Mrs. Hawk-Monitor could not possibly approve 
Elfine’s family. Who, indeed, could approve of such 
figures of rugged but slightly embarrassing grandeur as 
Micah and Judith ? 

And the Starkadders themselves would be sure, 
163 



when the engagement was announced, to kick up one 
hell of a shine. 

Difficult times lay ahead. 

But this was what Flora liked. She detested rows 
and scenes, but enjoyed quietly pitting her cool will 
ag ains t opposition. It amused her ; and when she 
was defeated, she withdrew in good order and lost 
interest in the campaign. She had little or no sporting 
spirit. Bloody battles to the death bored her, nor did 
she like other people to win. 

But it was no f^ to fight a darling. Flora herself, 
had she been sixty-five and Mrs. Hawk-Monitor, 
would have felt most bitter towards a girl who planted 
an Elfine into the midst of a quiet county family. 

There was only one way of soothing her tiresome 
conscience. Elfine must be transformed indeed ; her 
artiness must be rooted out. Her mind must match 
the properly groomed head in which it was housed. 
Her movements must be made less firequent, and her 
conversation less artless. She must write no more 
poetry nor go for any more long walks unless accom- 
panied by the proper sort of dog to take on long walks. 
She must learn to be serious about horses. She must 
learn to laugh when a book or a string quartet was 
mentioned, and to confess that she was not brainy. 
She must learn to be long-limbed and clear-eyed and 
inhibited. The first two qualities she possessed already, 
and the last she must set to work to acquire at once. 

Ajid there were only twenty-seven days in which to 
teach her all these things ! 

Flora walked down the High Street towards the 
place where the buses started, pla nning how she would 

164 



begin Elfine’s education. She looked at the clock on 
the Town Hall, which said twelve, and realised that 
she had half an hour to wait for a bus. It was a 
Saturday morning and the town was full of people 
who had come in from outlying farms and villages to 
do their shopping for the week-end ; some of them 
were already waiting for the bus, and Flora walked 
across the Market Place, prepared to wait with them. 

But then she became aware that someone, a man, 
was trying to attract her attention. She was very 
properly not looking at him when something in his 
appearance seemed familiar to her ; he looked like a 
Starkadder (there were so many of them that one of 
her minor worries was a fear of not recognising one 
when she met him in the street). Sure enough, it was 
Harkaway. He had just come out of the bank, into 
which he had been paying the weekly takings of the 
farm. In a second Flora recognised him, and said 
Good morning,” with a bow and a smile. 

He returned her greeting in the Starkadder manner, 
that is, with a suspicious stare. He looked as though 
he would have Hked to ask her what she was doing in 
Beershom. She decided that if he did she would 
undo the parcel of pale green silk she carried and 
shake it in his face all down the High Street. 

Harkaway stopped in front of her and out- 
manoeuvred her in her advance on the bus. 

You’m a long way from whoam,” he muttered. 

So are you,” retorted Flora. She was rather cross. 
Ay, but I ha’ business to do in Beershom every 
Saturday, I comes down every Saturday morning in 
the year, wi’ Viper,” and he jerked his head towards 
« 165 



that lai^c and disagreeable beast, which Flora now 
observed anchored to the buggy a little way farther on. 

“ Indeed. I came by bus.” 

A slow, secret smile crept into Harkaway’s face. It 
was wolfish, ursine, vulpine. He softly jangled some 
coins in his pocket. He seemed as though he bathed 
in some secret satisfaction of his own. This was 
because he had driven down to Beershom in the buggy, 
and saved the shilling his grandmother gave him every 
week for the fare. 

“ Ay, th’ bus. . . .” he repeated, drawlingly. 

“Yes, the bus. There isn’t another one until 
half-past twelve.” 

“ Happen I might drive you home vrith me,” he 
suggested, as Flora had meant him to do. Her dis- 
inclination to sit in the damp, smelly bus had fought 
with her disinclination to drive home with a Starkadder, 
and the bus had lost. Besides, she was always glad 
to see more of the private lives of the Starkadders. 
Harkaway might be able to tell her something about 
Urk, who was supposed to be going to marry Elfine. 

“ That would be very kind of you,” she said, and 
they moved off together to the buggy. 

She looked at him meditatively as the buggy passed 
rapidly between the hedges. She wondered what was 
hw particular nastiness ? She could hardly distinguish 
him from Urk and Caraway, Ezra, Luke and Mark. 
Never mind, probably she would get them sorted out 
in time. 

She began to make conversation. 

“ How is the wdl getting on ? ” (Not that she 
cared.) 


i66 



“ ’Tes all collapsed. ’Tes terrible.” 

“ Oh, I am so sorry ! What a pity. The last 
time I saw it, it was nearly finished. How did it 
happen ? ” 

“ ’Twas Mark. He and our Micah was argyfyin’ 
who should lay the last brick, and we was all stan^n’ 
round waitin’ to see which would hit t’other first. 
And Mark, he pushed Micah down th’ well, and 
pushed th’ bricks down on top of ’un. Laugh ! We 
fair lay on th’ ground.” 

“ Was — ^is Micah — er — ^is he badly hurt ? ” 

“ Nay. Mark dived in after ’un and rescued ’un. 
But th’ bricks was lost.” 

“ A pity, indeed,” commented Flora. 

She was much surprised when Harkaway burst out : 

“Ay, ’tis a pity. There’s some at Gold Comfort 
would do better for a few bricks thrown at their heads. 
I names no names but I know what I think.” 

The coins jingled softly again in his pocket. The 
ursine snule touched his lips. 

“ Who ? ” asked Flora. 

“ Her . . . th’ old lady. My grand-aunt. Her as 
has us aU under her thumb.” He jingled the coins 
again. 

“ Ah, yes, my aunt,” said Flora, thoughtfully. She 
found Harkaway comparatively easy to talk to. Nor 
did he seem imMcndly, 

“ I cannot understand,” she resumed, “ why you do 
not break away from her. I suppose she has all the 
money.” 

“Ay . . . and she’s mad. If any on us was to 
leave th’ ferm, she’d go madder yet. ’Twould be a 

167 



terrible disgrace on us. We mun keep the head of 
the family alive and in her right mind. There have 
always been ” 

“ I knoWj I know,” said Flora, hastily. “ Such a 
comfort, I always feel, don’t you ? But really, 
Harkaway, I do think it is carrying authority a little 
too far when grown men are prevented from marry- 

: » 

mg 

Harkaway laughed shortly, rather to Flora’s dismay ; 
she feared he was going to make a farmyard joke. 
But he said, much more surprisingly : 

“ Nay, nay. Some on us is married right enough. 
But th’ old lady, she mun niver see our women-folk, 
or she’d go right away mad. The women-folk of the 
Starkadders keeps themselves to themselves. They 
lives down in the village and only comes up when 
there’s a gatherin’, or th’ old lady comes downstairs. 
There’s Micah’s Susan, Mark’s Phoebe, Luke’s Prue, 
Caraway’s Letty, Ezra’s Jane. Urk, he’m a bachelor. 
Me . . . I’ve got me own troubles.” 

Flora longed to ask what his own troubles were, but 
feared that the question might bring forth a flood of 
embarrassing confidences. Perhaps he was in love 
with Mrs. Beetle ? Meanwhile, his news was so 
surprising that she could only stare and stare again. 

“ And do you mean to say that they all live down 
in the village. Five women ? ” 

“ Six women,” corrected Harkaway, in a low voice. 
“ Ay, there’s — ^another. There’s poor daft Rennett.” 

“ Really ? What relation is she to the others ? ” 

“ She’m own daughter to Micah’s Susan by her 
first marriage. Her marriage to Mark, I mean ; and 

i68 



Mark, he’s own half-brother to Amos, who is Micah’s 
cousin. So ’tes rather confusin’, like. Ay, poor 
Rennett. , . 

What is the matter with ? ” enquired Flora, 
rather tartly. She was exceedingly dismayed at the 
news that there was a whole horde of female Stark- 
adders whom she had not seen. It really seemed as 
though her task would be too much for her. 

She were disappointed o’ Mark Dolour, ten years 
ago. She’s never married. She’s queer, like, in her 
head. Sometimes, when the sukebind hangs heavy 
from the passin’ wains, she jumps down th’ well. Ay, 
an’ twice she’s tried to choke Meriam, the hired 
girl. ’Tes Nature, you may say, turned sour in her 
veins.” 

Flora was really quite glad when the buggy stopped 
outside the farm. She wanted to hear no more. She 
felt that she could not undertake to rescue Susan, 
Letty, Phoebe, Prue, Jane and Rennett as well as 
Elfine, Dash it, the women must take their chance. 
She would rescue Elfine, and as soon as that was 
accomplished, she would try to have a show-down with 
Aunt Ada, but beyond this she would make no promises. 


For the next three weeks she was so busy with 
Elfine that she had no time to worry about the un- 
known female Starkadders. 

She spent most of her time with Elfine. She 
expected at first that someone would interfere, and 
try to stop Elfine and her from going for their morning 
walk along the top of the Downs and from spending 

169 



the afternoons in Flora’s little green parlour. These 
habits were innocent, but that was not enough to keep 
the Starkadders firom trying to stop them. Nay, their 
very iimocency was more likely to set the grand, rugged 
Starkadder machinery in motion. For it is a pecu- 
liarity of persons who lead rich, emotioned lives, and 
who (as the saying is) live intensely and with a wild 
poetry, that they read all kinds of meanings into 
comparatively simple actions, especially the actions of 
other people, who do not live intensely and with a 
wild poetry. Thus you may find them weeping 
passionately on their bed, and be told that you — ^you 
alone — arc the cause because you said that awful thing 
to them at lunch. Or they wonder why you like going 
to concerts ; there must be more in it than meets 
the eye. 

So the cojisins usually slipped out for their walks 
when no one was about 

Flora had learned, by experience, that she must ask 
permission of the Starkadders if she wanted to go down 
into Beershom, or if (as she did a week or so after her 
arrival) she wanted to buy a pot of apricot jam for 
tea. On this occasion she had foimd Judith lying face 
downwards in the furrows of Ticklepeimy’s Comer, 
weeping. In reply to her question, Judith had said 
that anybody might do anything they pleased, so long 
as she was left alone with her sorrow. Flora took this 
generous statement to mean that she might pay for 
the jam. 

And so she did ; but on the whole she spent little 
money at Gold Comfort, and so she had nearly eighty 
poun^ to spend on Elfine. She decided that they 

170 



woTild go up to London together the day before the 
ball and buy her gown amd get her hair cut correctly. 

She wais pleased to be spending eighty pounds on 
Elfine. If she succeeded in making Dick Hawk- 
Monitor propose to Elfine it would be a successful 
geste in the face of the Starkadders. It would be a 
triumph of the Higher Common Sense over Aimt Ada 
Doom. It would be a victory for Flora’s philosophy 
of life over the sub-conscious life-philosophy of the 
Starkadders. It would be like a splendid deer stepping 
haughtily across a ploughed field. 

For t^ee weeks she forced Elfine, as a gardener 
skilfully forces a flower in a hothouse. Her task was 
difficult, but might have been much more so. For 
Effine’s peculiarities of dress, outlook and behaviour 
were due only to her own youthful tastes. They had 
not been ground into her, for years, by older people. 
She was ready to shed them if something better was 
shown to her. Also, she was only seventeen years old, 
and docile ; when Flora planed away all the St. 
Francis-cmn-barbola work crust, she found beneath it 
an honest child, capable of loving calmly yet deeply, 
fiiendly and sweet-tempered and fond of pretty things. 

“ Have you always admired St. Francis ? ” asked 
Flora, as they sat one rainy afternoon in the little 
green parlom:, towards the end of the first week. 
“ I mean, who told you about him, and who taught 
you to wear those shocking clothes ? ” 

“ I wanted to be like Miss Ashford. She kept the 
Blue Bird’s Gage down in Howling for a month or 
two last summer. I went in there to tea once or twice. 
She was very kind to me. She used to have lovely 

171 



clothes — ^that is, I mean, they weren’t what you would 
call lovely, but I used to like them. She had a 
smock ” 

“ Embroidered with hollyhocks,” said Flora, re- 
signedly. “ And I’ll bet she wore her hair in shells 
round her ears and a pendant made of hammered 
silver with a bit of blue enamel in the middle. And 
did she try to grow herbs ? ” 

“ How did you know ? ” 

“ Never min d, I do know. And she talked to you 
about Brother Wind and Sister Sxm and the wind on 
the heath, didn’t she ? ” 

“Yes. . . . She had a picture of St. Francis feeding 
the birds. It was lovely.” 

“ And did you want to be like her, Elfine ? ” 

“ Oh, yes. . . . She never tried to make me like 
her, of course, but I did want to be. I used to copy 
her clothes. . . .” 

“Yes, well, never mind that now. Go on with 
your reading.” 

And Elfine obediently resumed her reading aloud 
of “ Our Lives firom Day to Day ” firom an April 
number of “ Vogue.” 'V^^en she had finished. Flora 
took her, page by page, through a copy of “ Chiffons ” 
which was devoted to descriptions and sketches of 
lingerie. Flora pointed out how these graceful petti- 
coats and night-gowns depended upon their pure line 
and ddicate embroidery for their beauty ; how aU 
gross romanticism was purged away, or expressed only 
in a fold or a flute of material. She then showed how 
the same delicacy might be fo\md in the style of Jane 
Austen, or a painting by Marie Laurencin. 

17a 



“ It is that kind of beauty,” said Flora, “ that 
you must leam to look for and admire in everyday 
life.” 

“ I like the night-gowns and * Persuasion said 
Elfine, “ but I don’t like ‘ Our Lives ’ very much, 
Flora. It’s all rather in a hurry, isn’t it, and wanting 
to teU you how nice it was ? ” 

“ I do not propose that you shall found a life- 
philosophy upon ‘ Our Lives from Day to Day,’ Elfine. 
I merely maie you read it because you will have to 
meet people who do that kind of thing, and you must 
on no account be all dewy and awed when you do 
meet them. You can, if you like, secretly despise 
them. Nor must you talk about Marie Laurencin to 
people who hunt. They will merely thinlr she is your 
new mare. No. I tell you of these things in order 
that you may have some standards, within yoursdf, 
with which secretly to compare the many new facts 
and people you will meet if you enter a new life.” 

She did not teU Elfine of “ The Higher Common 
Sense,” but quoted one or two of the Pensees to her, 
from time to time, and resolved to give her H. B. 
Mainwaring’s excellent translation of “ The H^her 
Common Sense ” as a wedding present. 

Elfine progressed. Her charming nature and Flora’s 
wise advice met and mingled naturally. Only over 
poetry was there a little struggle. Flora warned Elfine 
that she must write no more poetry if she wanted to 
marry into the county. 

“ I thought poetry was enough,” said Elfine, wist- 
fully. “ I mean, I thought poetry was so beautiful 
that if you met someone you loved, and you told them 

173 



you wrote poetry, that would be enough to make them 
love you, too.” 

“ On Ae contrary,” said Flora, firmly, “ most yoxmg 
men are alarmed on hearing that a young woman 
writes poetry. Combined with an ill-groomed head 
of hair and an eccentric style of dress, such an admission 
is almost fatal.” 

“ I shall write it secretly, and publish it when I am 
fifty,” said Elfine, rebelliously. 

Flora coldly raised her eyebrows, and decided that 
she would return to the attack when Elfine had had 
her hair cut and seen her beautiful new dress. 

They entered upon the third week in hopeful spirits. 
At first, Elfine had been bewildered and unhappy in 
the new worlds into which Flora led her. But as she 
grew at home in them, and became fond of Flora, she 
was happy, and bloomed like a rose-peony. She fed 
upon hope ; and even Flora’s confident spirit faltered 
before the thought of what a weltering ruin, what a 
desert, must ensue if those hopes were never achieved ! 

But they must be achieved ! Flora wrote as much 
to her ally, Claud Hart-Harris. She had chosen him, 
rather than Charles, as her escort to the Hawk- 
Monitor’s ball, because she felt that she would need 
all her powers of concentration to see herself and 
Elfine safely through the evening ; and if Charles 
came to partner her she would be conscious of a 
certain interest in their own personal relationship, a 
current of unsaid speeches, which would distract her 
feelings and perhaps confuse a litde her thoughts. 

Claud had written to say that she might expect the 
invitation on April 19th or so. So she came down to 

174 



breakfast in the kitchen on the mo rning of the nine- 
teenth with a pleasant sensation of excitement and 
anticipation. 

It was half-past eight. Mrs. Beetle had finished 
sweeping the floor and was shaking the mat out in the 
yard, in the sunshine. (It zJways surprised Flora to 
see the sun shining intb the yard at Cold Comfort ; 
she had a feeling that the rays ought to be short- 
circuited just outside the wall by the atmosphere of 
the farmhouse.) 

“ Ni smomin’,” screamed Mrs. Beetle, adding that 
we could do with a bit of it. 

Flora smilingly agreed and went across to the 
cupboard to take down her own litde green teapot (a 
present from Mrs. Smiling) and tin of China tea. 
She glanced out into the yard sind was pleased to see 
that none of the male Starkadders were about. Elfine 
wsis out on a walk. Judith was probably lying 
despairingly across her bed, looking with leaden eyes 
at the ceiling across which the first flies of the year 
were beginning monotonously to circle and crawl. 

The bull suddenly bellowed his thick, dark-red note. 
Flora paused, with the teapot in her hand, and looked 
thoughtfully out across the yard towards his shed. 

“ Mrs. Beetle,” she said, firmly, “ the bull ought to 
be let out. Could you help me do it ? Are you afraid 
of bulls ? ” 

“ Yes,” said Mrs. Beetle, “ I am afraid o’ bulls. 
And you don’t let ’im out, miss, not if I stand ’ere 
tin midnight. In all respect. Miss Post^ though you 
was to kill me for it.” 

“ We could guide him towards the gate with the 

175 



bull-fork, or whatever it is called,” suggested Flora, 
glancing at the implement which lay across two hooks 
at the side of the shed. 

“ No, miss,” said Mrs. Beetle. 

“ Well, I shall open the gate, and try to drive him 
through it,” said Flora, who was utterly terrified of 
hulls, and cows too, for tihat matter. “ You must wave 
your apron at him , Mrs. Beetle, and shout.” 

“ Yes, miss. I’ll go up to your bedroom window,” 
said Mrs. Beetle, “ and shout at ’im firom there. The 
sound’ll carry better.” 

And she nipped away like lightning before Flora 
could stop her. A few seconds later Flora heard her 
shoutin g shrilly firom the window overhead. 

“ Go on. Miss Poste. I’m ’ere ! ” 

Flora was now rather dismayed. The situation 
seemed to have developed much' more quickly than 
she had thought it would. She was extremely afiraid. 
She stood there, idly waving the teapot, and trying to 
remember all she had ever read about the habits of 
buUs. They ran at red. Well, they would not run 
at her ; she was all in green. They were savage, 
especially in spring (it was the middle of April, and 
the trees were in bud). They gored you. . . . 

Big Business bellowed again. It was a harsh, 
mournful sound ; there were old swamps and rotting 
horns buried in it. Flora ran across the yard and 
pushed open the gate leading into the big field facing 
the farm, fastening it back. Then she took down the 
buU-prong, or whatever it called itself, and, standing 
at a comfortable distance firom the shed, manoeuvred 
the catch back, and saw the door swing open. 

176 



Out came Big Business. It was a much l«s dramatic 
afiair than she had supposed it would be. He stood 
for a second or two bewildered by the light, with 
his big head swaying stupidly. Flora stood quite 
stiU. 

“ Eeee-yer ! Go on, yer old brute ! ” shrieked 
Mrs. Beetle. 

The bull lumbered off across the yard, stiU with 
his head down, towards the gate. Flora followed 
cautiously, holding the bull-prong. Mrs. Beetle 
screeched to her for the dear’s sake to be careful. 
Once Big Business half turned towards her, and she 
made a determined movement with the prong. Then, 
to her relief, he went through the gate into the grassy 
field, and she swung it to and shut it before he had 
time to turn round. 

“ Thare ! ” said Mrs. Beetle, loappearing at the 
kitchen door with the speed of a newspaper proprietor 
explaining his candidate’s failure at a by-dection. 
" I told you so ! ” 

Flora replaced the buH-prong and went back into 
the kitchen to make her breakfast. It was nine o’clock. 
The postman should arrive at any minute now. 

So she sat down to her breakfast in a position that 
gave her, through the kitchen window, a view of the 
path leading up to the farm, for she did not want 
any one of the Starkaddei^ to get the letters from the 
postman before she had seen whether the invitation 
to the Hawk Monitor ball was among them. 

But, to her dismay, just as the figture of the postman 
appeared at that point of the path where it curved 
over the hill towards the fermhouse, it was joined by 

177 



another figure. Flora craned her eyes above her cup 
to sec who it inight be. It was somebody who was 
hung about with a good many dead rabbits and 
pheasants in one way and another, so that his features 
were obscured firom view. He stopped, said some- 
thing to the postman, and Flora saw something white 
pass firom hand to hand. The rabbit-festooned 
Starkadder, whoever he might be, had forestalled her. 
She bit crossly into a piece of toast and continued to 
observe the approaching figure. He soon came close 
enough for her to see that it was Urk. 

She was much disconcerted. It could not have been 
worse. 

“ Turns you up, don’t it, seein’ ter-day’s dinner 
come in ’anging round someone’s neck like that ? ” 
observed Mrs. Beetle, who was loading a tray with 
food to take up to Mrs. Doom. “ Tcr-morrer’s, too, 
for all I know, and the day after’s. Give me cold 
storage, any day.” 

Urk opened the door of the kitchen and came slowly 
into the room. 

He had been shooting rabbits. His narrow nostrils 
were slightly distended to inhale the blood-odour firom 
the seventeen which hung round his neck. Their cold 
fur brushed his hands lightly and imploringly like 
little pleas for mercy, and his buttocks were softly 
brushed by the draggled tail-feathers of five pheasants 
which hung firom the pheasant-belt encircling his 
waist. He felt the weight of the twenty-five dead 
animals he bore (for there was a shrew or two in his 
breast-pocket) pulling him down, like heavy, dark- 
blooded roots into the dumb soil. He was drowsy 

178 



with killing, in the mood of a lion lying on a hippo- 
potamus with its mouth full. 

He held the letters in front of him, looking down at 
them with a sleepy stare. Flora saw, with a start of 
indignation, that his thumb had left a red mark upon 
an envelope addressed in Charleses neat hand. 

This was quite intolerable. She rose quickly to her 
feet, holding out her hand : 

** My letters, please,” she said, crisply. 

Urk pushed them across the table to her, but he 
kept one in his hand, turning it over curiously to look 
at a crest upon the back of the envelope. Oh, 
Lord ! ” thought Flora.) 

‘‘ I think that one is for me, too,” she said. 

Urk did not answer. He looked up at her, then 
down at the letter, then across at Flora again. When 
his voice came, it was a throaty snarl : 

Who’s writing to you from Howchiker ? ” 

Mary, Queen of Scots. Thanks,” said Flora, 
with deplorable pertness, and twitched it out of his 
hand. She slipped it into the pocket of her coat, and 
sat down to finish her breakfast. But the low, throaty 
snarl cut once more across the silence : 

Ye’re smart, aren’t yer ? Think I don’t know 
what’s going on . . . wi’ books from London and all 
that rot. Now you listen to me. She’s mine, I tell 
you . . . mine. She’s my woman, same as a hen 
belongs to a cock, and no one don’t have her except 
me, ye see ? She were promised to me the day she 
were bom, by her Grandmother. I put a cross in 
water-vole’s blood on her feedin’-botde when she was 
an hour old, to mark her for mine, and held her up 

m 



so’s she might see it and know she was mine. . . . 
And every year since then, on her birthday, I’ve taken 
her up to Ticklepenny’s Comer and we’ve hung over 
th’ old well until we see a water-vole, and I’ve said to 
her, I’ve said, ‘ Remember.’ And all she would say 
was : ‘ What, Cousin Urk ? ’ But she knows all right. 
She knows. When the water-voles mate under the 
may trees this summer I’ll make her mine. Dick 
Hawk-Monitor . . . what’s he ? A bit of a boy ! 
Playin’ at horses in a red coat, like his daddy afore 
him. Many a time I’ve lay and laughed at ’em . . . 
fools. Me and the water-voles, we can afford to wait 
for what we want. So you heed what I say, miss. 
Elfin’s mine. I doan’t mind her bein’ a bit above 
me ” (here his voice thickened in a manner which 
caused Mrs. Beetle to make a sound resembling 
“ t-t-t-t- ”), “ ’cause a man Hkes his piece to be a bit 

dainty. But she’s nnine 

“ We heard,” said Flora ; “ you said it before.” 

“ ^and God help the man or woman who tries 

to take her firom me. Me and the water-voles, we’ll 
get her back.” 

“ Are those water-voles round your neck ? ” asked 
Flora, interestedly. “ Jive never seen any before. 
What a lot of them all at once ! ” 

He turned from her, with a peculiar stooping, 
stealthy, swooping movement, and padded out of the 
kitchen. 

“ Well I never,” said Mrs. Beetle, loudly ; “ there’^ 
a narsty temper for you.” 

Flora placidly agreed that it was, but she made 
up her mi n d that Elfine must be taken up to Town 

i8o 



that very day, instead of to-morrow, as she had 
planned. 

She had meant to take Elfine up on the day before 
the ball, but there was no time to be lost. If Urk 
suspected that they were going to the ball he would 
probably try to stop them. They must be sure of the 
dress, and of Elfine’s shorn head, whatever happened. 
They must go at once. She rose, leaving her breakfast 
unfinished, and hurried upstairs to Elfine’s room. She 
found Elfine just returned firom her walk. 

Flora quickly told her of the change in their plans 
and left her to get ready while she hurried downstairs 
to try to find Seth, and to ask him to drive them down 
to the station. They could just catch the ten fifty-nine 
to town. 

Seth was hanging over the fence round the great 
field, looking sullenly at Big Business, who was canter- 
ing rormd and round, bellowing. 

“ Someone’s let the bull out,” said Seth, pointing. 

“ I know. I did. And quite time, too,” said Flora. 
“ But never mind that now. Seth, will you drive 
Elfine and me down to Beershom, to catch the ten 
fifty-nine ? ” 

Her request was made in a cool, pleasant voice. 
Yet the softly-burning, perpetual ruby flame of 
romance in Seth responded to some tremor of urgency 
in her tones. Besides, he wanted to go to the Hawk- 
Monitor’s dance, and see if it was at all like the hunt 
ball scene in “ Silver Hoofi,” the stupendous drama 
of English country life which Intro-Pan-National had 
made a year or two ago, and he guessed that Flora 
was taking Elfine up to I^ndon to buy her dre«. He 
*3 i8i 



did not want anythin g to interfere with the preparations 
for the bail. 

He said “ Ay,” he would, and lounged away with 
his curious animal grace to get out the buggy. 

Adam appeared at the door of the cow-shed, where 
he had been milking Graceless, Pointless, Feckless, 
Aimless and Fury. His old body was bent like a thorn 
against a sharp dazzle of sticky buds bursting from 
the boughs of a chestnut-tree which hung over into 
the yard. 

“Eh, eh — someone’s let the bull out,” he said. 
“ ’Tes terrible. . . . I — I mun soothe our Feckless. 
She’m not herself. Who let ’un out ? ” 

“ I did,” said Flora, buckling the belt of her coat. 

And distant shouts came from the back of the 
farm, where Micah and Ezra were busy setting up the 
hitten-piece which supported the bucket above the 
well. 

“ Th’ buU’s out ! ” 

“ Who let out Big Business ? ” 

“ Who let ’un loose ? ” 

“ Ay, ’tes terrible ! ” 

Flora had been writing on a leaf from her pocket- 
diary, which she now gave to Adam, and instructed 
him to pin it on the door of the kitchen where it could 
be seen by everyone as they came hurrying into the 
yard. It said : 

“ I did. F. Poste.” 

The buggy came out into the yard with Viper in 
the shafts and Seth holding the reins, just as Elfine, 
wearing a deplorable blue cape, appeared at the 
kitchen door. 


182 



“Jump up, my dear. We have no time to waste,” 
cried Flora, mounting the step of the buggy. 

“ Who let th’ bull out ? ” thundered Reuben, start- 
ing from the pig-pen, where he had been delivering 
a sow who was experienced enough, heaven knows, to 
deliver herself, but who enjoyed being fussed over. 

Flora pointed silently to the note pinned upon the 
kitchen door. Seth signed to Adam to open the gate 
of the yard, which Adam did. 

“ Who let th’ bull out ? ” screamed Judith, putting 
her head out from an upper window. The question 
was repeated by Amos, who burst from the chicken-nm 
where he had been collecting eggs. 

Flora hoped that they would all see the note and 
have their curiosity satisfied, or else they would all go 
blaming each other, and when she came home there 
would be a shocking atmosphere of rows and uncom- 
fortableness. 

But now they were off. Seth struck Viper on the 
flanks, and they shot forward. Flora repressed an 
inclination to raise her hat and bow from side to side 
as they passed through the gate. She felt that someone 
should have shouted loyally : “ God bless the yoimg 
squire 1 ” 


183 



CHAPTER XIII 


T hey passed a pleasant day in London. 

Flora first took Elfine to Maison Viol, of Brass 
Street, in Lambeth, to have her hair cut. Short hair 
was just coming back into fashion, yet it was still new 
enough to be distinguished. M. Viol himself cut 
Elfine’s hair, and dressed it in a careless, simple, 
fiendishly expensive way that showed the tips of her 
ears. ^ 

Flora then took Elfine to Maison Solide. M. Solide 
had dressed Flora for the last two years and did not 
despise her as much as he despised most of the women 
whom he dressed. His eyes widened when he saw 
Elfine. He looked at her broad shoulders and slim 
waist and long legs.. His fingers made the gestures of 
a pair of scissors, and he groped blindly towards a roll 
ff snow-coloured satin which a well-trained assistant 
put into his arms. 

“ White ? ” ventured Flora. 

“ But what else ? ” screamed M. SoHde, ripping the 
scissors across the satin. “ It is to wear white that 
God, once in a himdred years, makes such a young 
girl.” 

Flora sat and watched for an hour while M. Solide 
Vonied the satin like a terrier, tore it into breadths, 
swathed and caped and draped it. Flora was pleased 
to see that Elfine did not seem nervous or bored. She 

184 



seemed to take naturally to the atmosphere of a 
world-famous dressmaker’s establishment. She bathed 
delightedly in white satin, like a swan in foam. She 
twisted her neck this way and that, and peered down 
the length of her body, as though down a snow 
slope, to watch the assistants like busy black ants 
pinning and rearranging the hem a thousand feet 
below. 

Flora opened a new romance, and became absorbed 
in it, until Julia arrived at one o’clock to take them 
to Ixmch. 

M. Solide, pale and cross after his orgy, assured 
Flora that the dress would be ready by to-morrow 
Efioming. Flora said that they would call for it No, 
he must not send it. It was too rare. Would he 
post a picture by Gauguin to Australia ? A thousand 
evils might befall it on the way. 

But, secretly, she wished to protect the dress from 
Urk. She was sure that he would destroy it if he got 
a glimmer of a chance. 

“ Well, do you like your dress ? ” she asked Elfine, 
as they sat at lunch in the New River Club. 

“ It’s heavenly,” said Elfine, solemnly. She, like 
M. Solide, was pale with exhaustion. “ Ir’s better 
than poetry. Flora.” 

“ It is not at aU like the sort of thing St. Francis 
of Assisi wore,” pointed out Julia, who considered 
Flora was doing a lot for Elfine and should be ap- 
preciated. 

Elfine blushed, and bent her head over fier 
cutlet. Flora looked at her benignly. The dress 
had cost fifty guineas, but Flora did not grudge 

185 



the sum. She felt at this moment that any sum 
would have been sacrificed by her to score oflF the 
Starkadders. 

This feeling was increased by the pleasure she felt 
in the casual yet delicate appointments of the New 
River Club. It was the most haughty club in London. 
No one with an income of more than seven hundred 
and forty pounds a year might join. Its members 
were limited to a hundred and twenty. Each member 
must be nominated by a family with sixteen quarter- 
ings. No member might be divorced ; if he or she 
were, membership was forfeited. The Selection Com- 
mittee was composed of seven of the wildest, proudest, 
most talented men and women in Europe. The club 
combined the austerities of a monastic order with the 
tender peace of a home. 

Flora had engaged rooms for Elfine and herself at 
the club ; it was necessary for them to spend the night 
in Town as they had to call for Elfine’s dress the next 
morning. Flora welcomed the opportimity to indulge 
herself in some civilised pleasures, firom which she bad 
long been absent, and, accordingly, went in the after- 
noon to hear a concert of Mozart’s music at the State 
Concert Hall in Bloomsbury, leaving Julia to take 
Elfine to buy a petticoat, some shoes and stockings 
and a plain evening coat of white velvet. In the 
evening, she proposed that the three of them should 
visit the Pit Theatre, in Stench Street, Seven Dials, to see 
a new play by Brandt Slurb called “ ManaUalive-O ! ” 
a'Neo-Expressionist attempt to give dramatic form to 
the mental reactions of a man employed as a waiter 
in a restaurant who dreams that he is the double 

i86 



of another man who is employed as a steward on a 
liner, and who, on awakening and realising that he 
is still a waiter employed in a restaurant and not 
a steward employed on a liner, goes mad and shoots 
his reflection in a mirror and dies. It had seventeen 
scenes and only one character. A pest-house, a 
laundry, a lavatory, a court of law, a room in a leper’s 
settlement and the middle of Piccadilly Circus were 
included in the scenes. 

“ Why,” asked Julia, do you want to see a play 
like that ? ” 

I don’t, but I think it would be so good for Elfine, 
so that she will know what to avoid when she is 
married.” 

But Julia thought it would be a much better idea if 
they went to see Mr. Dan Langham in On Your 
Toes ! ” at the New Hippodrome, so they went 
there instead and had a nice time instead of a nasty 
one. 

In that entranced pause when the lights of the 
theatre fade, and upon the crimson of the yet unraised 
curtain the footlights throw up their soft glow, Flora 
glanced at Elfine, imobserved, and was pleased with 
what she saw. 

A noble yet soft profile was lifted seriously towards 
the stage. The light wings of gold hair blew back 
from either cheek towards the ears ; this gave the 
head a classic look like that of a Greek charioteer 
pressing his team forward to victory in the face of a 
strong wind. The beautiful bones, the youth, of the 
face were now revealed. 

Flora was satisfied. 


187 



She had done what she had hoped to do. She had 
made Elfine look groomed and normal, yet had 
preserved in her personality a suggestion of cool, 
smoothly-blowing winds and of pine-trees and the 
smell of wild flowers. She had conceived just such a 
change, and M. Viol and M. Solide, her instruments, 
had carried it out. 

An artist in living flesh could ask for no more, 
and the augxuies for the evening of the dance were 
good. 

She leaned back in her seat with a contented sigh 
as the curtains parted. 


The cousins reached the farm about five o’clock on 
the evening of the next day. Much to Flora’s surprise, 
Seth had been at the station to meet their train with 
the buggy, and he drove them back. They stopped 
at a large garage in the town on the way home to 
arrange for a car to call at the farm on the following 
evening to take them to Godmere. It was to'^be at 
Cold Comfort at half-pzist seven, but first it was to 
meet the six-thirty train and pick up a Mr. Hart-Harris, 
who was arriving at that time. 

Having made these arrangements. Flora hopped 
cheerfully back into the buggy and settled herself into 
her own black-and-green plaid rug at Seth’s side. 
Elfine tucked her in. (By this time Elfine was quite 
devoted to her, and divided the time between devising 
schemes for Flora’s comfort and looking with dehght 
at the picture of her own altered head in the shop 
windows which they passed.) 

i88 



“ Are you looking forward to it, Seth ? ” asked 
Flora. 

“ Ay,” he drawled sofdy, in his warm voice, “ ’twill 
be th’ first time I’ve ever been to a dance wheer all 
the women wasn’t after me. Happen I can enjoy 
meself a bit, fer a change.” 

Flora doubted whether he really wotild, for the 
county would probably fall for Seth as inevitably as 
did the villages. But there was no point in alarming 
him beforehand. 

“ But I thought you liked having girls after 
you ? ” 

“Nay. I only likes the talkies. I don’t mind 
takin’ a girl out if she will let me be, but many’s the 
girl I’ve niver seen again because she worrited me in 
the middle of a talkie. Ay, they’re aU the same. 
They must have yer blood and yer brdfth and ivery 
bit of yer time and yer thoughts. But I’m not like 
that. I just likes the talkies.” 

Flora reflected, as they drove home through the 
lanes, that Seth’s problem was the next one to tackle. 
She thought of a letter in her handbag. It was fix)m 
Mr. Earl P. Neck, and it said that he would be motoring 
down within the next few days to see some JBdends who 
Kved at Brighton, and he proposed to motor over and 
see her, too. She was going to introduce Seth to 
him. 


It was five o’clock on the afternoon of the next day. 
The weather had favoured the cousins. Flora had 
pessimistically presumed that it would be pelting with 

189 



rain, but it was not. It was a mild, rosy spring 
evening in which blackbirds sang on the budding 
boughs of the elms and the air smelled of leaves and 
freshness. 

The cousins were having a fiendish business getting 
themselves dressed. 

The intelligent and sensitive reader will doubtless 
have wondered at intervals throughout this narrative 
as to how Flora managed about a bathroom. The 
answer is simple. At Cold Conafort there was no 
bathroom. And when Flora had asked Adam how 
the family themselves managed for baths, he had 
replied, coldly : “ We manages wi’out,” and the 
vision of dabbings and chillinesses and inadequacies 
thus conjured had so repelled Flora that she had 
pursued her enquiries no further. 

She had discovered, however, that that refreshing 
woman, Mrs. Beetle, owned a hip-bath, in which she 
would permit Flora to bathe every other evening at 
eight o’clock for a small weekly sum, and this Flora 
did, and the curtailment of her seven weekly baths to 
fomr was by far the most unpleasant experience she 
had so far had to endure at the farm. 

But this evening, just when baths were needed, baths 
were impossible. So Flora put two enormous noggins 
of water on the stove in the kitchen to get hot, and 
hoped for the best. 

Her absence from the farm with Elfine had not been 
commented upon. She doubted if they had noticed 
it. What with the bull getting out, and Meriam, the 
hired girl, having so far got through the spring without 
entering upon her annual interesting condition, and 

190 



the beginning of the carrot harvest which was even 
longer and more difficult to do than the swede 
harvest, the Starkadders had enough to absorb 
them without noticing where a couple of girls had 
got to. Besides, it was their habit to avoid see- 
ing each other for days at a time, and the absence 
of Flora and Elfine seemed fortunately to have coin- 
cided with one of these hibernations on the part of 
the family. 

But Aunt Ada — did she know? Elfine said she 
knew everything. She shuddered as she spoke. If 
Aimt Ada found out that they were going to the 
ball . . . 

“ She had best not pull any Cinderella stuff on me,” 
said Flora, coldly, peering into the nearest noggin to 
see if the water were done. 

“ It is just possible that she may come "downstairs 
one of these evenings,” said Elfine, timidly. “She 
sometimes does, in the spring.” 

Flora said that she hoped it kept fine for her. 

But she did rather wonder why the kitchen was 
decorated with a wreath of deadly nightshade round 
the mantdpiece and large bunches of the evil-smelling 
pussy’s dinner arranged in jam-jars on the mantelpiece. 
And round the dim, ancient portrait of Fig Starkadder, 
which hung above the fireplace, was a wreath of a 
flower which was unfamiliar to Flora. It had dark 
green leaves and long, pink, tightly-dosed buds. She 
asked Elfine what it was. 

“ That’s the sukebind,” said Elfine, fearfully. “ Oh, 
Flora, is the water done ? ” 

“Just on, my dove. Here, you take one,” and she 



handed it to Elfine. “ So that’s sukebind, is it ? I 
suppose when it opens all the trouble begins ? ” 

But Elfine was already away with the hot water to 
Flora’s room, where her dress lay upon the bed, and 
Flora must follow her. 


192 



CHAPTER XIV 


P ERED^PS something, some pregnant quality, in 
the mildly restless air of the spring evening, had 
infused itself into the room where old Mrs. Starkadder 
sat before the huge bed of glowing cinders in the grate. 
For she struck suddenly, fiercely, upon the little bell 
that stood ever at her elbow (at least, it was at her 
elbow whenever she sat in that particular chair). 

A plan which she had been pondering for days, and 
had even hinted at to Seth, had suddenly matured. 
The shrill sound leapt through the tepid air of the 
room. It roused Judith, who was standing at the 
window looking with sodden eyes at the inexorable 
fecundity of the advancing spring. 

“ I mtm go downstairs,” said the old woman. 

“ Mother . . . you’re mistaken. ’Tes not the first 
o’ May nor the seventeenth o’ October. You’d better 
bide here,” protested her daughter. 

“ I tell you I mxm go downstairs. I mun fed you 
all about me — all of you : Micah, Urk, Ezra, Hark- 
away, Caraway, Amos, Reuben and Seth. Ay, and 
Mark and Luke. None of you mun ever leave me. 
Give me my liberty bodice, girl.” 

Silently Judith gave it her. 

The old house was silent. The dying light lay 
quietly upon its walls, and the sound of the blackbird’s 
song came into the still, empty rooms. Aunt Ada’s 

193 



thoughts spun like Catherine wheels as she laboriously 
dressed herself. 

Once . . . when you were a little girl . . . you 
had seen something nasty in the woodshed. Now you 
were old, and could not move easily. You leaned 
heavily on Judith’s shoulder as she pressed her foot 
into the small of your back to lace your corsets. 

Flora drew the curtains and lit the lamp. Elfine’s 
dress lay on the bed, a lovely miracle, and Elfine must 
be dressed before Flora could begin to think of her 
own toilet. 

It took an hour to dress Elfine. Flora washed her 
young cheeks with scalding water until they burned 
with angry roses, and brushed back the wings of hair, 
slipped the foam of the petticoat over her head and 
brushed again, stood on a chair to drop the dress over 
her head, and then brushed again. Then she put on 
the stockings and shoes, and wrapped Elfine in the 
white coat, put the fan and bag into her waiting 
hands, and made her sit on the bed, out of dust 
and danger. 

Oh, Flora ... do I look nice ? ” 

You look extremely beautiful,” returned Flora, 
solemnly, looking up at her. Mind you behave 
properly.” 

But to herself she was thinking, in the words of the 
Abbe Fausse-Maigre, Condole with the Ugly Duck- 
ling’s mother. She has fathomed the pit of amaze- 
ment.” 

Flora’s own dress was in harmonious tones of pale 
and dark green. She wore no jewels, and her long 
coat was of viridian velvet. She would not permit 

194 



Elfine to wear jewels, either, though Elfine begged for 
at least her little string of pearls. 

Now they were ready. It was only half-past six. 
There was a whole hour to wait before they could 
creep down to the waiting car. In order to calm their 
nerves, Flora seated herself upon the bed and read 
aloud from the Pensees : 

Never arrive at a house at a quarter past three. 
It is a dreadful hour ; too early for tea and too late 
for luncheon. . . 

Can we be sure that an elephant’s real name is 
elephant? Only mankind presumes to name God’s 
creatures ; God Himself is silent upon the matter.” 

Yet the Pensees failed to have their usual calming 
effect. Flora was a little agitated. Would the car 
arrive safely? Would Claud Hart-Harris miss the 
train ? (He usually did !) How would Seth look in 
a dinner-jacket? Above all, would Richard Hawk- 
Monitor propose to Elfine ? Even Flora did not dare 
to imagine what would happen if they returned from 
the ball and he had not spoken. He must speak ! She 
conjured the god of love by the spring evening, by 
the blackbird’s song, by the tiiximphant beauty of 
Elfine. 

(Now you were putting on your elastic-sided boots. 
You had not worn them since Fig died. Fig ... a 
prickly beard, a smell of flannel, a fumbling, urgent 
voice in the larder. Your boots smelled nasty. Where 
was the lavender water ? You made Judith sprinkle 
some, inside and out. So. Now your first petti- 
coat.) 

Flora,” said Elfine, ** I am afraid I feel sick.’* 

195 



Flora looked sternly at her and read aloud : “ Vanity 
can rule the queasiest stomach.” 

Suddenly there was a tap at the door. Elfine looked 
at Flora in terror, and Flora noted how her eyes became 
dark blue when she was moved. It was a good line. 

“ Shall I open it ? ” whispered Elfine. 

“ I expect it’s only Seth.” 

Flora got oflf the bed and tiptoed to the door, which 
she opened an eighth of an inch. Indeed, it was Seth 
in a ready-made dinner-jacket which in no way 
destroyed his animal grace ; he merely looked like a 
panther in evening dress. He whispered to Flora that 
a car was coming up the hill, and that perhaps they 
had best come downstairs. 

“ Is Urk anywhere about ? ” asked Flora, for she 
knew that if he could mess things up he would. 

“ I saw ’un hanging over th’ weU up at Tickle- 
penny’s, talkin’ to th’ water-voles an horn ago,” 
replied Seth. 

“ Oh, then he is safe for another half-hour at least,” 
said Flora. “ I think we might go down, then. Elfine, 
are you ready ? Now, not a sound ! Come along.” 

By the light of a candle which Seth carried they 
made their way safely down into the kitchen, which 
was deserted. The door leading into the yard Was 
open, and they saw a big car, just visible in the twilight, 
drawn up outside the gate at the other end of the 
yard. The chauffeur was just getting down to open 
the gate, and Flora saw, much to her relief, that 
another person, who must be Claud, was peering out 
of the car window. She waved reassuringly to him, 
and caught the words “ too barbarous ” floating across 

196 



the still evening air. She motioned frantically to him 
not to make a noise. 

I’ll carry Elfine. She mustn’t spoil them shoes,” 
whispered Seth, with unexpected thoughtfulness, and 
picked his sister up and strode off with her across the 
yard. He made a second journey for Flora, and she 
hardly had time to decide whether or not he was 
holding her unnecessarily tightly when she found 
herself safely popped into the car, and squeezing the 
outstretched hands of Claud, with Elfine smiling 
prettily in the comer. 

My dear, why all this FaU-of-the-House-of-Usher 
stuff? ” enquired Claud. “ I mean, this is too good 
to be trae. Where do we go £:om here ? ” 

Seth was giving the chauffeur his instructions, and 
in this pause just before their adventure really began, 
Flora gazed up searchingly at the windows of the farm- 
house. ***They were dead as the eyes of fishes, 
reflecting the dim, pallid blue of the fading west. The 
crenellated line of the roof thrust blind ledges against 
a sky into which the infusion of the darkness was 
already beginning to seep. The livid silver tongues 
of the early stars leaped between the shapes of the 
chinmey-pots, backwards and forwards, like idiot 
children dancing to a forgotten tune. As Flora 
watched, a dim light flowered slowly behind a drawn 
blind in the window of a room immediately above the 
kitchen, and she saw a shadow move hesitatingly, as 
though it had lost a bootlace and was searching dumbly 
for it, across the blind. The light was like the waxing 
and waning of the eye in the head of a dying beast. 
The house seemed to settle deeper into the yard as 
14 197 



darkness came. Not a sound broke its quiescence. 
But the light, strangely naked and innocent, burned 
waveringly on in the deepening gloom. 

The car moved forward, and Flora, for one, was 
immensely bucked to be off. 

“ Well, Flora, you look extremely nice,” said Claud, 
studying her. “ That dress is quite charming. As for 
your protegee,” he added, in a lower tone, “ she is 
beautiful. Now tell me all about it.” 

So, also lowering her voice. Flora told him. He 
was amused and interested, but a little discontented 
with his own role. “ I feel,” he complained, “ like a 
minor character out of ‘ Cinderella ’.” 

Flora soothed him by telling him that this excursion 
into the hinterland of Sussex should aflford him a 
pleasant change from the excessive urbanity of those 
circles in which he habitually moved, and the rest of 
their journey passed pleasantly enough. Seth was 
inclined to swagger, as he was nervous of Claud’s tail 
coat and white waistcoat £ind irritated by his casual 
voice, but he was too excited and looking forward too 
much to the dance to make himself really disagreeable 

The Assembly Roonas at Godmere were reached by 
the party without mishap. The High Street was 
crowded with traffic, for most of the guests had come 
in from outlying villages and houses in their cars, and 
a big crowd had come in by bus, from miles round, 
to gather outside the doors in the Market Place to see 
the guests going in. 

The party from Cold Comfort was fortunate in 
being in the hands of a competent chauffeur. He 
actually found a site in a narrow cul-de-sac just round 

198 



a turning close to the Rooms where he parked their 
car. Flora instructed him to return at twelve o’clock, 
when the ball was over, and enquired how he proposed 
to spend the rest of his evening. 

I shall go to the talkies, madam,” he replied, 
respectfully. 

Ay, there’s Marie Rambeau in * Red Heels ’ at 
th’ Orpheum,” broke in Seth, eagerly. 

Yes, well, that will do very well,” said Flora, 
graciously, frowning slightly at Seth ; and she slipped 
her fingers within the arm of Claud, and they moved 
slowly off through the crowd to the Rooms, 

A red carpet had been placed down the flight of 
steps leading up to the entrance and along the pave- 
ment as far as the kerb. On either side of this carpet 
was assembled a large crowd of sightseers, whose 
interested and admiring faces were illumined by two 
flambeaux which burned at either side of the entrance. 

Just as Flora’s party was moxmting the first steps 
amid a murmur of admiration from the crowd, she 
thought she heard someone say her name, and, looking 
in the direction from which the soimd came, she 
perceived none other than Mr, Mybug, perilously 
poised upon the plinth of a lamp-post, and accom- 
panied by another gentleman of disordered dress and 
wild appearance, whom she judged to be one of his 
intellectual peers. 

Mr. Mybug waved gaily to Flora, and he looked 
cheerful enough, but she (foolish creature) felt a little 
sorry for him because he was rather fat and his clothes 
were not very good, and when she compared his 
personal appearance with that of Charles, who was 

199 



always so neat except when a lock of his black hair 
descended over his forehead while he was playing 
tennis or otherwise agitated, she felt that Mr. Mybug 
was one of our more desolate figures, and almost 
wished that he were coining to the ball. 

“ Who is that ? ” enquired Claud, glancing in the 
direction of her gaze. 

“ A Mr. Mybug. I met him in London.” 

“ Good God ! ” observed Claud, in a tone of deep 
distaste. 

Had Flora been alone, she would have called 
pleasantly to Mr. Mybug across the heads of the 
crowd : 

“ How do you do ? . . . How amusing to see you 
here ! Are you copy-hunting ? ” 

But she felt that upon this occasion she stood in the 
relation of a chaperone and sponsor to Elfine, and that 
her own conduct must be carefully regulated so as not 
to give rise to a breath of adverse comment. 

She contented herself, therefore, with bowing very 
pleasantly to Mr. Mybug, who looked rather miserable 
and tried to pull down his cardigan, which had worked 
up aU wrinkly round his waist. 

Mr. Aubrey Featherweight, who had designed the 
Assembly Rooms of Godmere in the year 1830, had 
not been content to provide them with one broad and 
not unshapely flight of steps as an approach. He had 
constructed another flight leading down into the large 
ball-room, which was built slightly below the level of 
the street. 

Now when Flora, emerging firom the draughty 
ladies’ cloakroom immediately within die entrance 


200 



hall of the Rooms accompanied by the stately and 
beautiful EUfine, saw this second staircase and realised 
that it led down into the ball-room, so intense a glow 
of gratitude filled her heart that she could have fallen 
upon her knees and thanked Fate. 

Did not the Abb^ F.-M. say : “ Lost is that man 
who sees a beautiful woman descending a noble 
staircase,” and were not both these ingredients here, 
and ready to her hand? What else but a staircase 
could so perfectly set ofiF the jewel she had made of 
Elfine? 

A handsome lady of some sixty years stood at the 
head of the staircase to welcome those guests who 
passed firom the hall on their way to the ball-room, 
and at her side, aiding her in the task of welcoming 
each guest, stood a large young woman in a cruel 
shade of electric blue, whom Flora rightly judged to 
be Mrs. Hawk-Monitor’s daughter Joan. 

The four young people slowly approached their 
hostess. 

Flora’s fine eyes, that were so observant, noticed 
how propitious was this moment for their entry. 

The hour was nearly nine. All the guests of 
importance had already arrived, and the fine flower 
of the county of Sussex was circling to the strains of 
the “ Twelve Sweet Hours ” waltz in the ball-room 
below, the gowns of the young women and the elegant 
dark purple and white of the young men’s clothes 
being admirably set off by the florid crimson walls, 
the slender white pillars capped by gold acanthus 
leaves, and the banks of dark green foliage which 
decorated the alcoves of the room. 


201 



Claud moved forward to present Flora and Elfine 
to Mrs. Hawk-Monitor, who received Flora with a 
gracious smile, and whose sudden, startled glance at 
Elfine was all that Flora could wish ; and then Elfine, 
in response to a gentle motion from Flora (who had 
been detained for a moment in conversation by Joan 
Hawk-Monitor) began to descend the crimson-covered 
stairs. 

It was at this moment that the sweet, leisurely last 
notes of the “ Twelve Hours ” waltz ceased, and the 
dancers below slowly came to a standstill and stood 
clapping and smiling. 

iiien a startled hush fell upon the clapping. All 
eyes were turned upon the staircase. A low hum of 
admiration, the most delightful sound in the world 
that a woman’s ears can receive, rose into the still- 
ness. 

Here was beauty. It silenced aU comment except 
that of eager praise. A generation that had admired 
piquante women, boyish women, ugly, smart and 
fascinating women was now confironted by simple 
beauty, pure and xmdeniable as that of the young 
Venus whom the Greeks loved to carve ; and re- 
sponded immediately, in delighted and surprised 
homage, to its challenge. 

Just as no human creature who has eyes to see can 
deny the beauty of an almond-tree in foil flower, no 
human eyes covdd deny beauty to Elfine. The slow 
descent of this young girl down the staircase was like 
the descent of a sunlit cloud down the breast of a 
mountain. Her candid beauty, set off by the snowy- 
silver folds of her simple dress, refi-eshed the dancers 

202 



who stood sflently looking up at her as the sight of a 
cluster of flowers or a moonlit expanse of sea refreshes 
the eyes. 

And Flora, silently watching from the head of the 
staircase, saw that a tall young man who stood just at 
its foot was looking up at Elfine as the young shepherd 
must once have looked at the moon goddess ; and she 
was satisfied. 

The entranced pause was broken by music. The 
orchestra began to play a gay polka, and the young 
man (who was Richard Hawk-Monitor himself) came 
forward to give his hand to Elfine and lead her into the 
mazes of the dance. 

Flora and Claud (who was much amused by all this) 
came down the stairs into the ball-room a little later 
and also joined the dancers. 

Flora had every reason to feel smug and satisfied 
with her evening’s work as she floated round the room 
in the arms of Claud, who danced admirably. Without 
seeming to take so obvious an interest in the move- 
ments of Elfine and her partner that her gaze became 
ill-bred, she observed their every action. 

What she saw pleased her much. Richard appeared 
to be deeply in love. It is usual to see a young man 
looking down into the face of a girl with whom he is 
dancing with an expression of soft admiration, and 
Flora was used to such spectacles. But she had not 
often seen a young man’s face so rapt, so almost awed, 
with adoration and another emotion which can only 
be defined as gratitude, as was the face of Richard 
Hawk-Monitor. Wonder, too, was in his expression. 
He held Elfine preciously, a man might hold a 

203 



flowering branch of some rare tree which he has seen 
for the first time and is bringing back to his cave. 

The miracle for which she had conjured the love 
god had befallen. Richard had realised, not that 
Elfine was beautiful, but that he loved Elfine. (Young 
men frequently need this fact pointing out to them, as 
Flora knew by observing the antics of her friends.) 

Now she must wait patiently until the end of the 
ball, when Elfine would tell her whether Richard had 
proposed marriage. She felt that the anxiety of 
waiting to know whether her diplomacy had succeeded 
might impair the pleasure of the evening for her, but 
resolved to bear the trial with calnmess. 

However, as it turned out, she began to enjoy the 
ball so much that she almost forgot her anxiety. 

The ball was, indeed, a very agreeable one. Perhaps 
it was more by luck than by judgment that Mrs. 
Hawk-Monitor had combined two of the essentials for 
a successful ball (too many guests in a smallish room), 
but both were there, and when these were combined 
with the elegance and lavishness of the supper-tables 
and the sober richness of the appointments, and the 
fact that most of the people who were present knew 
each other slightly, all the ingredients for success were 
present, and success was achieved. 

Flora overheard many comments upon Elfine’s 
beauty, and was asked several times who her lovely 
companion was. She smilingly replied that she was 
a cousin, a Miss Starkadder, and would say no more 
save that Elfine lived in the neighbourhood. She did 
not make the mistake of snobbishly embroidering upon 
Elfine’s ancestry and charm. She let Elfine’s serious 

204 



beauty do its own work, and very well it did it, Elfinc 
danced most of the dances with Richard Hawk- 
Monitor, but she gave many others to the group of 
eager young men who gathered round her as soon as 
the music paused. 

Flora observed that Mrs. Hawk-Monitor, from her 
position in an alcove on the bzilcony above the ball- 
room, was beginning to look vaguely anxious, especially 
during those dances that Elftne gave to Richard. 

Flora divided her dances chiefly between Claud and 
Seth. Seth appeared to be enjoying the evening 
immensely. In one way and another he had nearly 
as spectacular a success as Elfine. A group of some 
nine young persons whose dress proclaimed that they 
had come down from London for the ball took posses- 
sion of Seth early in the evening, and would not let 
him go. Flora overheard two or three of the young 
women telling each other that their dears, he was too 
creditable and merely body-thrilUng, and Seth just 
smiled his slow, warm smile and drawled : Ay ’* 
and “ Nay ” when asked if he did not adore farming, 
and what he wanted from life, and didn’t he think the 
important thing was to experience eveytidng? 

Several young men approached Flora, and seemed 
anxious to appropriate her company after they had 
danced with her, and all this was very satisfactory, 
but she had resolved that for this evenii^ at any rate 
she must keep herself in the background and make no 
attempt to rival Elfine. So she danced mostly with 
Claud, after Seth had been carried off to supper by 
his adoring tribe of young girls. Flora knew that she 
did not look so beautiful as Elfine, but, then, die did 

205 



not want to. She knew that she looked distinguished, 
elegant and interesting. She asked for nothing 
more. 

Only one disagreeable incident marred the pleasure 
of the evening. Just as she and Claud were making 
their way to the supper-tables in an adjoining room 
a disturbance broke out on the balcony above their 
heads, and Flora looked up in time to see the back of 
a gentleman, which was only too familiar to her, being 
hustled out through the entrance with some haste by 
two of the flunkeys. 

“ Somebody trying to gate-crash,” called a laughing 
young man to Claud, in passing, as he came running 
down the stairs. He had been giving the flunkeys a 
hand. 

Flora felt rather distressed. She sat down at the 
little table which Claud had reserved for them, which 
was charmingly wreathed with spring leaves and 
flowers, with a sober expression on her face. 

“ My dear Flora, was that a friend of yours ? ” 
asked Claud, motioning to the waiter to open some 
champagne. 

“ It was Mr. Mybug,” said Flora, simply ; “ and 
I caimot help feeling, Claud, that if I had thought of 
trying to get him an invitation he would not have had 
to try and gate-crash.” 

“ It is a good thing that everybody who hasn’t got 
invitations for things doesn’t have to try and gate- 
crash,” observed Claud. 

“ I caimot help feeling,” pursued Flora, picking up 
her fork to begin on the crab mousse, “rather sorry 
for Mr. Mybug.” 


206 



“ We are purified by suffering,” said Claud, helping 
himself to crab. 

But Flora went on : “ You see, he is rather fat. 
I always feel sorry for people who are fat. And I 
haven’t got the heart to tell him that’s why I won’t 
let him kiss me. He thinks it’s because I’m inhibited.” 

“ But, my dear, he would. Don’t distress yourself. 
Have some more crab.” 

And Flora did, and telling herself that it was her 
duty to look pleasant, for Elfine’s sake, she thought 
no more of Mr. Mybug that evening. 

Flora and Claud lingered long over the supper- 
table, enjoying the spectacle of the brilliantly-lit, 
elegantly decorated apartment fiUed with young 
persons of both sexes, most of them handsome and all 
of them happy. Claud, who had served in the Anglo- 
Nicaraguan wars of ’46, was at his ease in the com- 
fortable silence in which they sat, and allowed the 
irony and grief of his natural expression to emerge 
firom beneath the mask of cheerful idiocy with which 
he usually covered his sallow, charming face. He had 
seen his fidends die in anguish in the wars. For him, 
the whole of the rest of his life was an amusing game 
which no man of taste and intelligence could permit 
himself to take seriously. 

Much as Flora was enjoying the ball, she was doing 
so more as a spectator than as a participant. She 
wished regretfully that some others of her fiiends 
might have been present : Mrs. Smiling, looking 
vague in a white gown ; the handsome Julia ; Charles 
in the severe tail coat of darkest blue which so well 
became his height and gravity. 

207 



As at all good parties, an atmosphere, impalpable 
as a perfume yet as real, rose above the heads of the 
laughing guests. It was the aroma of enjoyment and 
gaiety. No one could inhale it without instinctively 
smiling and gl ancin g good-naturedly roxmd the room. 
Gay voices rose every second above the roar of the 
general conversation like individual trills of water 
from the rush of a stream in spate. A laughing mouth, 
three youthful heads gathered together, while a fourth, 
distorted with laughter, uttered gasping protests ; 
chins lifted and eyes narrowed between lashes with 
mirth ; an azalea plant revealed as two persons drew 
back from the table to shout with laughter : such 
were the outward signs of a Good Party. And 
above them floated this invisible glittering cloud of 
success. 

Suddenly Flora gave a slight start. Elfine had 
appeared at the door of the supper-room, accompanied 
by Richard Hawk-Monitor. They were glancing 
round the room as if in search of someone, and when 
Elfine caught sight of Flora’s raised hand, in its pale- 
green glove, she smiled eagerly and said something 
over her shoulder to the young Hawk-Monitor, and 
they began to make their way between the tables to 
where Flora and Claud sat. 

Flora’s spirits, already excited by the pleasure of 
the ball, rose still higher. Richard must have pro- 
posed, and have been accepted. Nothing else could 
have made the two look so peculiarly radiant. 

They came towards her, threading their way between 
the laughing groups, who looked up from their talk 
to smile at Dick and to look curiously at Elfine ; 

2o8 



and then Elfine had paused at their table, and 
Claud had risen to his feet, and Elfin e, reaching 
backwards for Richard’s hand, drew him forward 
and said ; 

“ Oh, Flora, I do so want you to meet Dick.” 

Flora bowed and smiled, and said : “ How do you 
do ? I have heard so much about you, and I am so 
pleased to meet you ; ” but she found her hand taken 
into a friendly clasp and met the beam of a wind- 
reddened, open, boyish countenance. She noticed 
that he had perfect teeth, white as those of a young 
lion, and a little black moustache. 

“ I say, I’m awfully glad to meet you. Elf has told 
me all about you, too. I say, this is jolly, isn’t it ? 
Marvellous idea of the mater’s, having the orgy here 
instead of in the family crematorium, what ? I say. 
Miss Poste, it was awfully decent of you to bring 
Elfine. I simply can’t thank you enough, you know. 
I mean, it’s made all the difference in the world. 
We’re engaged, as a matter of fact” 

“ My desu- ! How charming 1 I am delighted. I 
congratulate you ! ” cried Flora, who was indeed 
overcome with relief and satisfaction. 

“ Charming,” murmured Claud, in the back- 
ground. 

“ We’re going to ann ounce it at the end of the 
evening,” Richard went on. “ Gfood opportunity, 
what ? ” 

Claud, sardonically wondering what the feelings of 
Mrs. Hawk-Monitor would be when she heard the 
news, said that the occasion might have been made 
for the armormcement of the event. Flora then 

209 



introduced him to Richard, and there was some general 
conversation, made interesting by the aura of happiness 
which hovered over the betrothed pair and the smiling 
sympathy with which Claud and Flora listened to 
their talk. 


210 



CHAPTER XV 


I T was now nearly twelve o’clock, and a general 
movement was made to return to the ball-room. 
The orchestra had been refreshed by some supper, and 
broke immediately into a joEy tune to which the 
“ Lancers ” could be danced, and away pranced 
everybody, and dzinced untE every cheek was crimson 
and the floor was scattered with fans, hairpins, shoe- 
buttons and wEting flowers. 

Claud was as light on his feet as the harlequin he 
somewhat resembled, and whEe Flora was springing 
round the room, just guided by the cool touch 
of his hands, she observed Elfine in Richard’s arms, 
and saw with satis&ction how marveEously happy 
she looked and how beautiful. Flora glowed with 
content. Her aim was achieved. She felt as 
though she had shaken her fist in the face of Aunt 
Ada Doom. Elfine was rescued. Henceforth, her 
life would be one of exquisite, sunny natural 
content. She woiEd bear chEdren and foimd a 
line of pleasant, ordinary English people who were 
blazing with poetry in their secret souls. AE was 
as it should be. 

And Flora, energeticaEy prancing herself to a stand- 
stiE as the Lancers ended, clapped her hands vigorously, 
half with the desire for an encore, but more for the 
joy she felt in her evening’s work. 



“ How you do enjoy yourself, don’t you, Florence 
Nightingale ? ” observed Claud. 

“ I do,” retorted Flora ; “ and so do you.” 

It wa5 true ; he did. But never without a pang of 
exquisite pain in his heart, and a conviction that he 
was a traitor. 

In the pause that followed the music. Flora observed 
that Richard was leading Elfine to the staircase, and 
they went slowly up it, to where his mother sat on 
the balcony with a number of her older friends. Flora 
moved forward also, in case she should be needed, 
but before she could begin to mount the stairs Richard 
left his mother, over whom he had been bending in 
conversation, and, coming forward to the balcony rail, 
held up his hand for silence. Elfine stood beside him, 
but slightly in the background. Flora could not see 
the expression on the face of Mrs. Hawk-Monitor, 
who was hidden by Richard’s body, but she observed 
that the face of Joan Hawk-Monitor bore an expression 
which was a curious blend" of dismay and interest and 
envy. (“ But then, that shade of blue would do 
anything to anybody’s face,” Flora comforted herself.) 

“ Ladies and gentlemen,” said Dick. “ It’s been 
awfully jolly seeing you all here to-night. I’m awfully 
glad you could aU come. I mean, I shall always be 
glad to remember you were all here on my twenty-first 
birthday. It makes it all so much jollier somehow. 
... I mean, I do like a cheery mob round me, 
what ? ” 

He paused. There was laughter and some clapping. 
Flora held her breath. He must — ^he musi annoimce 
the engagement 1 If he did not, she would know 


212 



(whatever might happen afterwards) that her plot 
had failed. 

But it was all right. He was speaking again. He 
was drawing Elfine forward to face the guests, and 
taking her hand in his. 

And this is a particularly jolly evening for me, 
because IVe got something else to tell you all. I want 
to tell you that Miss Starkadder and I are engaged.” 

There ! It was out ! A storm of clapping and 
excited comment broke forth, and people began 
streaming up the staircase to offer their congratulations. 
Flora, feeling quite weak after the nervous excitement 
of the past few minutes, turned to Claud, and said : 
“ There, that’s over. Oh, Claud, but do you think 
we ought to go up and speak to Mrs. Hawk-Monitor ? 
I must confess that I would rather not.” 

Claud, however, said decidedly that he thought it 
would be most incorrect if Flora did not do so, for 
she was there, after all, in the capacity of Elfine’s 
chaperone, and the whole course of affairs had already 
been so irregular that anything Flora could do to give 
a colouring of convention to the situation would count 
in Elfine’s favour. 

So Flora, reluctantly agreeing, went up the staircase 
to tackle Mrs. Hawk-Monitor. 

She found the poor lady looking dazed. She was 
sitting in an alcove, receiving the thanks and congratu- 
lation upon the success of the ball from those guests 
who were already departing. Flora was relieved to 
notice that the healthy Joan was standing at some 
distance away, by the door, so she would not have to 
cope with h&ty as well as with Mamma H.-M. 

15 213 



Flora went forward with outstretched hand. 

“ Thank you so much . . . such a lovely party, and 
so nice of you to let us come.” 

But Mrs. Hawk-Monitor had risen, and was looking 
very gravely at her. She might be a vague woman 
and a darling, but she was not a fool. She took an 
eyeful of Flora, and knew that here was a young 
woman of good sense. Her heart longed for some 
reassurance in the midst of the dismay and doubt which 
possessed her. She said, almost pleadingly : 

“ Miss Poste, I will be frank with you. I cannot 
pretend that I am delighted at this engagement. Who 
is this young lady ? I have only met her once before. 
I know next to nothing of her or her family.” 

“ She is a gentle, docile person,” said Flora, earnestly. 
“ She is only seventeen. I think she can be moulded 
into exactly what you would wish her to be. Dear 
Mrs. Hawk-Monitor, pray do not be distressed. I am 
sure that you will leaxn to like Elfine. Do believe 
me when I say that she has excellent qualities. As 
for her family, if I may venture to offer you some 
advice, I should take steps at once to see that she sees 
next to nothing of them for the next few weeks. There 
will probably be strong opposition to the match.” 

“ Opposition ? What imperti ” 

She checked herself. She was amazed, and at a 
loss. She had assumed that Elfine’s family would be 
oveijoyed at their offspring’s luck. 

“ Indeed, yes. Mrs. Starkadder, her grandmother, 
has always intended Elfine to marry her cousin, Urk. 
1 am afraid there may be some opposition from him 
too. In fact, the sooner you can arrange for the 

214 



marriage to take place the better it will be for 
Elfine/* 

Oh, dear ! I had hoped for a year's engagement, 
at least. Dick is still so young." 

The more reason why he should begin at once to 
be utterly happy,” smiled Flora. Indeed, Mrs. 
Hawk-Monitor, I do really think it will be better if 
you can arrange for the wedding to take place in a 
month at the latest. Things at the farm are sure to 
be very unpleasant for Elfine until she leaves, and I 
am sure you do not want a lot of interference and 
discussion jfrom the Starkadders, do you ? ” 

Such a dreadful name, too,” mused Mrs. Hawk- 
Monitor. 

At this moment, the arrival of Seth and Claud, 
dressed ready to depart, made it impossible to discuss 
the matter any fiirther. Mrs. Hawk-Monitor had 
only time to press Flora's hand, murmuring in a 
friendlier tone than she had yet used : I will think 
over what you say. Perhaps, after all, everything is 
for the best.” 

So Flora went off in comparatively high spirits. 

They foimd Elfine, looking like a white rose-peony, 
waiting for them at the door ; Dick was with her, 
tenderly saying good-night to her. Flora could sec 
their car, with the chauffem at the door, waiting for 
them at the foot of the steps, so after a pleasant farewell 
to Dick they got away at last. 

Flora felt quite desolate after they had dropped 
Claud outside the Crown of Roses, where he was 
staying the night. She was rather sleepy and cross 
and suffering firom a reaction after the evening's 

215 



excitements. So she shut her eyes and slept more or 
less successfully imtil the car was within two miles or 
so from home. Then she woke with a little start. 
Voices had roused her. Seth was saying, in a tone 
which was distinctly tinged with gloating : 

“ Ay, th’ old ’un’U have summat to say about this 
night’s work.” 

“ Gran dm amma can’t stop me getting married ! ” 

“ Maybe not, but she’ll have a dom good try.” 

“ She cannot do much in a month,” broke in Flora, 
coldly, “ and possibly Elfine will be staying with the 
Hawk-Monitors for most of the time. She must just 
avoid Aunt Ada while she is in the house, that’s all. 
Heaven knows it ought not to be very difficult to do, 
considering that Aunt Ada never leaves her bedroom.” 

Seth gave a low, gloating laugh. An animal 
quality throbbed in the sound like the network of veins 
below a roat’s fur. The car was just drawing up at 
the gate leading into the yard, and Seth, leaning past 
Flora, pointed through the window with one thick 
finger at the farmhouse. 

Flora stMed in the direction to which he pointed 
and saw, with a thrill of dismay, that the windows of 
the farm were ablaze with light I 



CHAPTER XVI 


P erhaps “ ablaze ” is too strong a word. There 
was a distinct suggestion of corpse-lights and 
railway station waiting-rooms about the lights which 
shone forth from the windows of Gold Comfort. But 
compared with the heavy, muffling darkness of the 
night in which the countryside was stmk, the lights 
looked positively rorty. 

Oh, my goodness ! ” said Flora. 

“ It’s Grandmamma ! ” whispered Elfine, who had 
gone very white. “ She must have chosen this laight, 
of aU nights, to come downstairs, and have the family 
party.” 

“ Nonsense ! You don’t have parties at places like 
Cold Comfort,” said Flora, taking notes from her bag 
with which to pay the chauffeur. She got out of the 
car, stretching a little and inhaling the fresh, sweet 
night air, and put them into his hand. 

“ There. Thank you very much. Everything went 
off most satisfactorily. Good-night.” 

And the chauffeur, having thanked her respectfully 
for his tip, backed the car out of the yard, and away 
down the lane towards the road. 

The headlights swept the hedges and touched the 
grass to livid green; 

They heard him change into top, in the dead, eerie 
silence and darkness. 

aiy 



Then the friendly sound of the engine began to 
recede, until it was absorbed into the vast quiet of 
the night. 

They turned and looked towards the house. 

The lights in the windows had a leering, waiting 
look, like that on the faces of old pimps who sit in the 
caf^ of Holbom Viaduct, plying their casual bartery. 
A thin wind snivelled among die rotting stacks of 
Gold Comfort, spreading itself in a sheet of flowing 
sound across the mossed tiles. Darkness whined with 
the soundless urge of growth in the hedges, but that 
did not help any. 

“ Ay, ’tes Grandmother,” said Seth, sombrely. 
“ She’m holding the Counting. Ay, ’tes her, all 
right.” 

“ What on earth,” said Flora, peevishly, beginning 
to pick her way across the yard, “ is the Counting, 
and why in the name of all that’s inconvenient should 
it be held at half-past one in the morning ? ” 

“ ’Tes the record of th’ family that Grandmother 
holds ivery year. See — ^we’m violent folk, we Stark- 
adders. Some on us pushes others down wells. Some 
on us dies in childer-birth. There’s others as die o’ 
drink or goes mad. There’s a whole heap on us, too. 
’Tes difficult to keep count on us. So once a year 
Grandmother she holds a gatherin’, called the Count- 
ing, and she counts us all, to see how many on us 
’as died m th’ year.” 

“ Then she can count me out,” retorted Flora, 
raising her hand to knock at the kitchen door. 

Then a thought struck her. 

“ Seth,” she whispered, “ had you any idea that 
318 



your grandmother was going to hold this infernal 
Coimting to-night ? ” 

She saw the gleam of his teeth in the dimness. 

“ Reckon I had,” he drawled. 

“Then you’re a crashing bounder,” said Flora, 
vigorously, “ and I hope your water-voles die. Now, 
Elfine, brace up. We are, I am afraid, for it. You 
had best not say a word. I will do the talking.” 

And she knocked at the door. 

The silence which swayed softly out from within to 
meet them was a tangible thing. It had plangency. 
It moulded and compelled. It imposed and awed. 

It was broken by heavy footsteps. Someone was 
crossing the kitchen floor in hob-nailed boots. A hand 
fumbled with the bolts. Then the door was slowly 
opened, and Urk stood looking up at them, his face 
twisted into a Japanese Ho-mask of lust, fury and grief. 
Flora could hear Elfine’s terrified breathing behind 
her, in the darkness, and put out a comforting hand. 
It was clasped and held convulsively. 

The great kitchen was full of people. They were 
all silent, and aU painted over by the leaping firelight 
with a hellish red glow. Flora could distinguish Amos, 
Judith, Meriam, the hired girl ; Adam, Ezra, and 
Harkaway ; Caraway, Luke and Mark and several 
of the farm-hands. They were all grouped, in a rough 
semi-circle, about someone who sat in a great high- 
backed chair by the fire. The dim gold lamplight 
and the restless firelight made Rembrandt shadows in 
the remoter comers of the kitchen, and threw the dwarf 
and giant shadows of the Starkadders across the 
ceiling. 


219 



A pungent scent came swooning out to meet the 
inrush of night air. It was sickly-sweet, and strange 
to Flora. Then she saw that the heat of the fire had 
caused the long, pink buds of the sukebind to burst ; 
the wreath which hung round the portrait of Fig 
Starkadder was covered with large flowers whose 
petals sprang back, like snarling fangs, to show the 
shameless heart that sent out full gusts of sweetness. 

Everybody was staring at the door. The silence 
was terrific. It seemed the air must burst with its 
pressure, and the flickering movement of the light and 
the fireglow upon the faces of the Starkadders was so 
restlessly volatile that it emphasised the strange stillness 
of their bodies. Flora was trying to decide just 
what the kitchen looked like, and came to the con- 
clusion it was the Chamber of Horrors at Madame 
Tussaud’s. 

“ Well, well,” she said, amiably, stepping over the 
doorstep and drawing oflF her gloves, “ the gang is aU 
here, isn’t it ! Is that Big Business I see there in the 
comer? Oh, I beg your pardon, it’s Micah. I 
suppose there aren’t any sandwiches ? ” 

This cracked the social ice a bit. Signs of life were 
observed. 

“ There’s food on the table,” said Judith, lifelessly, 
coming forward, with her burning eyes fixed upon 
Seth ; “ but first, Robert Poste’s child, you must 
greet your Aunt Ada Doom.” 

And she took Flora’s hand (Flora was very bucked 
that she had shed her clean gloves) and led her up to 
the figure which sat in the high-backed chair by the 
fire. 


220 



“ Mother,” said Judith, “ this is Flora, Robert 
Poste’s child. I have spoken to you of her.” 

“ How d’ye do, Aunt Ada ? ” said Flora, pleasantly, 
putting out her hand. But Aunt Ada made no effort 
to take it. She folded her own hands a little more 
closely upon a copy of the “ Milk Producers’ Weekly 
Bulletin and Gowkeepers’ Guide,” which she held on 
her lap, and observed, in a low, toneless voice : 

“ I saw something nasty in the woodshed.” 

Flora turned to Judith, with raised and enquiring 
eyebrows. A murmur came from the rest of the 
company, which was watching closely. 

“ ’Tes one of her bad nights,” said Judith, whose 
gaze kept wandering piteously in the direction of Seth 
(he was wolfing beef in a comer). “ Mother,” she 
said, louder, “ don’t you know me ? It’s Judith. 
I have brought Flora Poste to see you — ^Robert Poste’s 
child.” 

“ Nay. ... I saw something nasty in the wood- 
shed,” said Aimt Ada Doom, fretfully moving her 
great head from side to side. “ ’Twas a bumin’ 
noonday . . . sixty-nine years ago. And me no 
bigger than a titty-wren. And I saw something 
na 

Well, perhaps she likes it better that way,” said 
Flora, soothingly. She had been observing Aunt 
Ada’s firm chin, clear eyes, tight litde mouth and close 
grip upon the Milk Producers’ Weekly Bulletin and 
Gowkeepers’ Guide,” and she came to the conclusion 
that if Aunt Ada was mad, then she. Flora, was one 
of the Marx Brothers. 

“ Saw something nasty in the woodshed ! ! ! ” 
221 



suddenly shrilled Aunt Ada, smiting at Judith with 
the “ Milk Producers’ Weekly Bulletin and Cow- 
keepers’ Guide,” “ something nasty ! Take it away. 
You’re all wicked and cruel. You want to go away 
and leave me alone in the woodshed. But you never 
shall. None of you. Never ! There have always 
been Starkadders at Cold Comfort. You must all 
stay here with me, all of you : Judith, Amos, Micah, 
Urk, Luke, Mark, Elfine, Caraway, Harkaway, 
Reuben and Seth. Where’s Sedi ? Where’s my 
darling? Come — come here, Seth.” 

Seth came pus hing his way through the crowd of 
relations, with his mouth full of beef and bread. 
“ Here, grandma,” he crooned, soothingly. “ Here 
I am. I’ll niver leave ’ee — ^niver.” 

(“ Do not look at Seth, woman,” whispered Amos, 
terribly, in Judith’s ear. “ You are always looking 
at him.”) 

“ That’s my good boy . . . my mommet . . . my 
pippet. . . .” the old woman murminred, patting 
Seth’s head with the “ Milk Producers’ Weekly Bulletin 
and Cowkeepers’ Guide.” “ Why, how grand he is 
to-night ! V^at’s this ? What’s all this ? ” And she 
jerked at Seth’s dinner-jacket. “ What’ve you been 
doing, boy ? Tell your granny.” 

flora could see, from the way in which Aunt Ada’s 
remarkably shrewd eyes beneath their heavy lids were 
examining Seth’s person that she had rumbled their 
little outing. There was just time to save their faces 
before the deluge. So she took a deep breath and 
said loudly and clearly : 

“ He’s been to Godmere, to Richard Hawk-Monitor’s 


232 



twenty-first birthday dance. So have I. So has 
Elfine. So has a fiiend of mine called Claud Hart- 
Harris, whom none of you know. And, what is more, 
Aunt Ada, Elfine and Richard Hawk-Monitor are 
engaged to be married, and will be married, too, in 
about a month firom now.” 

There came a terrible cry firom the shadows 
the sink. Everybody started violently and tmmed to 
stare in the direction whence it came. It was Urk — 
Urk lying face downwards in the beef sandwiches, 
with one hand pressed upon his heart in dreadful 
agony. The hired girl, Meriam, laid her rough hand 
upon his bowed head and timidly patted it, but he 
shook her off with a movement like a weasel in a trap. 

“ My little water-vole,” they heard him moan. 
“ My Httle water-vole ! ” 

A babel broke out, in which Aunt Ada could dimly 
be discerned beating at everybody with the “ Milk 
Producers’ Weekly Bulletin and Cowkeepers’ Guide,” 
and shrilly screaming : “ I saw it ... I saw it ! I 
shall go mad. ... I can’t bear it. . . . There have 
always been Starkadders at Cold Comfort. I saw 
something nasty in the woodshed . . . something 
nasty . . . nasty . . . nasty. . . .” 

Seth took her hands and held them in his, kneeling 
before her and speaking wooingly to her, as though 
she were a sick child. Flora had dragged Elfine up 
on to a table in a comer near the fireplace, out of the 
racket, and was pensively feeding the two of them on 
bread and butter. She had given up all hope of 
getting to bed that night. It was nearly half-past two, 
and everybody seemed sitting pretty for the sunrise. 

2S3 



She observed several females unknown to her flitting 
dejectedly about in the gloom, replenishing plates 
with bread and butter and occasionally weeping in 
corners. 

“ Who^s that ? ’’ she asked Elfine, pointing inter- 
estedly at one who had a perfectly flat bust and a 
face like a baby bird, all goggle eyes and beaky 
nose. This one was weeping half inside a boot cup- 
board. 

’Tes poor Rennett,” said Elfine, sleepily. Oh, 
Flora, I’m so happy, but I do wish we could go to 
bed, don’t you ? ” 

“ Presently, yes. So that’s poor Rennett, is it ? 
Why (if it be not tactless to ask) are all her clothes 
sopping wet ? ” 

“ Oh ! she jumped down the well, about eleven 
o’clock, Meriam, the hired girl, told me. Grandmama 
kept on mocking at her because she’s an old maid. 
She said Rennett couldn’t even keep a tight hold on 
Mark Dolour when she had got him, and poor Rennett 
had hysterics, and then Grandma kept on saying 
things about — about flat bosoms and things, and then 
Rennett ran out and jumped down the well. And 
Grandma had an attack.” 

Serve her right, the old trout,” muttered Flora, 
yawning. ‘‘ Hey, what’s up now ? ” For a renewed 
uproar had broken out in the midst of the crowd 
gathered round Aunt Ada. 

By standing on the table and peering through the 
confusing flicker of the firelight and lamplight. Flora 
and Elfine could distinguish Amos, who was bending 
over Aunt Ada Doom’s chair, and thundering at her, 

224 



There was such an infernal clatter going on from 
Micah, Ezra, Reuben, Seth, Judith, Caraway, Harka- 
way, Susan, Letty, Prue, Adam, Jane, Phoebe, Mark 
and Luke that it was difficult to make out what he 
was saying, but suddenly he raised his voice to a roar, 
and the others were silent : 

So I mun go where th’ Lord^s work calls me 
to go, and spread th^ Lord’s word abroad in strange 
places. Ah, ’tes terrible to have to go, but I mun do 
it. I been wrestlin’ and prayin’ and broodin’ over 
it, and I know th’ truth at last. I mun go abroad in 
one o’ they Ford vans, preachin’ all over th’ country- 
side. Ay, like th’ Apostles of old. I have heard my 
call, and I mun follow it.” He flung his arms wide, 
and stood with the firelight playing its scarlet fantasia 
upon his exalted face. 

No. . . . No ! ” screamed Aunt Ada Doom, on 
a high note that cracked with her agony. I cannot 
bear it. There have always been Starkadders at Cold 
Comfort. You mustn’t go . . . none of you must 
go. ... I shall go mad ! I saw something nasty in 
the woodshed. . . . Ah . . . ah . . . cA. . . .” 

She struggled to her feet, supported by Seth and 
Judith, and struck weakly at Amos with the '' Milk 
Producers’ Weekly Bulletin and Gowkeepers’ Guide ” 
(which was looking a bit the worse for wear by this 
time). His great body flinched from the blow, but 
still he stood rigid, his eyes fixed triumphantly upon 
some far-oflf, ecstatic vision, the red light wavering and 
flickering across his face. 

‘‘ I mun go . . .” he repeated, in a strange, soft 
voice. “ This very night I mun go. I hear th’ glad 

225 



voices o’ angels callin’ me out over th’ ploughed fields 
wheer th’ liddle seedlings is clappin’ their hands in 
prayer ; and besides, I arranged wi’ Agony Beetle’s 
brother to pick me up in th’ Luimon milk-van at 
half-past three, so I’ve no time to lose. Ay, ’tes 
good-bye to you all. Mother, I’ve broken yer chain 
at last, wi’ th’ help o’ th’ angels and the Lord’s word. 
Wheer’s my hat ? ” 

Reuben silently handed it to his father (he had had 
it ready for the last ten minutes). 

Aunt Ada Doom sat huddled in her chair, breathing 
feebly and fast, striking impotently at the air with the 
“ Milk Producers’ Weekly Bulletin and Cowkeepers’ 
Guide.” Her eyes, slots of pain in her grey face, were 
turned on Amos. They blazed with hate, like flaring 
candles that feel the pressing dark all about them and 
flare the brighter for their fear. 

“Ay . . .” she whispered. “Ay ... so you go, 
and leave me in the woodshed. There have always 
been Starkadders at Cold Comfort . . . but that 
means no thing to you. I shall go mad. ... I shall 
die here, alone, in the woodshed, with nasty — ^things ” 
— ^her voice thickened ; she wrung her hands dis- 
tractedly, as though to firee them of some obscene 
spiritual treacle — “ pressing on me . . . alone . . . 
alone . . 

Her voice trailed into the silence. Her head sunk 
into her breast. Her face was drained of blood : grey, 
broken. 

Amos moved with great, slow steps to the door. 
No one moved. The hush which firoze the room was 
broken only by the idle rippling dance of the flames. 

226 



Amos jerked open the door, and there was the vast, 
indifferent face of the night peering in. 

“ Amos ! ” 

It was a screech from her heart-roots. It buried 
itself in his plexus. But he never turned. He stepped 
blunderingly out into the dark — ^and was gone. 

Suddenly there was a wild cry from the comer in 
the shadows by the sink. Urk came stumbling forward, 
dragging the hired girl, Meriam, in his wake. 

(Flora woke up Elfine, who had gone to sleep with 
her head on her shoulder, and pointed out that some 
more ftm was just beginning. It was only a quarter 
past three.) 

Urk was chalk-white. A trail of blood drooled 
down his chin. His eyes were pools of pain, in which 
his bruised thoughts darted and fed like tortured fish. 
He was laughing insanely, noiselessly. Meriam shrank 
back from him, livid with fear. 

“ Me and the water-voles • . . we’ve failed,” he 
babbled in a low, toneless voice. “ We’re beaten. 
We planned a nest for her up there by Ticklepenny’s 
Well, when the egg-plants was in bloom. And now 

she’s given herseF to him, the dirty stuck-up, lying 

He choked, and had to fight for breath for a second. 
“ When she was an hour old, I made a mark on her 
feeding bottle, in water-vole’s blood. She were mine, 
see ? Mine ! And I’ve lost her. . . , Oh, why did 
I iver think she were mine ? ” 

He turned upon Meriam, who shrank back in 
terror. 

“ Come here— you. I’ll take you instead. Ay, dirt 
as you are, I’ll take you, and we’U sink into th’ mud 

827 



together. There have always been Starkadders at 
Cold Comfort, and now there’ll be a Beetle too.” 

“ And not the first neither, as you’d know if you’d 
ever cleaned out the larder,” said a voice, tartly. It 
wzis Mrs. Beetle herself, who, hitherto unobserved by 
Flora, had been busily cutting bread and butter and 
replenishing the glasses of the farm-hands in a far 
comer of the long kitchen. She now came forward 
into the circle about the fire, and confronted Urk with 
her arms akimbo. 

“ Well . . . ’oo’s talking about dirt ? ’Eaven knows, 
you should know something about it, in that coat 
and them trousers. Enough ter turn up one of yer 
precious water-voles, you are. A pity you don’t 
spend a bit less time with yer old water-voles and a 
bit more with a soap and fiaimel.” 

Here she received unexpected support firom Mark 
Dolour, who called in a feeling tone from the far end 
of the kitchen : 

“Ay, that’s right.” 

“ Don’t you ’ave ’im, ducky, unless you feel like it,” 
advised Mrs. Beetle, turning to Meriam. “ You’re 
fuU young yet, and ’e won’t see forty again.” 

“ I don’t mind. I’ll ’ave him, if ’un wants me,” 
said Meriam, amiably. “ I can always make ’im 
wash a bit, if I feels like it.” 

Urk gave a wild laugh. His hand fell on her 
shoulder, and he drew her to him and pressed a savage 
kiss fuU on her open mouth. Aunt Ada Doom, choking 
with rage, stmek at them with the “ Milk Producers’ 
Weekly Bulletin and Cowkeepers’ Guide,” but the 
blow missed. She fell back, gasping, exhausted. 

228 



Gome, my beauty — ^my handful of dirt. I mun 
carry thee up to Ticklepenny’s and show 'ee to the 
water-voles.’’ Urk’s face was working with passion. 

“ What ! At this time o’ night ? ” cried Mrs. 
Beetle, scandalised. 

Urk put one arm round Meriam’s waist and heaved 
away, but could not budge her from the floor. He 
cursed aloud, and, kneeling down, placed his arms 
about her middle, and heaved again. She did not 
stir. Next he wrapped his arms about her shoulders, 
and below her knees. She declined upon him, and 
he, staggering beneath her, sank to the floor. Mrs. 
Beetle made a sound resembling ‘‘ t-t-t-t-t.” 

Mark Dolour was heard to mutter that th’ Fireman’s 
Lift was as good a hold as any he knew. 

Now Urk made Meriam stand in the middle of the 
floor, and with a low, passionful cry, ran at her. 

“ Come, my beauty.” 

The sheer animal weight of the man bore her up 
into his clutching arms. Mark Dolour (who dearly 
loved a bit of sport) held open the door, and Urk and 
his burden rushed out into the dark and the earthy 
scents of the young spring night. 

A silence fell. 

The door remained open, idly swinging in a slow, 
cold wind which had arisen. 

As though frozen, the group within the kitchen 
waited for the distant crash which should teU them 
that Urk had fallen down. 

Pretty soon it came : and Mark Dolour shut the 
door. 

It was now four o’clock. Elfine had gone to sleep 
i6 229 



again. So had all the farm-hands except Mark 
Dolour. The fire had sunk to a red, lascivious bed of 
coals, that waned, and then, on the other hand, waxed 
again in the slow wind which blew under the door. 

Flora was desperately sleepy ; she felt as though she 
were at one of Eugene O’Neill’s plays ; the kind that goes 
on for hours and hours and hours, until the R.S.P.C. 
Audiences batters the doors of the theatre in and insists 
on a tea interval. 

There was no doubt that the fim was wearing a bit 
thin. Judith, huddled in a comer, was looking 
broodingly at Seth from under her raised hand. 
Reuben was brooding in another corner. The suke- 
bind flowers were fading. Seth was studying a copy 
of “ Photo Bits ” which he had produced from the 
pocket of his evening jacket. 

Only Aimt Ada Doom sat upright, her eyes fixed 
upon the distance. She was rigid. Her lips moved 
softly. Flora, from her refuge on the table, could 
make out what she was saying, and it soimded none 
too festive. 

“ Two of them . . . gone. Elfine . . . Amos . . . 
and I’m alone in the woodshed now. . . . Who took 
them away ? Who took them away ? I must know 
... I must know. . . . That chit. That brat. 
Robert Poste’s child.” 

The great bed of red coals, slowly settling into its 
last sleep towards extinction, threw a glare on her old 
face, and gave her the look of a carving in a Glothic 
cathedral. Rennett had crept forward until she was 
within a few feet of her great-aunt (for such was the 
relationship between Rennett and Ada Doom), and 

230 



stood looking down at her with a mad glare in her 
pale eyes. 

Suddenly, without turning round, Aunt Ada struck 
at her with the “ Milk Producers’ Weekly Bulletin and 
Gowkeepers’ Guide,” and Rennett fled back to her 
comer. 

A withered flower fell from the sukcbind wreath 
into the coals. 

It was half-psist four. 

Suddenly, Flora felt a draught at her back. She 
looked round crossly, and found herself staring into 
the face of Reuben, who had opened the little con- 
cealed door behind the great bulge of the chimneypiecc, 
which led out into the yard. 

“ Come on,” whispered Reuben, soimdlessly. “ ’Tes 
time ’ee were in bed.” 

Amazed and grateful. Flora silently woke Elfine, 
and with breathless caution they slid off the table and 
tiptoed across to the little door. Reuben drew them 
sjffely through it, and closed it noiselessly. 

They stood outside in the yard, in a bitter wind, 
with the first streaks of cold light lying across the purple 
sky. The way to their beds lay clear before them. 

“ Reuben,” said Flora, too drunk with sleep to 
articulate clearly, but remembering her manners, 
“ you are an utter lamb. Why did you ? ” 

“ You got ffi’ old devil out of th’ way for me.” 

“ Oh . . . that,” yawned Flora. 

“ Ay ... an’ I doan’t forget. Eh, th’ farm’ll be 
mine now, surelie.” 

“ So it will,” said Flora, amiably. “ Such fun for 
you.” 


231 



Suddenly a shocking row broke out in the kitchen 
behind them. The Starkadders were off again. 

But Flora never knew what it was about. She was 
asleep where she stood. She walked up to her room 
like an automaton, just stayed awake long enough to 
undress, and then fell into bed like a log. 


232 



CHAPTER XVII 


T he next day was Sunday, so thank goodness 
everybody could stay in bed and get over the 
shocks of the night before. At least, that is what most 
families would have done. But the Starkadders were 
not like most families. Life burned in them vsdth a 
fiercer edge, and by seven o’clock most of them were 
up and, to a certain extent, doing. Reuben, of course, 
had much to do because of Amos’s sudden departure. 

He now thought of himself as master of the farm, 
and a slow tide of satisfied earth-lust indolently ebbed 
and flowed in his veins as he began his daily task of 
counting the chickens’ feathers. 

Prue, Susan, Letty, Phoebe and Jane had been 
escorted back to Howling by Adam, at half-past five 
that mor ning , and he had returned just in time to 
begin the milkin g. He was stiU bewildered by the 
fact of Elfine’s betrothal. The sound of old wedding- 
bells danced between the tufts of hair in his withered 
ears, and catches of country rhymes sung before 
George the Fourth was bom : 

“ Come rae, come snow. 

So maidies mun go.” 

he sang, over and over again to himself as he milked 
Feckless. He saw, yet did not see, that Aimless had 
lost another hoof. 


833 



The dawn widened into an exquisite spring day. 
Soft, wool-like puffs of sound came from the thrushes’ 
throats in the trees. The uneasy year, tortured by its 
spring of adolescence, broke into bud-spots in hedge, 
copse, spinney and byre. 

Judith sat in the kitchen, looking out with leaden 
eyes across the disturbed expanse of the teeming 
countryside. Her face was grey. Rennett huddled 
by the fire, stirring some rather nasty jam she had 
suddenly thought she would make. She had decided 
to stay behind when the other female Starkadders had 
gone off with Adam ; her flayed soul shrank, obliquely, 
from their unspoken pity. 

So noon came, and passed. A rude meal was 
prepared by Adam, and eaten (some of it) by the rest 
in the great kitchen. Old Ada Doom kept to her 
room, whence she had been carried at six o’clock that 
morning by Micah, Seth, Mark Dolour, Caraway and 
Harkaway. 

None dared go in to her. She sat alone, a huddled, 
vast ruin of flesh, staring imseeingly out between her 
wrinkled lids. Her fingers picked endlessly at the 
“ Milk Producers’ Weekly Bulletin and, Gowkeepers’ 
Guide.” She did not think or see. The sharp blue 
air of spring thundered silently on window-panes 
fogged by her slow, batrachian breath. Powerless 
waves of fury coursed over her inert body. Sbmetimes 
names burst out of her green lips : “ Amos . . . 
Elfine . . . Urk. . . Sometimes they just stayed 
inside. 

No one had seen anything of Urk since he had gone 
galloping out into the night carrying Meriam, the 

234 



hired girl. It was generally assumed that he had 
drowned her aind then himself. Who cared, anyway? 


As for Flora, she was stiU asleep at half-past three 
in the afternoon, and would have slept on comfortably 
enough imtil tea-time, but that she was aroused by a 
knocking at her door and the excited voice of Mrs. 
Beetle proclaiming that there was two gentlemen to 
see her. 

“ Have you got them there ? ” asked Flora, sleepily. 

Mrs. Beetle was much shocked. She said indeed 
not, they was in Miss Poste’s parlour. 

“ Well . . . who are they ? I mean, did they tell 
you their names ? ” 

“ One’s that Mr. Mybug, miss, and the other’s a 
gentleman ’oo says ’is name’s Neck.” 

“ Oh, yes ... of course, how delightful. Ask 
them both to wait till I come. I won’t be long.” 
And Flora began slowly to dress, for she would not 
mzike herself feel ill by bounding vigorously out of 
bed, even though she was delighted at the idea of 
seeing her dear Mr. Neck again. As for Mr. Mybug, 
he was a nuisance, but could be coped with easily 
enough. 

She went downstairs at last, looking as firesh as a 
leaf, and as she entered her litde parlour (wherein 
Mrs. Beetle had kindled a fire) Mr. Neck advanced to 
meet her, holding out both his hands and saying : 

“ Well, well, sweetheart. How’s the girl ? ” 

Flora greeted him with warmth. He had already 
had some conversation with Mr. Mybug, who was 

235 



looking rather sulky and miserable because he had 
hoped to find Flora alone and have a lovely long scene 
with her, apologising for his behaviour last night, and 
talking a lot about himself. He became more sulky 
at first on hearing Mr. Neck address Flora as sweet- 
heart, but after listening to a little of their conversation, 
he decided that Mr. Neck was the sort of Amusing 
Type that calls everybody sweetheart, and did not 
mind so much. 

Flora instructed Mrs. Beetle to bring them some tea, 
which soon came, and they sat very pleasantly in the 
sunlight, which streamed through the window of the 
little green parlour, drinking their tea and conversing. 

Flora felt sleepy and amiable. She had made up 
her mind that Mr. Neck must not go without seeing 
Seth, and quietly told Mrs. Beetle to send him to the 
parlour as soon as he could be found ; but apart fi:om 
this decision, she was not worrying about anything at aU. 

“ Are you over here looking for English film stars, 
Mr. Neck ? ” asked Mr. Mybug, eating a little cake 
that Flora had wanted for herself. 

“That’s so. I want to find me another Clark 
Gable. Yeah, you wouldn’t remember him, maybe. 
That’s twenty years ago.” 

“But I have seen him at a Sunday Film Club 
Repertory Show, in a film called ‘ Mounting Passion ’,” 
said Mr. Mybug, eagerly. “ Do you know the work 
of the Sunday Film Club Repertory people at all ? ” 

“ rU buy it,” said Mr. Neck, who had taken a 
disl i k e to Mr. Mybug. “ Well, I want a second Clark 
Gable, see ? I want a big, husky stiff that smells of 
the great outdoors, with a golden voice. I want 

236 



passion. I want red blood. I don’t want no sissies, 
see ? Sissies give me a pain in the neck, and they’re 
beginning to give the great American public a pain 
in the neck too.” 

“ Do you know the work of Limf ? ” asked Mr. 
Mybug. 

“ Never heard of ’em,” said Mr. Neck. “ Thank 
you, sweetheart” (to Flora, who was feeding him 
cake). “You know, Mr. Mybug, we gotta responsi- 
bility to the public. We gotta give them what they 
want, yet it’s gotta be clean. Boy, that’s difficult. 
I’ll teU you it’s difficult. I want a man who can give 
them what they want, yet give it them so’s it don’t 
leave a taste in their mouths.” He paused and drank 
tea. The sunshine, vivid as a Kleig light, revealed 
every wrinkle in his melancholy little monkeyish face 
and lit the fresh red carnation in his button-hole. For 
Mr. Neck was a great dandy, who usually changed his 
button-hole twice a day. 

“ I want a man to fetch the women,” he went on. 
“ I want a new Gary Cooper (but, lessee, thass twenty 
years ago), only more rit2y. Someone who can look 
good in a tuxedo, and yet handle one of them old- 
world ploughs. (Say, I seen four ploughs since I 
been over this trip.) Well, who’ve I got? I got 
Teck Jones. Yeah, well, Teck’s a good kid ; he can 
ride all right, but he’s got no body-urge. I got 
Valentine Orlo. Well, he looks like a wop. They 
won’t stsind for no more wops since poor MoreUi went 
to the chair in ’42. No, wops is off. Well, I got 
Peregrine Howard. He’s a Britisher. No one can’t 
say his first name right, so he’s no good. There’s 

237 



Slake Fountain. Yeah, FU say there is, too. We keep 
a gang of hoodlums on their toes at twenty a week 
each to sober him up every morning before he comes 
on the set. Then there’s Jerry Badger, the sort of nice 
egg you’d like your kid sister to marry, but nothing 
to him. Nothing at all. Well, what do I get out of 
it ? Nothing. I gotta find somebody, that’s all.” 

“ Have you ever seen Alexandre Fin ? ” asked Mr. 
Mybug. “ I saw him in Pepin’s last fiObtn, ‘ La Plume 
de Ma Xante,’ in Paris last January. Very amusing 
stuff. They all wore glass clothes, you know, and 
moved in time to a metronome.” 

“Oh, yeah?” said Mr. Neck. “A frog, eh? 
Frogs is all xmder five feet. I want a big, husky fella : 
the kinda fella that would look good cuddling a kid. 
Is there another cup, sweetheart ? ” 

Flora poured him some. 

“ Yeah,” he went on. “ I seen that fihn in Paris, 
too. It gave me a ptiin. Gave me a lot of new dope, 
though. What not to do, and all that. I’ve met 
Pepin, too. The poor egg’s cuckoo.” 

“ He is much admired by the yoimger men,” said 
Mr. Mybug, daringly, glancing at Flora for approval. 

“ That helps a whole heap,” said Mr. Neck. 

“Then your interest in &e cinema, Mr. Neck, is 
entirely commercial ? I mean, you think nothing of its 
aesthetic possibilities ? ” 

“ I gotta responsibility. If your firog fiiend had to 
fill fifteen thousand dollars’ worth of movie seats 
every day, he’d have to think of a better stunt than a 
lot of guys wearin’ glass pants.” 

He paused and reflected. 

238 



“ Say, though, that’s an idea. A guy buys a new 
tuxedo, see. Then he offends some ritzy old egg, 
see ? A magician, or something, and this old egg puts 
a curse on him. Well, this egg (the guy in the tuxedo) 
goes off to a swell party, and when he comes in aU the 
girls scream. That kind o’ stuff. Well, he can’t see 
his pants is turned into glass by this other old egg (the 
magician, see ?), and he says : ‘ Whattha heU,’ and all 
the rest of it. Yeah, that’s an idea.” 

While he was speaking, Seth had come silently, with 
his graceful, pantherish tread, to the door of the room ; 
and now stood there, looking down enquiringly at 
Flora. She smiled across at him, motioning him to be 
silent. Mr. Neck’s back was towards the door, so 
that he could not see Seth, but when he saw Flora 
smile he turned half round, and looked across at the 
doorway to see at whom her gesture was directed. 

And he saw Seth. 

A silence feU. The young man stood in the warm 
light of the declining sun, his bare throat and boldly 
moulded features looking as though they were bathed 
in gold. His pose was easy and graceful. A superb 
self-confidence radiated firom him, as it does firom any 
healthy animal. He met Mr. Neck’s stare with an 
impudent stare of his own, his head lowered and 
slightly forward. He looked exactly what he was, the 
local sexually successful bounder. Millions of women 
were to realise, in the next five years, that Seth could 
be transported in fancy to a Welsh mining village, a 
shoddy North country seaside town, a raw city in the 
plains of the Middle West, and still remain eternally 
and unchangeably the local irresistible bounder. 

239 



Is it any wonder that Mr. Neck broke the silence by 
flinging up his hand and saying in a hoarse whisper ; 
“ That’s it, sweetheart ! That’s got it ! Hold it ! ” 

And Seth was so soaked in movie slang that he held 
it, for another second or so of silence. 

Flora broke it by saying : “ Oh, Seth, there you are. 
I wanted Mr. Neck to see you. Earl, this is my cousin, 
Seth Starkadder. He’s very interested in the talkies. 
Mr. Neck is a producer, Seth.” 

Mr. Neck, forgetful of everything else, was craning 
forward with his head slightly bent downwards, to 
hear Seth speak. And when that deep, warm drawl 
came — “ Pleased to meet you, Mr. Neck ” — Mr. Neck 
looked up with an expression of such relief and delight 
that it was just as though he had clapped his hands. 

“ WeU, well,” said Mr. Neck, surveying Seth rather 
as though Seth were his dinner (as indeed he was to 
be for some years to come). “ How’s the boy? So 
you’re a fan, eh ? You and me must get acquainted, 
huh ? Maybe you’d thought of going in for the game 
yourself? ” 

Mr.. Mybug tilted comfortably back in his chair, 
choosing a little cake to eat, and prepared to enjoy the 
sight of Seth being roasted. But he had (as we know) 
backed the wrong horse. 

Seth scowled and drew back. Mr. Neck almost 
patted his face with rapture as he observed how Seth’s 
every mood was reflected, like a child’s, in his coun- 
tenance. 

“No. . . . No, I’m not kidding,” he observed, 
amiably. “ I mean it. Would you like to go on the 
talkies ? ” 



A great cry broke from Seth. Mr. Mybug lost his 
balance and fell over backwards, chokin g with cake. 
No one noticed him. All eyes were on Seth. A glory 
lit his face. Slowly, lingeringly, the words broke 
from him : 

“ More than anything else in the world.” 

“ Well, ain’t that dandy ? ” said Mr. Neck, looking 
round proudly for agreement and support. “ He 
wants to be a movie star and I want to make him one. 
What do you know about that ? Usually, it’s just the 
other way about. Now, sweetheart, get your grip, 
and we’ll be off. We’re catching the Atlantic flier 
from Brighton at eight to-night. Say, though, what 
about your folks, huh ? What about Monuna ? Will 
she need squaring ? ” 

“ I will teU you aU about that, Earl. Seth, go and 
pack a bag with everything you need for the journey. 
Put on a big coat — ^you are going to fly, you know, 
and it may be cold at first.” 

Seth obeyed Flora without a word, and when he had 
gone she explained his circumstances to Mr. Neck. 

“ So it’s aU right if Grandma don’t give it the razz, 
huh? Well, we must go out quiet, thass all. Tell 
Grandma not to fuss. We’ll send her five grand 
out of the first picture he makes. Oh, boy” — and 
here he smote Mr. Mybug, who was still choking over 
his little cake — “ I got him ! I got him ! Whaddya 
say his name is — Seth ? Thassa sissy sort of a name, 
but it’ll do. It’s kinda different. Keep ’em guessin’. 
Oh, boy, wait till I get him a tuxedo ! Wait till I 
start his publicity. We must find a new angle. 
Lessee. . . . Maybe he’d better be shy. No . . . 

241 



poor Charley Ford ran that to death. Maybe he hates 
women . . • yeah, thass it. He hates women and he 
hates the movies. Like heU he does. Oh, boy, that’ll 
fetch ’em ! It ’ud take more than anyone’s grandma to 
stop me now.” 


242 



? 


CHAPTER XVIII 

W HEN Seth returned, wearing his best hat and 
his overcoat and carrying a suit-case, everybody 
moved towards the door. Mr. Neck’s car was waiting 
for him in the yard, and he hung on to Seth’s arm every 
step of the way there as though he feared Seth would 
change his mind. 

He need not have. Seth’s face had the usual 
expression it bore in repose : an insolent complacency. 
Of course, he was going to be a film star. When once 
he had got over the first shock, he wanted to look as if 
the whole affair seemed perfectly natural to him. He 
was too conceited to show the fierce joy that surged 
deep within him. Yet there it surged, a tide of dark 
gold splendour, deep below the crust of his complacent 
acceptance. 

Well, everything was bowling along swimmingly, 
and Flora was just patting the stiU-choking Mr. Mybug 
on the back while they all stood round the door of the 
c?u: saying good-bye when the ominous sound of a 
window being pushed up was heard, and before they 
could all look up a voice floated out into the quiet air 
of the late afternoon. It was observing that it had 
seen something nasty in the woodshed. 

Everybody looked up. Flora in some dismay. 

Sure enough, it was Aunt Ada Doom. The window 
of her room, which was directly above the kitchen 

243 



door, was open, and she was leaning heavily out, 
supporting herself upon her hands. A shape hovered 
in the dusk room behind her left shoulder, endeavour- 
ing to see over her vasty bulk. By the imtidiness of 
its hair, it was Judith. Another shape hovered behind 
the right shoulder. Going by nothing but a woman’s 
intuition, it was Rennett. 

“ Oh, mercy ! ” said Flora, hastily, in an undertone 
to Mr. Neck. “ Hurry up and go ! ” 

“ What ... is that Grandma ? ” enquired Mr. 
Neck. “ And who’s the platinum blonde at the back ? 
Come on, sweetheart ” — ^he hustled Seth into the car — 
“ we’ve got to make that flier.” 

“ Seth . . . Seth . . . where are you going ? ” 
Judith’s voice was a throbbing rod of terror and 
anguish. 

“ I saw something nasty in the woodshed ! ” 
screamed Aunt Ada Doom, flapping about her with 
something which Flora recognised as all that was left 
of the “ Cowkeepers’ Weekly Bulletin and Milk 
Producers’ Guide.” “ My baby. . . . My darling. 
You mustn’t leave me. I shall go mad. I can’t bear 
it!” 

“ Can it 1 ” muttered Mr. Neck ; but aloud he called 
politely, waving his hand at Aunt Ada, “ Well, well, 
how’s the girl ? ” 

“ Seth . . . you mustn’t go 1 ” Judith implored, her 
voice a dry whine of terror. “ You can’t leave your 
mother. There’s the spiing-onion harvest, too. ’Tes 
man’s work. . . . You mustn’t go.” 

“ I saw something nasty in the woodshed 1 ” 

“ Did it see you ? ” asked Mr. Neck, tucking himself 
244 



into the car beside Seth. The engine started, and 
the chauffeur began to back the car out of the yard. 

“ Gee, ma’am, I know it’s raw,” shouted Mr. Neck, 
craning out of the window of the car and peering up 
at Aumt Ada. “ I know it’s tough. But, gee, that’s 
life, girl. You’re living now, sweetheart. All that 
woodshed line . . . that was years ago. Young 
Woodley stuff. Aw, I respect a grandmother’s feel- 
ings, sweetheart, but honest, I just can’t give him up. 
He’ll send you five ^and out of his first film. ” 

“ Good-bye,” said Seth to Flora, who returned his 
condescending smile with a fnendly one of her own. 

She watched the car drive away. It was going to 
Cloud Cuckoo Land ; it was going to the Kingdom of 
Cockaigne ; it was going to Hollywood. Seth would 
never have a chance, now, of becoming a nice, normal 
young man. He would become a world-famous 
swollen mask. 

When next she saw him, it was a year later and the 
mask smiled down at her in the drowsy darkness, firom 
a great silver screen ; “ Seth Starkadder in ‘ Small- 
Town Sheik ’.” Already, as the car receded, he was 
as unreal as Achilles. 

“ Seth. . . . Seth. . . .” 

The car turned the curve, and was gone. 

StiU the wailing voices of the women wound 
through the air like strung wires. It was hours before 
the stars would begin their idiot dance between the 
chimney-pots. There was nothing to do in between 
except wail. 

Aunt Ada had now retreated firom the window. 
Flora could hear Judith having hysterics. She went 
17 245 



on quietly banging Mr. Mybug, who was still choking, 
and saying, “ There . . . there . . and wondering 
if she ought to go upstairs to her Aunt Ada’s room and 
difiuse a spot of “ The Higher Common Sense.” 

But no. The hour for that was not yet. 

She was roused from her reverie by Mr. Mybug, who 
peevishly dodged away from her hand, exclaiming, 
between chokes : “ I’m quite aU right now, thanks,” 
and went on choking in an irritating manner at some 
distance away. 

Suddenly his chokes ceased. He was staring up at 
Aunt Ada’s window, where Rennett had suddenly 
appeared and was peering palely out into the evening. 

“ Who’s that ? ” asked Mr. Mybug, in a low voice. 

“ Rennett Starkadder,” replied Flora. 

“ What a marvellous face,” said Mr. Mybug, still 
staring. “ She has a brittle, hare-like quality. . . . 
Don’t you feel it ? ” He waved his fingers about. 
“ She has that unteimed look you see sometimes in 
newly-born leverets. I wish Kopotkin could see her. 
He’d want to put her into plaster.” 

Rennett was staring down at him, too. Flora could 
see it was quite a case. Oh, well, it would be quite a 
good thing if he carried Rennett off to Fitzroy Square 
and set a new fashion in hare-faced beauties . . . 
except that she, Flora, must make quite smre before 
they went that he would be kind to poor Rennett, and 
be a good husband to her. Probably he would be. 
Rennett was very domesticated. She would mend 
Mr. Mybug’s clothes (which nobody had ever done for 
him before, because, though all his girl fiiends could 
embroider beautifirlly, none of them ever dreamed of 

246 



mending anything), and cook him lovely nourishing 
dinners, and fuss over him and simply adore him, and 
he would become so comfortable he would not know 
himself, and would be very grateful to her. 

From these schemes she was aroused by Mr. Mybug. 
He walked across the yard until he stood directly 
beneath the window, and called boldly up to Reimett : 

“ I say ! Will you come for a walk with me ? ” 

“ What . . . now ? ” asked Rennett, timidly. No- 
body had ever asked her to do such a thing before. 

“ Why not ? ” laughed Mr. Mybug, looking boyishly 
up at her, with his head flung back. Flora thought it 
was a pity he was rather fat. 

“ I must ask Cousin Judith,” said Rennett, glancing 
timidly over her shoulder into the darkened room. 
Then she withdrew into the shadows. 

Mx. Mybug was very pleased with himself. This 
was his idea of romance. Flora could see. She knew 
firom experience that intellectuals thought the proper 
— ^nay, the only — ^way to fall in love with somebody 
was to do it the very instant you saw them. You met 
somebody, and thought they were “ A charming person. 
So gay and simple.” Then you walked home from a 
party with them (preferably across Hampstead Heath, 
about three in the morning) discussing whether you 
should sleep together or not. Sometimes you asked 
them to go to Italy with you. Sometimes ^ey asked 
you to go to Italy (preferably to Portofino) with them. 
You held hands, eind laughed, and kissed them and 
called them your “ true love.” You loved them for 
eight months, and then you met somebody else and 
began being gay and simple all over again, with 

247 



small-hours’ walk across Hampstead, Portofino invi- 
tation, and all. 

It was very simple, gay and natural, somehow. 

Anyway, Flora was beginning to feel that things were 
happening a little too quickly at Cold Comfort Farm. 
She had not yet recovered from the Counting last 
night (was it only last night ? — ^it seemed a month ago), 
and the departure of Amos ; and already Seth had 
gone, and Mr. Mybug was falling in love with Rennett, 
and doubtless planning to carry her off. 

If things went on at this rate there would soon be 
nobody left at the farm at all. 

She was extremely sleepy all of a sudden. She 
thought she would go and sit by the fire in her little 
green parlour and read imtil supper-time. So she told 
Mr. Mybug she hoped he would have a pleasant walk, 
and added casually that Rennett had had a pretty 
septic life of it, on the whole, and hinted that she would 
probably appreciate a little gaiety and simplicity, in 
the Fit2xoy Square maimer. 

Mr. Mybug said he quite understood. He also 
attempted to take her hand, but she foiled him. Since 
seeing Rennett at the window he seemed to have a 
vague feeling that his one-sided affair with Flora was 
at an end, and that it was up to him to Tna1f<> some 
appropriate farewell remarks. 

“ We’re friends, aren’t we ? ” he asked. 

“Certainly,” said Flora, pleasantly, nor did she 
trouble to inform him that she was not in the habit of 
t h i nkin g of persons whom she had known for five 
weeks as her Jftiends. 

“ We might dine together in Town some time ? ” 

248 



“ That would be delightful,” agreed Flora, thinlcing 
hew nasty and boring it would be. 

“ There’s a quality in you . . said Mr. Mybug, 
staring at her and waving his fingers. “Remote, 
somehow, and nymph-like . . . oddly unawakened. 
I should like to write a novel about you and call it 
‘ Virginal 

“ Do, if it passes the time for you,” said Flora ; 
“ and now I really must go and write some letters, I 
am afraid. Good-bye.” 

On her way to her parlour she passed Reimett, 
coming downstairs, dressed to go out. She wondered 
how she had managed to obtain permission firom Aunt 
Ada Doom to do so, but Rennett did not wait to be 
questioned. She darted past Flora with a stare of 
terror. 

Flora was extremely glad to get back to her parlour 
and to sink into a comfortable little arm-chair, covered 
in green tapestry, which stood by the fire. The 
refireshing Mrs. Beetle was there, clearing away the 
tea-things. 

“ Miss Elfine sent you ’er best love. Miss Flora, and 
she’s gone over to spend six weeks at Howchiker Hall. 
Mr. Dick came for her at limch-time to-day in ’is 
moter,” said Mrs. Beetle. “ Nice-lookin’ boy, ain’t 
he?” 

“ Very,” said Flora. “ So she’s gone, has she ? 
Oh, well, that’s splendid. Now the family will have 
time to settle down and get over the engagement. 
And where’s Urk ? Is it true he’s drowned Meiiam ? ” 

Mrs. Beetle snorted, 

“ It ’ud take more than ’im to drown ’er. No, ’e’s 

249 



as large as life and twice as natural, down at mine, 
playin’ with the kids.” 

“ What . . . the jazz-band ? I mean, with 
Meriam’s children ? ” 

“ Yes. Givin’ ’em rides on ’is back and pretendin’ 
’e’s a water-vole (nasty things). Oh, you should ’ave 
’eard ’ow Agony created when I let on that our 
Meriam was goin’ to marry one of them Starkadders ! 
Create ! I thought ’e’d ’ave to be picked off the 
ceiling.” 

“ So she really is going to marry him ? ” asked 
Flora, leaning languidly back in her chair and enjoying 
the gossip. 

Mrs. Beetle gave her a look. 

“ So I should ’ope. Miss Poste. I don’t say as 
there’s been Anything Wrong between them yet, but 
there ain’t goin’ to be, neither, until they’re safely 
married. Agony stands firm by that.” 

“ And what does old Mhs. Starkadder say to Urk 
marrying Meriam ? ” 

“ She said she saw something narsty, as usual. 
Well, if jTd ’ad sixpence for all the narsty things I’ve 
seen since I bin working at Cold Comfort I could 
buy the place up (not that I’d want to, come to 
that).” 

“ I suppose,” asked Flora, idly, “ you haven’t any 
idea of what she really did see ? ” 

Mrs. Beetle paused in the act of folding the table- 
cloth, and regarded Flora earnestly. But all she said, 
after the pause, was that she couldn’t say, she was 
sure. So Flora pursued her enquiries no further. 

“ So I ’ear that there Seth’s gone, too,” was Mrs. 

250 



Beetle’s next remark. “ Coo ! ’is mother won’t ’alf 
take on I ” 

‘‘ Yes, he’s gone to Hollywood to be a film star,” 
said Flora, sleepily. 

Mrs. Beetle said sooner ’im than ’er, and added that 
she wouldn’t ’alf ’ave a lot to tell Agony when she got 
home. 

So Agony likes a spot of gossip, does he ? ” 

If it ain’t spiteful, ’e does. ’E always creates at 
me something awfiil when I’ve finished teUing ’im 
anything spiteful. Oh, weU, I must be off now and 
get Agony’s supper. Good-night, Miss Poste.” 

Flora passed the rest of the evening quietly and 
pleasantly, and was in bed by ten. Her satisfaction 
with the way matters were progressing at the farm was 
completed by the arrival of a postcard for herself by 
the nine o’clock post. 

It represented Canterbury Cathedral. The post- 
mark was Canterbury. On the back was written : 

Praise the Lord ! This morning I preached the 
Lord’s Word to thousands in the market-place. I am 
now going out to hire one o’ they Ford vans. Tell 
Micah if he wants to drive it he must come with me out 
of charity. I mean, no wages. Praise the Lord ! Send 
my flannel shirts. Fond love to all. 

A. Starkadder.” 


251 



CHAPTER XIX 


A fter tte departure of Seth, life at the farm 
. settled down and became normal again (at least, 
as normal as it ever was), and Flora was quite glad to 
have a rest after the strenuous weeks during which she 
had drilled Elfine, and the series of shocks which had 
resulted in the whisking of Seth and Amos away from 
Cold Comfort. 

The first of May brought a burst of summer weather. 
All the trees and hedges came into full leaf over-night ; 
and from behind the latter, in the evenings, cries 
could be heard of: “Nay, doan’t ’ee, Jem,” and 
“ Nay, niver do that, soul,” firom village maidens 
who were being seduced. 

***At the farm, life burgeoned and was quick. 
A thick, shameless cooing was laid down, stroke on 
stroke, through the warm air from the throats of the 
wood-pigeons until the very atmosphere seemed 
covered with a rich patina of love. The strident 
yellow note of the cockerel shot up into the sunshine 
and wavered there, ending in a little feather-tuft of 
notes. Big Business bellowed triumphantly in the 
great field. Daisies opened in sly lust to the sim-rays 
and rain-spears, and eft-flies, locked in a blind embrace, 
spun radiantly through the glutinous light to their 
ordained deatii. Mrs. Beetle appeared in a cotton 
dress, well skewered up at the neck by a brooch with 

352 



“ Carrie ” engraved on it. Flora wore green linen and 
a shady hat. 

The first rays of May fell into the room where Judith 
lay on her bed in silence ; and were withered. The 
sordid flies, intent on their own s elfish pleasure, buzzed 
in idiotic circles above her head with as much noise 
and as little meaning as life itself, and their sound 
drew a web of scarlet pain into her withdrawn 
darkness. She had veiled each of the two hun- 
dred photographs of Seth with a little black crepe 
curtain. This done, what else did life hold? The 
flies buzzed in answer above the dirty water stand- 
ing in the washbasin, in which floated a solitary 
black hair. 

It, too, was like life — and as meaningless. 

The old woman kept her room also, seated before 
the fibre that danced palely in the thick, coarse sunlight, 
and muttering at intervals. Flares of hate lit her 
darkness. She sensed the insolence of s umme r heating 
on the window-panes and wooing away, with its 
promises, all the Starkadders from Cold Comfort 
Where was Amos ? The sunlight answered. Where 
was Elfine ? The ring-doves crooned in reply. Where 
— ^last blow of agony — ^was Seth ? She did not even 
know where he had gone, or why. Mrs. Beetle said 
he had gone on them there talkies. What was a 
talkie ? Was Mrs. Beetle mad ? Were they all mad 
— ^all except you, who sat on here alone, in the old 
crumbling tower of your body ? And Urk — a Stark- 
adder — ^saying he was going to many the paid slut, 
Meriam, and openly defying you when you forbade 
him , and jingling three and sixpence in his pocket 

853 



which he had earned by selling water-vole skins to a 
furrier in Godmere. • . . 

This room was your citadel. Outside, the world 
you had built up so fiercely for twenty years was 
crumbling into fantastic ruin. 

It was she, Robert Poste’s child. The wrong done 
to him had come back to roost. “ Curses, like rookses, 
comes home to rest in bosomses and barnses.” She 
had poured poison into the ears of your family and 
sent them out into the world, leaving you alone. They 
would all go : Judith, Micah, Ezra, Harkaway, 
Caraway, Luke and Mark and Adam Lambsbreath. 
Then . . . when they had all gone . . . you would be 
alone — ^at last — alone in the woodshed. 


Flora was having quite a nice time. 

It was now the second week in May, and the weather 
was still superb. Reuben, was now looked upon by 
everybody as the owner of Cold Comfort, and had 
at once (much to Flora’s pleasure) set about making 
improvements in it, and had asked her if she would go 
into Godmere with him and help him choose fertilizers 
and new grinders and what not. Flora told him she 
did not know anything about grinders, but that she 
would try anything once ; so, accordingly, they drove 
off together one Wednesday morning in the buggy, 
armed with a copy of the “ Internationally Progressive 
Farmers’ Guide and Helpmeet,” which Flora had 
ordered firom London, where it was printed by some 
Russian fiiends of hers living in West Kensington. 

“ Where did you get the money to buy all these 

254 



lovely grinders, Reuben ? asked Flora, as they sat 
at lunch in the coflfee-room of the Load of Beets, after 
a busy morning's shopping. 

Stole 'un," replied Reuben, simply. 

Who from ? " asked Flora, who was bored by 
having to pretend to be shocked at things, and really 
wanted to know. 

Grandmother." 

“ Oh, I say, what a sound scheme. But how did 
you get hold of it ? I mean, did you have to get it 
out of her stocking, or something ? " 

‘‘ Nay. I falsified th' chicken-book, and when we 
sold a dozen eggs I writes down we sells two eggs, see ? 
I been doin' that for nigh five years. I had me eye 
on them grinders for five years, so I plans it all out, 
see ? " 

My dear, I think you’re masterly^^^ said Flora. 
“ Quite masterly. If you only keep on as you've begun 
you will make the farm too prosperous." 

Ay . . . if th' old devil don't change his mind 
and come back,” said Reuben, doubtfully. “ Happen 
he may think America's a long way off — too fur for an 
old 'un like him to go, eh ? ” 

Oh, I'm sure he won’t," said Flora, decidedly. 
** He seems to be — er — ^main set on the idea.” And 
she produced from her handbag, for the tenth time 
that morning, a postcard showing Liverpool Cathedral. 
It said : 

" Praise the Lord ! I go to spread the Lord's word 
among the heathen Americans, with the Rev. Elderberry 
Shiftglass of Chicago. Praise the Lord ! Tell Reuben 

255 



he can have the old place. Send clean socks. Love to 

all except Micah. 

A. Starkadder.” 

“ Oh, yes, I am sure he means it,” repeated Flora. 
“ It’s a pity he says ‘ the old place ’ instead of ‘ the 
farm,’ but if any question ever arises, we can always 
do a spot of forgery, and write in ‘ the farm ’ instead. 
I wouldn’t worry, if I were you.” 

So they finished their apple tart in leisurely comfort. 
Just as he was lifting the last spoonful to his lips, 
Reuben halted with it in the air and said, looking 
across at Flora : 

“ I don’t suppose ’ee would marry me. Cousin 
Flora?” 

Flora was much moved. She had grown to like 
Reuben in the last fortnight. He was worth whole 
sackfuls of the other male Starkadders. He was really 
very nice, and kind too, and ready to learn firom any- 
one who would help him to improve the condition of 
the farm. He had never forgotten that it was she 
who suggested to Amos that he should go oflF on the 
preaching tour; a move which had resulted — after 
Reuben himself had worked on his father’s feelings to 
take Flora’s advice — ^in Reuben getting possession of 
the farm ; and he was deeply grateful. 

She put out her hand across the table. Wonderingly, 
Reuben took it in his and stared down at it, while the 
spoonful of apple taxt wavered to and firo in his other 
hand. 

“ Oh, Reuben, that is nice of you. But I am 
afiraid it would never do, you know. Think a moment. 

256 



I am not at all the kind of person to make a good wife 
for a farmer.” 

“ I like yer pretty ways,” said Reuben, gruffly. 

“ That’s charming of you. I like yours, too. But, 
honestly, it wouldn’t do. I think somebody like Mark 
Dolour’s Nancy would be much nicer for you — and 
more useful, too.” 

“ She’m not fifteen yet.” 

“ All the better. In three years the form will be 
doing really well, and you will have a really nice home 
to offer her.” (Flora’s heart faltered as she thought 
of what Aunt Ada Doom might have to say to such a 
marriage, but she was beginning to feel a way towards 
a plan for coping with that old incubi:is. In three 
years — ^who knows ? — ^Aunt Ada might have left the 
farm !) 

Reuben reflected, stiU staring down at Flora’s 
hand. 

“ Ay,” he said, slowly, at last, “ maybe I’d best 
have Mark Dolour’s Nancy. My chickens have been 
keeping her dolls in feathers for their ’ats these last 
two years. Reckon it’s only right she should have th’ 
chickens too in the end.” 

And he released Flora’s hand, and finished his 
spoonful of apple tart. He did not seem at all offended 
or htut, and they drove home together afterwards in 
conafortable silence. 

Elfine’s visit to the Hawk-Monitors had been 
extended for a further week, and Flora had twice been 
over there to tea. Mrs. Hawk-Monitor seemed quite 
won over to Elfine, much to Flora’s relief, and de- 
scribed her to Flora as “ a dear little thing. Rather 

257 



brainy, but quite a nice Kttle thing.” Flora con- 
gratulated Elfine in private, and warned her not to 
talk quite so much about Marie Laurencin and Purcell. 
The end was achieved ; there was no point in over- 
doing it. 

The wedding was fixed for the fourteenth of June. 
Mrs. Hawk-Monitor had decided that it should take 
place in the church at Howling, which was a beauty. 
She then stunned Flora by suggesting that the recep- 
tion should be held at Cold Comfort : “ So much 
more convenient than coming all the way back here, 
don’t you think ? ” 

“ Oh, I say,” said Flora, pulling herself together in 
response to an agonised glance from Elfine, “ I rather 
doubt if that would do, you know. I mean, old Mrs. 
Starkadder is a bit of an invalid and what not. The 
— er — the noise might upset her.” 

“ She need not come down. A tray of cake can be 
taken up to her in her room. Yes, I think that would 
certainly be the best thing to do. Is there a large 
room at the farmhouse. Miss Poste ? ” 

“ Several,” said Flora, faintly, thinking about 
them. 

“ Splendid. Just the thing. I will write to old 
Mrs. Starkadder to-night.” And Mrs. Hawk- Monitor 
(who was rather wanting to shift some of the botheration 
of the wedding on to Elfine’s family) vaguely but 
effectively changed the subject. 

So there was a new horror on the horizon ! Really 
(thought Flora, ridiag home in state in the giant 
Hawk-Monitor Renault) there was no end to her 
worries. She was beginning to think she would never 

258 



get the farm tidied up in her life-time. No sooner 
did she get one person comfortably fixed up than 
somebody else began to tear up the turf about some- 
thing, and she had to begin aU over again. 

It was true, though, that matters were better since 
Reuben had taken up the position of owner of the 
farm. Wages were paid regxilarly. Rooms were 
swept out occasionally : nay, they were even scrubbed. 
And though the bi-weekly inspection of the books by 
Aunt Ada Doom still went on, Reuben had started 
another set of books of his own, in which he put down 
the farm’s real takings. The books which Aunt Ada 
saw twice a week were cooked like Old Harry. 

Aunt Ada had not been downstairs since the night 
of the Coimting ; and Micah, Ezra and the other 
Starkadders had taken advantage of her temporary 
set-back. They had also been encouraged by the 
getaway of Seth, Elfine and Amos. They realised that 
Aunt Ada, like the rest of us, was only human. 

. So they had commanded Prue, Letty, Jane, Phoebe 
and Susan to say nothing of Rennett, to come up to 
Cold Comfort from the village and establish them- 
selves and their possessions in some of the empty rooms 
of the farmhouse, as far away as possible firom Aunt 
Ada’s chamber. 

And there they were, all living like fighting cocks ; 
and wherever Flora went she seemed to stumble over 
hen-faced female Starkadders in cotton dresses. As 
for Mrs. Beetle, she said all them old witches fair gave 
her the sick, and she was quite glad to get ’ome to Urk 
and Meriam and the water-voles. 

So, on the whole, life at the farmhouse was much 

259 



pleasanter for the Starkadders than it had ever been 
before ; and they had Flora to thank for it. 

But Flora was not satisfied. 

She was thinking, as she was borne homewards in 
the Hawk-Monitor chariot, how much yet remained 
to be done at Cold Comfort before she could really 
say that the farmhouse was in a condition to satisfy 
the Abbe Fausse-Maigre. 

There was the problem of Judith. There was old 
Adam. And there was Aunt Ada Doom herself, the 
greatest problem of all, and the hardest. 

She decided that she must tackle Judith next. 
Judith had been lying in her' room with the window 
shut quite long enough. Twice had Mrs. Beetle asked 
if she could turn out the room ; and twice Flora had 
been forced to reply that it was not yet convenient. 
But now (Flora decided) things had gone far enough ; 
and she would beard Judith as soon as she got home. 


The evening sunlight lay across the corridor in 
sharp tiger-bars as she approached Judith’s room. 
The door was shut. It was like a forbidding hand, 
pressed soft and flat against the silence of the corridor. 
Ilora tapped against it, and waited a few seconds for 
an answer. But there was only the indifferent silence. 
Oh, well . . . she thought, and, turning the handle, 
walked in. 

Judith was standing at the washstand, rinsing one 
of the two hundred little erSpe curtains which hung 
over the two hundred photographs of Seth. 

???Her blank eyes burrowed through the foetid air 
260 



between herself and her visitor. They were without 
content ; hollow pools of meaninglessness. They 
were not eyes but voids sunk between two jutting 
pent-houses of bone and two bloodless hummocks of 
cheek. They suspended two raw rods of grief before 
their own immobility, like frozen fountains in a bright 
wintry air ; and on these rods the fluttering rags of a 
futile grief were htmg. 

“ Oh, Cousin Judith, would you care to come up to 
Town with me to-morrow ? ” asked Flora, pleasantly. 
“ I want to do some shopping, and I hope to lunch 
with a very charming Austrian — ^a Doctor Miidel from 
Vienna. Do come.” 

Judith’s laugh shocked even the careless flies that 
circled above her head into a momentary silence. 

“ I am a dead woman,” she said, simply. Her 
hands lay piteously at her sides. “Look . . . the 
little curtain was dusty,” she murmured. “ I had to 
rinse the dust off it.” 

Flora refrained from pointing out that if you rinsed 
something that was dusty you merely made it worse. 
She said patiently that she proposed to catch the ten- 
tMrty to Town, and that she would expect Judith to 
be ready by nine o’clock. 

“ I think you will enjoy it. Cousin Judith, when you 
get there,” she urged her. “ You mustn’t carry on 
like this, you know. It — er — ^it depresses us all no 
end. I mean, all this lovely weather and what not. 
It’s a pity to waste it.” 

“ I myself am a waste,” said Judith, stonily. “ I am 
a used husk ... a rind ... a skin. What use am 
I . . . now he’s gone ? ” 

i8 


261 



“ Well, never mind that now,” said Flora, soothingly. 
“Just you make up your mind to be ready by nine 
o’clock to-morrow morning.” 

And before she left her that evening, she managed 
to gain from Judith a vague half-promise that she 
would be ready as suggested. Judith did not seem to 
care what happened to her so long as she was not made 
to talk ; and Flora took advantage of her lassitude to 
impose her fresh will upon her cousin’s flaccid one. 

After leaving Judith, she sent Adam down into 
Howling with the following wire : 

“ Herr Doktor Adolf Model, 

“ National Institute Psycho-Analysis, 

“ WhitehaU, S.W. 

“ Interesting case for you can you lunch two of us 
Grimaldi’s one fifteen to-morrow Wednesday hows the 
baby love F. Poste.” 

And at nine o’clock that night, while she was sitting 
at the open window of her little parlour inhaling the 
fragrance of a may-tree and writing to Charles, a 
telegram was delivered to her (by Mark Dolour’s very 
Nancy herself) which read : 

“ But of course delighted baby has marked paranoic 
tendencies nurse assures me quite normal at eight 
months she knows much more than I do perfect treasure 
looking forward seeing you what weather eh. . . . 
Adolf.” 


262 



CHAPTER XX 


H er day with Judith in London was a complete 
success, though there were, it is true, some 
minor disadvantages. Judith’s hair, for example, fell 
down every fifteen minutes and had to be re-pinned by 
Flora. Then there were the sympathetic and interested 
enquiries of fellow-travellers to be fobbed off, who were 
naturally intrigued by hearing Judith refer to herself 
at intervals as a Used Gourd and a Rind. 

But when once their journey was over, Flora’s 
worries were over as well. Seated opposite Dr. Mtidd 
and Judith at a quiet table near a window at Grimaldi’s, 
she watched, with a feeling of relief. Dr. Mtidel taking 
command of the situation. 

It was one of his disagreeable duties as a State 
psycho-analyst to remove the affections of his patients 
firom the embarrassing objects upon which they were 
concentrated ; and focus them, instead, upon himself. 
It was true that they did not remain focused there for 
long : as soon as he could, he switched them on to 
something harmless, like chess or gardening. But 
while they were focused upon himself, he had rather a 
thin time of it and earned every penny of the eight 
hundred a year paid to him by a judicious Govern- 
ment. 

And Flora, observing how soon Judith b^n to 
glow darkly and do the slumbering volcano act in 

263 



Dr. Madel’s direction, could not help admiring the 
practised skill with which he had effected the trans- 
ference in the course of the commonplace conversation 
throughout lunch. 

“ She will be oil right now,” he murmured, sooth- 
ingly, to Flora, in an undertone, when lunch was over, 
while Judith was gazing broodingly out of the window 
at the busy street below. “ I shall take her to the 
nursing home, and let her talk to me. There she will 
stay for six months, perhaps. Then I send her abroad 
for a little holiday. I make her interested in olt 
churches, I think. Yes, olt churches. There are so 
many in Europe, and it wiU take her the rest of her life 
to see them all. She has money, yes? You must 
have money in order to see all the olt churches you 
want. Well, that is oil right, then. Do not distress 
yourself. She will be quite happy. Oil that energy 
... it is a pity, yes. It oU turns in instead of out. 
Now I turn it out ... on to the olt churches. Yes.” 

Flora felt a little uneasy. It was not the first time 
she had seen a distraught patient grow calm beneath 
the will of the analyst, yet she had never grown used 
to the spectacle. Would Judith really be happier ? 
She looked doubtfully at her cousin. Certainly Judith 
looked happier already. Her eyes followed every move- 
ment of Dr. Miidel as he paid the bill for the lunch ; 
Flora had never seen her look so animated and normsd. 

“ I understand that you are going to stay with Dr. 
Miidel for a while. Cousin Judith ? ” she said. 

“ He has asked me. He is very kind. . . . There 
is a dark force in him,” returned Judith. “ It beats 
. . . like a black gong. I wonder you do not feel it.” 

264 



Oh, well, we can’t all strike lucky,” said Flora 
amiably. “ But really, Judith, I do thhak it would be 
quite a sound scheme if you went. You need a holi- 
day, you know, after all the — er — ^fuss there’s been at 
home lately. It will do you no end of good. Set 
you up, and what not. And then after a bit you might 
go abroad and see some of the sights of Europe. Old 
churches, and all that. Don’t worry about the farm. 
Reuben will look after that for you, and send you a 
fat piece out of the takings every month.” 

“ Amos . . .” murmured Judith. She looked as 
though the threads which bound her to her old life 
were snapping one by one, yet still held her in a frail 
tenure. 

Oh, I wouldn’t fuss about him,” said Flora, easily. 
“ He’s gone off to America with the Reverend Elder- 
berry Shiftglass by now, I shouldn’t wonder. He’ll 
let you know when he’s coming back. Don’t you 
bother. You enjoy yourself while you’re yoimg.” 

And this was what Judith evidently decided to do, 
for she drove off with Dr. Miidel in his car looking 
quite content : at least, she looked illumined and 
transfigured and reft out of herself and all the rest of 
it, and even when allowances were made for her habit 
of multiplying every emotion she felt by twice its own 
weight, she probably was feeling fairly chirpy. 

Before they said good-bye Flora arranged to send on 
to the nursing home the five dirty red shawls and 
sundry bundles of hairpins which seemed to make up 
the greater part of Judith’s wardrobe ; and also a 
comfortable sum of money which should pay for her 
pleasures during the next six months. Dr. Miidel 

265 



could, of course, be trusted to see that her funds were 
properly administered. 

So that was all settled ; and Flora watched the 
doctor’s car drive away with feelings of considerable 
satisfaction. 

It was with a feeling of satisfaction too, and with 
something strangely like affection, that she caught her 
first glimpse of the farmhouse on her return that night 
to Gold Comfort. 

It was a mild and lovely evening. The rays of 
the sun looked heavy, as they firequently do towards 
the approach of a summer sunset, and lay between the 
tunnels of green leaves like long rods of gold. There 
were no clouds in the blue sky, whose colour was begin- 
ning to deepen with the advance of night, and the face 
of the whole countryside was softened by the shadows 
which were slowly growing in the depths of the woods 
and hedgerows. 

The farmhouse itself no longer looked like a beast 
about to spring. (Not that it ever had, to her, for she 
was not in the habit of thinking that things looked 
exactly like other things which were as different from 
them in appearance as it wm possible to be.) But it 
had looked dirty and miserable and depressing, and 
when Mr. Mybug had once remarked that it looked 
like a beast about to spring, Flora had simply not had 
the heart to contradict him. 

Now it looked dirty and miserable and depressing 
no longer. Its windows flung back the gold of the 
sunset. The yard was swept clean of straws and 
paper. Check curtains hung crisply at most of the 
windows, and someone (as a matter of feet it was 

a66 



Ezra, who had a secret yen for horticulture) had been 
digging and trimming up the garden, and there were 
already rows of beans in red flower. 

“ thought Flora, simply, as she leant forward in 
the buggy and surveyed the scene, did all that with 
my little hatchet.’* And a feeling of joy and content 
opened inside her like a flower. 

But then she looked upwards at the closed, blank 
face of the window immediately above the kitchen 
door, and her face grew pensive again. Aunt Ada’s 
room. Aunt Ada was still there, fighting her losing 
battle. Aunt Ada, the spirit of Cold Comfort, was 
hard pressed, but still xmdefeated. And could she. 
Flora, really congratulate herself upon her work at the 
farm, and flatter herself that the end of that work was 
in sight, while Aunt Ada Doom still brooded aloft in 
her tower ? 

‘‘Yer supper’s on the table, duck,” said Mrs. 
Beetle, opening the gate to let Reuben lead Viper into 
the yard. Cold veal and salad. I’m off ’ome now. 
Oh, and there’s a blamonge. Pink.” 

‘‘ Lovely,” said Flora, with a sigh of pleasure, as she 
climbed down from the buggy. Thank you, Mrs. 
Beetle. Miss Judith won’t be back to-night. She is 
going to stay in London for a while. Has everything 
been all right ? ” 

She took on something awful about Miss Judith 
going off ’smoming,” said Mrs. Beetle, lowering her 
voice and glancing significantly upwards at the closed 
window. Said she was all alone in the woodshed 
now, and no mistake. She says she don’t count 
Reuben. (She wouldn’t, of course — ^’im bein’ the 

267 



pick of the bunch). Still, she keeps ’er appetite, I 
will say that for ’er. Three ’elpings of veal and two 
of suet roly for ’er dinner to-day. Can you beat it? 
Well, this won’t buy the baby a new frock. Good- 
night, Miss Flora. I’ll be ’ere eight sharp to-morrow.” 

And off she went. 

Flora went into the kitchen, where a lamp already 
burned on the table. Its soft light fell into the hearts 
of a bunch of pink roses in a jam-jar. There was a 
letter from Charles propped against the jar, too, and 
the roses threw down a heavy, rounded shadow on to 
the envelope. It was so pretty that Flora lingered a 
moment, looking, before she opened her letter. 

The serene weather held ; and Flora and everybody 
was hoping that it would last until Elfine’s wedding 
reception at the farm on the fourteenth of June, which 
was Midsiunmer Day. 

The preparations for this reception were now Flora’s 
chief care. She was anxious that the farm should not 
disgrace Reuben and his sister ; so she went frankly to 
the former and told him that she must have money 
to buy decorations and a feast for the wedding guests. 
Reuben seemed pleased at the idea of holding the 
reception at the farm, and gave her thirty pounds with 
which to do her damndest, but, he added, glancing 
meaningly up at the ceiling : 

“ What about the old ’un ? ” 

“ Leave her to me,” said Flora, decidedly. “ I am 
thi nk i n g out a plan for coping with her, and in a few 
days I am going to try it out Well, thank you so 
much for this money, my lamb. I will see about 

a68 



decorations and food at once. Oh, and need we have 
all the pictures wreathed with that smelly sukebind ? 
I am afraid it might have a bad effect on Meriam and 
Rennett. They’re so easily upset.” 

“ ’Tes no choice o’ mine. ’Tes grandmother’s 
choice. Do as you please. Cousin Flora. I niver 
wants to see a sprig of it again.” 

So, armed with his permission, Flora began her 
preparations. 

The days passed pleasantly. She had plenty to do, 
and even paid three visits to town, for she was having 
a new dress made for the reception and it had to be 
fitted. Mrs. Smiling was still abroad ; she was not 
expected home until the day after the wedding, so 
I Mouse Place was shut up. Julia was in Cannes ; 
Claud Hart-Harris at home in Chiswick, whence he 
repaired every summer, for a month, because he said 
he could at least be sure of meeting no one he knew 
there. But Flora could amuse herself ; and dined and 
lunched in pleasant solitude. 

In the intervals of fitting her dress, and of superin- 
tending a simply colossal spring cleaning of the farm 
(the first it had received for a hundred years) Flora 
kept a weather eye upon the affair of Mr. Mybug and 
Rennett. She thought it would be best, of course, if 
they got married ; but she was weU aware that 
marriage was not the intellectual’s long suit, and she 
did not want Reimett landed with a shameful bimdle. 

Mr. Mybug, however, did ask Rennett to marry 
him. He said that, by god, D. H. Lawrence was 
right when he had said there must be a dumb, dark, 
dull, bitter bcUy-tension between a man and a woman, 

269 



and how else could this be achieved save in the long 
monotony of marriage ? As for Rennett, she accepted 
him at once and was perfectly happy choosing sauce- 
pans. So that was aU right ; and they were to be 
married at a registry office one week-end in Town 
and have a share in Elfine’s reception on the fourteenth. 

As the evenings grew longer towards Midsummer 
Day, Flora would sit alone in the little green parlour, 
where the scent of the may-tree came in through the 
open window, reading in “ The Higher Common 
Sense ” the chapter on “ Preparing the Mind for the 
Twin Invasion by Prudence and Daring in Dealing 
with Substances not Included in the Outline.” 

It would help her, she knew, to deal with Aunt Ada 
Doom. Those long words in German and in Latin 
were solemn and cragged as Egyptian monoliths ; and 
when the reader peered more closely into the meaning 
of their syllables that rang like bells, backwards and 
backwards into Time, they were seen to be frosted with 
wisdom, cold and irrefutable. Before them. Passion, 
awed, slunk back to its lair ; and divine Reason and 
her sister Love, locked in one another’s arms, raised 
their twin heads to receive the wreath of Happiness. 

Aunt Ada was most emphatically one of the Sub- 
stances not included in the Outline. As Flora read on, 
evening after evening, she was aware that a conviction 
was growing in her mind that this was one of the ceises 
(the chapter warned the student that such might 
exist) in which she must meekly await the help of a 
flash of intuition. The chapter would help her to 
prepare her mind for the invasion, but it could do no 
more. She must await the moment. 

ajo 



And on an evening of more than common peace and 
beauty the moment came. She had put aside The 
Higher Common Sense ” for half an hour while she 
partook of her supper, and had opened Mansfield 
Park,” at random, to refresh her spirits. 

It was over, however, at last ; and the evening set 
in with more composure to Fanny . . 

And suddenly — ^the flash ! It was over indeed : her 
long indecision and her bewilderment about how to 
deal with Aunt Ada Doom. In a few seconds she had 
her plan clearly in her head, with every detail as 
distinct as though the scheme had already been carried 
through. Calmly she detached a leaf from her pocket- 
book and wrote the following telegram : 

“ Hart Harris, 

“ Chauncey Grove, 

“ Chiswick Mall. 

Please send at once latest number vogue also pros- 
pectus hotel miramar paris and very important photo- 
graphs fanny ward love Flora.” 

Then she summoned Mark Dolour’s Nancy, who had 
come in to help with the spring cleaning, and sent her 
down to the post office in Howling with the telegram. 

As Nancy ran off through the clear summer twilight, 
Flora reverently shut the covers of *'The Higher 
Common Sense.” She needed it no longer. It could 
remain closed until the next time she encountered a 
Substance not Included in the Outline. And she 
retired to bed that night in the calm confidence that 
she had found the way to deal with Aunt Ada Doom. 

271 



There was now only a week to go before the wedding, 
so Flora hoped very much that Claud woxild send at 
once the papers for which she had asked. It would 
probably take time to deal with Aimt Ada, and no time 
must be wasted if her aim was to be achieved by the 
day of the wedding. 

But Claud did not fail her. The papers arrived by 
air-mail at noon the next day. They were dropped 
neatly into the great field by the air-postman, and 
were accompanied by a plaintive note from Claud 
asking her what in heck she was up to now ? He said 
that except for the fact that she was larger, she reminded 
him of a mosquito. 

Flora imdid the parcel and made quite sure that ail 
the things for which she had asked were there. She 
then re-coded her hair and put on a firesh linen dress, 
and (as it was luncheon time) directed Mrs. Beetle to 
give to her the tray upon which was arranged Aunt 
Ada’s lunch. 

“ Go on. You’ll strain yersclf,” said Mrs. Beetle. 
“ It weighs about ’alf er ’undredweight.” 

But Flora quietly took the tray and (under the awed 
eyes of Mark Dolour’s Nancy, Reuben, Mrs. Beetle 
and Sue, Phoebe, Jane and Letty) she arranged upon 
it the copy of “ Vogue,” the prospectus of the Hotel 
Miramar in Paris and the photographs of Fanny Ward. 

“ I am going to take her lunch up to Aunt Ada,” 
she announced. “ If I have not come down by three 
o’clock, Mrs. Beetle, will you kindly bring up some 
lemonade. At half-past four you may bring up tea 
and some of that currant cake Phoebe made last week. 
If I am not down by seven o’clock, please bring up a 

27a 



tray with supper for two, and we will have hot milk 
and biscuits at ten. Now, good-bye, all of you. I 
beg of you not to worry. All will be well.” 

And slowly, before the fascinated gaze of the Stark- 
addcrs and Mrs. Beetle, Flora began to mount the stairs 
which led to Aunt Ada’s chamber, bearing the tray of 
limch steadily before her. They heard the Ught sound 
of her footsteps receding along the corridor ; they 
paused ; and the listeners heard, in the airy s umme r 
stillness of the house, her tap on the door and her dear 
voice saying : “I have brought your limch, Aunt 
Ada. May I come in ? It is Flora.” 

There was a silence. Then the door was heard to 
open, and Flora and the tray of lunch passed within. 

That was the last that anyone heard or saw of her 
for nearly nine hours. 

At three o’dock, at half-past four and at seven 
o’clock Mrs. Beetle took up the refreshments as she 
had been instructed. Each time she returned she 
found the empty plates and cups packed neatly outside 
the closed door. From within there came the steady, 
rise and fall of voices ; but though she listened for 
many minutes she could not distinguish a word ; and 
this disappointing piece of information was all she had 
to carry back to the eagerly waiting group downstairs. 

At seven o’dock Mr. Mybug and Rennett joined the 
band of watchers, and after waiting until nearly eight 
o’clock for Flora to come downstairs, they dedded 
that it would be best to begin without her, and made 
their supper off beef, beer and pickled onions, pleas- 
antly spiced by amdety and speculation. 

After supper they settled down once more to watch 

273 



and wait. Mrs. Beetle wondered a dozen times if 
she should not just run up with a few sandwiches and 
some cocoa at nine, in order to see whether there were 
any developments to be observed. But Reuben said 
no, she was not to ; she had been told to take up hot 
milk at ten o’clock, and hot milk at ten she should 
take ; he would not have Flora’s instructions dis- 
obeyed by the tiniest detail. So she stayed where she 
was. 

They all got very cosy, sitting round the open door 
in the lingering tv^ght ; and presently Mrs. Beetle 
made them all some barley water flavoured with 
lemon, and they sat sipping it comfortably, for their 
throats were quite sore with talking and wondering 
what on earth Flora could be saying to Aimt Ada 
Doom, and recalling details of the farm’s history for 
the past twenty years, and reminding each other whal 
a nuisance old Fig Starkadder had always been, and 
wondering how Seth was getting on in Hollywood 
and whether he would nm into Amos there, and 
.saying how lovely Elfine’s wedding was going to be, 
and wondering how Urk and Meriam would get on 
when they were married, and speculating as to what 
on earth Judith was doing in London, and, if so, why, 
and who with ? It grew slowly dark and cooler out- 
side, and the summer stars came out. 

They were talking away so hard that they never 
heard the clock strike ten, and it was not until nearly 
a quarter past that Mrs. Beetle suddenly made them 
all jump by leaping from her chair and saying loudly : 
“ There now ! I fergot the milk ! I’ll ferget me own 
name next. I’ll take it up at once.” 

274 



And she was just going over to the range to put 
wood on to the ashes, when a sound outside made them 
all start, and turn their heads in the direction of the 
dark doorway of the kitchen. 

Someone was coming slowly downstaurs, with light 
steps that dragged a little. 

Reuben stood up and lit a match, which he held 
above his head. The light slowly grew, and into it, 
through the dark doorway, walked Flora ... at 
last. 

She looked composed enough, but rather pale and 
sleepy, and a curl of her dark gold hair himg loose 
against her cheek. 

“ Hullo,” she said, pleasantly, “ you’re all here, 
then ? (Hullo, Mr. Mybug, surely it’s time you were 
in bed?) Can I have that milk now, please, Mrs. 
Beetle ? I’ll drink it down here. You need not take 
any up to Aunt Ada. I’ve put her to bed. She’s 
asleep.” 

There was a gasp of wonder from everybody. 

Flora sank into Reuben’s empty chair, with a long 
yawn. 

“ We was feared for ’ee, soul,” said Letty, re- 
provingly, after a pause in which lamps were lit and the 
curtains drawn. Nobody liked to ask any questions, 
though they were all pop-eyed with curiosity. “ Dima- 
many times we near came up to fetch ’ee down again.” 

“ Too nice of you,” said Flora, languidly, with one 
eye on the preparation of the imlk. “ But it was quite 
aU right, really. Everything’s settled now. You need 
not worry, Reuben ; there will be no fuss at the 
wedding or anything. We can go right ahead with 

275 



the food and the decorations. In fact, everything 
ought to be rather good, in one way and another.” 

“ Cousin Flora, no one but ’ee could have done it,” 
said Reuben, simply. “ I — I suppose ’ee wouldn’t tell 
us how ’twas done ? ” 

“ Well,” said Flora, diving into the milk, “ it’s a 
long story, you know. We talked for hours. I can’t 
possibly tell you all we said. It would take all night.” 
Here she repressed a vast yawn. “ You’ll see, when 
the time comes. On the wedding day, I mean. You 
wait. It will be a surprise. A lovely surprise. I 
can’t tell you now. It would spoil things. You just 
wait and see. It will be simply lovely. Surprise ! ” 

Her voice had been growing sleepier and sleepier 
towards the end of her speech, and just as it finally 
dwindled into silence, Mrs. Beetle darted forward and 
was just too late to catch the glass of mUk as it fell from 
her hand. She was asleep. 

“ Like a tired child,” said Mr. Mybug, who, like 
most of your biutal intellectuals, was as soft as a 
cheese underneath. “Just Hke a little tired child,” 
and he was just reaching out in a dreamy, absent kind 
of way to stroke Flora’s hair when Mrs. Beetle gave a 
sharp dab at his hand, exclaiming : 

“ Paws off, Pompey ! ” which so much upset him 
fiiat he marched off home, pursued by the wailing 
Rennett, without pausing to make any farewells. 

Mrs. Beetle then shoved Susan, Letty, Phoebe, Prue 
and Jane off to their own chambers, and with the 
assistance of Reuben roused Flora from her slumber. 

She stood up, still very sleepily, and smiled at 
Reuben as she took her candle from his hand. 

276 



“ Good-night, Cousin Flora. ’Twere a good day 
for Gold Comfort when iSrst ’ee came here,” he said, 
looking down at her. 

“ My dear soul, don’t name it. It’s been the most 
enormous diversion to me,” said Flora. “Just you 
wait until the wedding day, though. That is going to 
be fun, if you like. Mrs. Beetle, you know how I dis- 
like making complaints, but the cutlets Mrs. Stark- 
adder and I had for supper were slightly underdone. 
We both noticed it. Mrs. Starkadder’s, indeed, was 
almost raw.” 

“ I’m sorry, I’m sure. Miss Poste,” said Mrs. Beetle. 

And then everybody went sleepily up to bed. 


19 


877 



CHAPTER XXI 


M idsummer day dawned with a thick grey 
haze in the air and a heavy dew on the meadows 
and trees. 

Down among the little gardens of the still-sleeping 
cottages of Howling an idyllic procession might have 
been observed making its way from flower-bed to 
flower-bed, like ravaging bees. It was none other 
than the t^ee members of Mrs. Beetle’s embryo jazz- 
band, shepherded by the patriarchal form of Agony 
Beetle himself. 

They had been commissioned to pick the bunches of 
flowers which were to decorate the church and the 
refreshment-tables up at the farm. A lorry load of 
pink and white rose-peonies, from Covent Garden, 
had already been discharged at the gates of the farm ; 
and, even now, Mrs. Beetle and Flora were crossing 
and re-crossing the yard with their arms full of sleeping 
flowers. 

Flora noted the heat-haze with joy. It would be a 
day of heat ; brilliant, blue and radiant. 

Adam Lambsbreath had been even earlier astir, 
making wreaths of wallflowers with which to garland 
the horns of Feckless, Pointless, Graceless and Aimless. 
It was not imtil he actually came to aflSx the decora- 
tions that he observed that none of the cows had any 
horns left, and had been forced to fasten the wreaths 

378 



round their necks and tails instead. This done^ he 
led them forth to their morning pasture, singing a 
smutty wedding song he had learnt for the marriage 
of George I. 

As the day emerged from the heat-haze, and the 
sky grew blue and sunny, the farm buzzed with energy 
like a hive. Phoebe, Letty, Jane and Susan were 
whisking syllabubs in the dairy ; Micah carried the 
pails of ice, in which stood the champagne, down 
into the darkest and coolest corner of the cellar. 
Caraway and Harkaway were frdng the awning across 
from the gate of the yard to the door of the kitchen. 
Ezra was putting his rows of beans under a net to 
protect them from damage during the festivities. 
Mark and Luke were arranging the long trestle tables 
in the kitchen, while Mrs. Beetle and Flora unpacked 
the silver and linen sent down in crates from a London 
store. Reuben was filling with water the dozens of 
jars and vases in which the flowers were to be arranged. 
Mark Dolour’s Nancy was superintending the boiling 
of two dozen eggs for everybody’s breakfast. And 
upstairs on her bed lay Flora’s new dress, a wonder of 
frilled and quilted, ruffled and tucked, pinked and 
shirred green batiste, and her plain hat of white straw. 

At half-past eight everybody sat down to breakfast 
in the dairy, for the kitchen was being prepared for the 
reception, and could not be used for meals to-day. 

“ I’ll just take up ’er breakfast,” said Mrs. Beetle. 

She’ll ’ave to ’ave it cold to-day. There’s ’alf an 
’am and a jar of pickled onions. I won’t be a jiff.” 

“ Oh, I’ve just been in to see Aunt Ada,” said Flora, 
looking up from her bresikfast. “ She doesn’t want 

279 



anytMng for breakfast except a Hell’s Angel. Here 
give me an egg. I’ll mix it for her.” She rose, and 
went over to the newly-stocked store cupboard. 

Mrs. Beetle stared, while Flora tossed an egg, two 
ounces of brandy, a teaspoonful of cream and some 
chips of ice in a jam-jar, and everybody else was very 
interested, too. 

“ There,” said Flora, giving Mrs. Beetle the foaming 
jam-jar. “ You run along upstairs with that.” 

So Mm. Beetle ran ; but was heard to observe that 
it would take more than a mess like that to keep htr 
stomach from rumbling before one o’clock. As for 
the other Starkadders, they were considerably intrigued 
by this dramatic change in Aunt Ada’s diet. 

“ Is the old ’un gone off agsiin ? ” asked Reuben, 
anxiously. “ Will she come down and upset everything 
after all, do ’ee think. Cousin Flora ? ” 

“ Not on your sweet life,” ssdd Flora. “ Every- 
thing will be all right. Remember, I told you there 
was going to be a surprise. Well, it’s just beginning.” 

And the Starkadders were satisfied. 

Breakfast over, they all fell to work like demons, for 
the ceremony was at half-past twelve and there was 
much to be done. 

Agony Beetle and the jazz-band arrived with their 
arms fidl of nasturtiums, sweet-william and cherry- 
pie ; and were sent off on a second journey for more. 

Reuben, obeying a request from Flora, pulled out 
from the cupboard in which it was usually kept the 
large carved chair in which Aunt Ada had sat on the 
night of the Counting ; and Mark and Luke (who 
were so stupid that they could have been relied upon to 

sSo 



lay a mine under the house without commenting upon 
it) were told to decorate it with wreaths of rose-peonies. 

It was half-past ten. The awning was up, looking 
immediately festive, as awnings always do. And in 
the kitchen the two long trestle tables were decorated 
and ready. 

Flora had arranged two kinds of food for the two 
kinds of guests she was expecting. For the Starkadders 
and such of the local homy peasantry as would attend 
there were syllabubs, ice-pudding, caviare sandwiches, 
crab patties, trifle and champagne. For the County 
there was cider, cold home-cured ham, cheese, home- 
made bread and salads made from local fhiit. The 
table from which the County were to feed was rich with 
cottage flowers. The rosy efflorescence of the peonies 
floated above the table from which the peasantry 
would eat. 

Wreaths of cottage flowers, like chains of little gems, 
hung from the rafters. Their reds, oranges, blues and 
pinks glowed against the soft, sooty-black of the ceiling 
and walls. The air smelled sweet of cherry-pie and 
firuit salad. Outside the sun flamed in glory ; and 
inside the kitchen there were these sweet smells and 
cool, delicious-looking food. 

Flora took a last look round, and was utterly 
satisfied. 

It was eleven o’clock. 

She went upstairs to Aunt Ada’s room, knocked at 
the door, and in response to a crisp : “ Come in, my 
dear,” entered and shut the door carefully behind her. 

Phoebe, who was on her way up to her room to put 
on her wedding array, nudged Susan. 

381 



“ Did ’ee see that, soul ? Ah ! there’s somethin’ 
strange in the air to-day, love ’ee. And to think on 
it . . . our Rennett is no more a maid ! Last night, 
as ever was, ’un came to say good-bye to me before ’un 
took the twelve-thirty train from Godmere with un’s 
husband-to-be.” 

“ Was ’un weepin’, poor soul ? ” enquired Susan. 

“ Nay ; but ’un said ’un would feel safer when 
once the words was said, and un’s man could not get 
away. Well . . . ’tes done now. Lord love ’ee. And 
they will be here for th’ breakfast, man and wife, as 
ever was.” 

A hush now fell upon the cool, flower-garlanded, 
sweet-smelling farm. The sun climbed royally towards 
his zenith, and the shadows grew shorter. In a dozen 
bedrooms the Starkadders struggled with their wed- 
ding garments. Flora came out of Aunt Ada’s room 
exactly at half-past eleven, and went along to her own 
room. 

She was soon dressed. A bathe in cool water, ten 
minutes’ brushing of her hair and some business with 
her make-up boxes, and she emerged, serene, gay and 
elegant, and ready for the pleasures of the day. 

She went straight down into the kitchen, to reassure 
herself that everything was still as it should be ; and 
arrived just in time to prevent Mr. Mybug, who had 
arrived unexpectedly early, from picking a cherry off 
one of the cakes. Rennett was imploring him not to, 
and he was laughing like a boyish farm (or so he 
thought) and just about to pick at it when Flora 
sailed in. 

“ Mr. Mybug 1 ” exclaimed Flora. 

283 



He jumped as though he had been stung and gave a 
boyish laugh. 

‘‘ Ah, dear lady . . . there you are ! ” 

‘‘ Yes. And so are you, I see,^’ said Flora. “ There 
is plenty for everybody^ Mr. Mybug. If you are hungry, 
Mrs. Beetle will cut you some bread and butter. How 
are you^ Mrs. Mybug ? ” and Flora pressed Rennett’s 
hand graciously, and congratulated her upon her 
striking toilette, which had been borrowed from one 
of Mr. Mybug’s girl friends who drank rather a lot in 
one way and another and kept a tame boxer in her 
studio for the sheer love of the thing. 

The other Starkadders now began to come down- 
stairs ; and as the sound of the church clock coming 
across the sunny fields now warned them it was twelve, 
they thought it time to go down to the church. 

After a last glance round the flowery kitchen. Flora 
floated out with one hand on Reuben’s arm, and the 
others followed. 

They found quite a big crowd already assembled 
outside the church, for the wedding had aroused much 
interest in neighbouring villages, as well as in Howling 
itself. The little church was crammed and the only 
empty seats were those for the Coimty and those in 
which the party from the farm now took their places. 

On rising from her knees. Flora had leisure to study 
the decorations. They were really charming. Agony 
Beetle had done them, with the help of Mark Dolour. 
They had agreed with pleasing unanimity that only 
white flowers were suitable to Elfine’s extreme youth 
and undoubted purity. So the pews were hung with 
chains of marguerites, and two tall lilies stood like 

283 



archangelic trumpets at the end of each pew, lining 
the aisle. There were many jars filled with white 
pinks, and the altar steps where the bride would kneel 
were banked with snowy geraniums. 

Flora repressed the unworthy reflection that it 
reminded her of a White Sale at Messrs. Marshall & 
Snelgrove’s, and turned her attention to Letty, Jane, 
Phoebe, Prue and Susan, who had all begun to cry. 
Silently she fitted them all out with clean handkerchiefe 
from a store previously laid in for this very purpose. 

Reuben, very nervous, stood at the door, waiting 
for Elfine. The sun blazed down outside, the organ 
wandered softly through a voluntary, and the crowd 
respectfully buzzed at the County as it came in, 
bursting with curiosity and wearing its direst hats. 
The hands on the clock tower jumped on, minute by 
minute, to the half-hour. 

Flora took one cautious glance round the church 
before she settled down to wait in decorous quietude 
for the last few minutes. 

The church seemed full of Starkadders. They were 
all there ; and all there by her agency, except the 
four whom she had helped to escape. 

There they all were. Enjoying themselves. Having 
a nice time. And having it in an ordinary human 
maimer. Not having it because they were raping 
somebody, or beating somebody, or having religious 
mania or being doomed to silence by a gloomy, earthy 
pride, or loving the soil with the fierce desire of a 
lecher, or anything of that sort. No, they were just 
enjoying an ordinary human event, like any of the 
other millions of ordinary people in the world. 

S84 



Really, when she thought what they had all been 
like, only five months ago . . . 

She bowed her head. She had accomplished a 
great work ; and had much to be thankful for. And 
to-day would see her achievements crowned ! 

At last ! The organ struck bravely into Here 
Comes the Bride ! ” and every head turned towards the 
door, and every eye fixed itself upon the large car 
which had just drawn up outside the church. A low 
murmur of interest went up. 

And now the crowd was cheering. Something tall, 
white and cool as a cloud detached itself from the car, 
and floated quickly along the path to the church door. 

Here comes the Bride ! Here is Elfine, pale and 
serious and starry-eyed, as a bride should be, leaning 
upon the arm of Reuben. Here is Dick Hawk- 
Monitor, his pleasant red face betraying none of the 
nervousness he must feel. Here is Mrs. Hawk- 
Monitor, looking vague in grey ; and the healthy Joan 
Hawk- Monitor in pink organdi (a deplorable choice — 
qxiite deplorable, thought Flora, regretfully). 

The procession reached the altar steps, and halted. 

The music ceased. Into the hush that fell the 
vicar’s voice broke quickly yet gravely : “ Dearly 
beloved . . 

It was not until she was standing in the vestry, 
smilingly watching the best man (Ralph Pent-Hartigan) 
kiss the bride, that Flora felt an unusual sensation in 
the palm of her right-hand glove. She looked down at 
it, and saw to her surprise and amusement that it was 
split right across. 

She realised then that she had been extremely 
285 



nervous least anything should go wrong. But nothing 
had ; and now she was extremely hungry. 

Susan, Letty, Phoebe, Prue and Jane were still 
roaring away like town-bulls, and Flora had to tell 
them rather sharply not to make such a noise. Several 
persons had already asked them, in kindly concern, if 
they were in pain, or had had bad news. 

“ Of course,” Mr. Mybug was explaining to Rennett, 
who was also crying because she had had only a nasty 
registry ofl&ce wedding and no lovely dress or wreath — 
“ of course, this is all the sheerest barbarism. It’s 
utterly pagan . . . smd a bit obscene, too, if we only 
look below the ritual. That business of throwing the 
shoe, for instance ” 

" Mr. Mybug, we are all going up to the farm now. 
Of course you’re coming too ? ” Flora had interrupted 
him, she felt, just at the right moment. He hastily 
promised Rennett another wedding, a proper one, if 
she would only stop crying, and rushed away with her 
under his arm after the rest of the party. 


286 



CHAPTER XXII 


I N fifteen minutes they were all going in at the farm 
gate, chattering and laughing and experiencing 
that curious exultation which always follows a wedding 
or a funeral. 

And how gay and cheerful the farm looked, with the 
awning all bravely white and crimson in the sun, and 
the wreaths of flowers and the rosy clouds of peonies 
shining out of the darkness of the Mtchen, through the 
open door. And, oh, look ! Someone had put a rope 
of wallflowers and geraniums round the neck of Big 
Business, who was proudly stamping round the big 
field, and pausing to stare over the hedge at the wedding 
guests with his huge, soft eyes ! 

“ What a charming idea. So original,” said Mrs. 
Hawk-Monitor, thinking it was rather indelicate. 
“ And the cows, I see, are also wreathed. Quite an 
idea.” 

Adam came forward ; the desolate Atlantic pools 
that were his eyes were filmed with the ready tears of 
ninety years. He stopped in firont of Elfine, who 
looked kindly down at him, and held out to her his 
cupped hands. 

“A wedding present for ’ee, maidy,” he crooned 
(much to Flora’s annoyance, who was afiraid the ice 
would melt and the champagne be tepid). “ A gift 
for my own wild marsh-tigget.” 

287 



And he opened his hands, revealing a marsh-tigget’s 
nest with four pink eggs in it. 

“ Oh Adam . . . how sweet of you,” said Elfine, 
pressing his arm affectionately. 

“ Put it in thy bosom. ’Twill make ’ee bear four 
children,” advised Adam, and was proceeding to give 
further instructions when Flora broke up the meeting 
by sweeping Adam before her towards the kitchen, 
with the soothing assurance that ElJSne would certainly 
do as he suggested when she had had something to eat. 

She led the way into the room, followed by the 
bride and bridegroom, Mrs. Hawk-Monitor and Joan, 
Ralph Pcnt-Hartigan, Reuben, Micah, Mark and 
Luke, Caraway, Harkaway, Ezra, Phoebe, Susan, 
Letty, Mr. Mybug and Reimett, Jane emd, following 
somewhat in the rear, such minors as Mrs. Beetle, 
Mark Dolour’s Nancy, Agony and the jazz-band, 
Mark Dolour himself, and Urk and Meriam, to say 
nothing of Mrs. Murther from the Condemn’d Man 
and a number of other worthies whom Reuben con- 
sidered were entitled, by their connection with the 
farm, to come to the feast. These included the three 
ferm-hands who worked directly under Mark Dolour, 
and old Adam himself. 

As she crossed the threshold and passed from the hot 
sunshine into the cool gloom, Flora suddenly stepped 
aside, to let the guests have a clear view of the kitchen, 
and of somebody who rose from a chair wreathed iu 
peonies, greeting them with a ringiug cry : 

“ So here you all are ! Welcome to Cold Comfort ! ” 

And a handsome old lady, dressed from head to foot 
in the smartest flying kit of black leather, advanced to 

388 



meet the astounded party. Her hands were stretched 
out in welcome. 

A roar of amazement broke from Micah, who never 
did have any tact, anyway. 

“ ’Tes Aunt Ada ! ’Tes Aunt Ada Doom ! ” 

And the others, released from their first frozen shock 
of surprise, broke also into ejaculations of amazement : 
“ Why, so ’tes ! ” 

“ ’Tes terrible ! ” 

“ ’Tes flying in the face of Nature ! ” 

“ Ay . . . and in trousers, too ! Do ’ee mark ’em, 
lovee ? ” 

“ The first time these twenty year . . .” 

“ She’m rising eighty.” 

“ ’Tes enough to kiU her.” 

“ Dear me . . . how delightful ... so unexpected. 
How do you do. Miss Doom ... or should I say Mrs. 
Starkadder ? ... so confusing.” 

“ Oh, Grandmother ! ” 

“ ’Tes the old ’un herself ! ” 

“ Well, you could knock me down with a warming- 
pan ! Miraclfes wiU never cease ! ” 

“ Ay . . . finiit and flower, by their growth ’ee shall 
know ’em ! That I should live to sec this day ! ” 
Aunt Ada stood in smiling silence while the roar of 
voices gradually subsided. She glanced once or twice 
at Flora, with raised eyebrows, and her fiiendly snulc 
deepened into one of amusement. 

At last she held up her hand. Silence immediately 
fell. She said : 

“ Well, good people, aU this is very flattering, but if 
I am to spend any time with my granddaughter and 

aSg 



the rest of you, we must hurry up and begin the 
wedding breakfast. I leave for Paris by air in less than 
an hour.’’ 

On this confusion broke forth again. The Stark- 
adders were so flabbergasted, so knocked clean out of 
the perpendicular by the bosom-shattering stupen- 
dosity of the event, that nothing but a good deal of 
food could persuade them to shut their mouths. 

So Flora and Ralph Pent-Hartigan (she was begin- 
ning to approve of that young man : he had the 
rudiments) caught up plates of crab patties and began 
to circulate among the guests, persuading everybody 
to begin to eat and keep up their strength. 

Then Elfine, roused from her fascinated stare at her 
grandmother by a gentle touch from Flora, cut the 
wedding cake ; and the feast officially began. 

Soon everybody was enjoying themselves tremen- 
dously. The shattering surprise of Aunt Ada’s ap- 
pearance gave everybody something to talk about, and 
enhanced the delicious flavours of the food they ate. 
It would, of course, have been even more stimulating 
to the appetite if she had appeared in her usual clothes 
and with her usual manner, and tried to stop the 
wedding, and had been defied by the Starkadders in 
a body. That would have been worth seeing, if you 
like. However, one cannot have everything, and what 
there was, was good. 

After she had moved around a little among the 
guests, and said a few pleasant phrases to everyone. 
Aunt Ada sat down again in her flowery chair, and 
addressed herself to champagne and some caviare 
sandwiches. 


290 



Flora sat by her side, also eating caviare. She 
thought it best to watch over her handiwork up to 
the last minute. In only half an hour the aeroplane 
which was to take Aunt Ada to Paris would land in 
Ticklepenny’s Field. But a lot of things could happen 
in half an hour. Apparently, Aunt Ada had thor- 
oughly realised what a nasty time she had had for 
twenty years, and had now made up her mind to have 
a nice one. But you never knew. 

So there Flora sat, watching over her aunt, smiling 
occasionally at people from under the brim of her hat, 
and seeking an opening in the conversation with her 
aunt to introduce her rights ; those mysterious rights 
Judith had mentioned in her first letter to Flora nearly 
six months ago. 

Soon it came. Aunt Ada was in excellent spirits. 
She thanked Flora for the himdredth time for pointing 
out to her what a nice time was had by Miss Fanny 
Ward, who looked so much younger than she really 
was ; and for telling her how luxurious was the Hotel 
Miramar in Paris, and emphasising what a pleasant 
life could be had in this world by a handsome, sensible 
old lady of good fortune, blessed with a sound con- 
stitution and a firm will. 

And I will remember, my dear,” she was saying, 
to preserve my personality, as you advise. You 
shall not find me plucking my eyebrows, nor dieting, 
nor doting on a boy of twenty-five. I am very grateful 
to you, my pippet. What pretty thing shall I send 
you from Paris ? ” 

A work-box, please. Mine is wearing out,” said 
Flora, promptly. “ But, Aunt Ada, there is something 

291 



else you can do for me, too, if you will. What 
was the wrong that Amos did to my father, Robert 
Poste ? And what are my ‘ rights,’ of which Judith 
used to speak ? I feel that I cannot let you go off on 
your tour without asking you.” 

Aunt Ada’s face grew grave. She glanced round 
the kitchen, and observed with satisfaction that every- 
body was eating much too hard and talking much too 
fast to take any notice of anyone else. She put her 
wrinkled hand over Flora’s cool young one, and drew 
her towards her, until aimt and niece were both 
sheltered by the curving brim of Flora’s hat. Then 
she began to speak in a quick murmur. She spoke 
for several moments. An observer would not have 
noted much change in Flora’s attentive face. At last 
the murmur ceased. Flora lifted her head, and asked : 

“ And did the goat die ? ” 

But at this very second Aunt Ada’s attention was 
distracted by Elfine and Dick, who came up to her 
accompanied by Adam. Flora’s question went un- 
heard, and she did not care to repeat it in front of 
the others. 

“ Grandmother, Adam wants to come to live at 
Hautcouture Hall with us, and look after our cows,” 
said Elfine. “ May he ? We should so like him to. 
He knows all about cows, you know.” 

“ By aU means, my dear,” said Aunt Ada, graciously. 
“ But who will care for Feckless, Graceless, Pointless 
and Aimless if he deserts them ? ” 

A piercing cry broke from Adam. He flung himself 
forward. His gnarled hands were knotted in anguish. 

“Nay, niver say that, Mrs. Starkadder, ma’am. 

292 



I’ll take ’en wi’ me, all four on ’en. There’s room for 
us all at Howchiker Hall.” 

“ It sounds like the finale of the first act in a musical 
comedy,” observed Aunt Ada. “ WeU, well, you may 
take them if you want to.” 

“ Bless ’ee. Now bless ’ee, Mrs. Starkaddcr, 
ma’am,” crooned Adam, and hurried away to tell the 
cows to make ready for their journey that very after- 
noon. 

“And did the goat die? And what about my 
rights ? ” asked Flora, a little louder this time. Dash 
it, the thing must be straightened out. 

But it was no use. Mrs. Hawk-Monitor chose that 
identical second to come up to Aunt Ada, murmuring 
that she was so sorry that Mrs. Starkadder was going 
away at once, and that none of them would have an 
opportunity of seeing her during the summer, but that 
she must come to dinner the very moment she returned 
firom her world-tour, and Aunt Ada said that sAe was 
so sorry, too, but would be delighted to. 

So Flora’s question was not answered. 

And it was feted never to be answered. For the 
next interruption was the high, sinister drone of an 
aeroplane engine, so near that it could be heard even 
above the roar of conversation in the kitchen ; and 
the youngest member of the jazz-band (who had gone 
out into Ezra’s beam rows to be quietly sick fi:om too 
many crab patties) came rushhig in, his sickness 
forgotten, proclaiming that there was an aeroplane, 
an aeroplane, falling into Ticklepenny’s Field. 

Everybody at once charged out into the garden to 
look at it, except Mrs. Hawk-Monitor, Flora, the 
ao 293 



bride and bridegroom and Aunt Ada. In face of the 
bustle of buckling Aunt Ada into her kit, and exchang- 
ing embraces and messages and promises to write and 
to meet at Hautcouture Hall at Christmas, Flora could 
not put her question a third time. It would have 
been ill-bred. She must just relinquish her rights — 
whatever they might be — ^and be resigned never to 
know whether the goat died or not. 

Everybody streamed out across the fields to see 
Aimt Ada oflF. The pilot (a dark, cross-looking young 
man) was presented, to his obvious repugnance, with 
a piece of wedding cake. They all stood round the 
machine laughing and talking, while Agony Beetle 
dashed somebody else’s glass of champagne over the 
propeller, and Aunt Ada made her farewells. 

Then she climbed into the cockpit and settled herself 
comfortably. She tucked her chin deeper into her 
helmet, and looked down with smiling benevolence on 
the assembled Starkadders. Flora, standing close to 
the machine, had her shoulder patted, and was thanied 
again, in a low voice, for the transformation she had 
achieved in her aunt’s life. 

Flora smiled prettily ; but could not help feeling a 
bit disappointed about the goat and the rights. 

The propeller began to revolve. The machine 
trembled. 

“ Three cheers for Aunt Ada ! ” cried Urk, flinging 
his voleskin cap into the air. They were just at the 
beginning of the third “ Hurrah ! ” when the machine 
took a nm forward and rose from the ground. 

It skimmed the hedge, and rose to the level of the 
elms, and above them. The crowd had a last glimpse 

294 



of Aunt Ada’s confident face turned over her shoulder 
to smile. She waved ; and, still waving, was carried 
from their sight into the heavens. 

“ Now let’s go back and drink a good deal more,” 
suggested Ralph Pent-Hartigan, taking Flora’s hand 
in a familiar but rather pleasing way. “ Dick and 
the sposa will be taking off in half an hour, you know. 
Their ’plane is timed for three-thirty.” 

“ Goodness . . . it’s nothing but people going off 
in aeroplanes,” said Flora, rather crossly. I had 
best go and help Elfinc change her dress.” 

And so, while all the others flowed back into the 
kitchen and sank their fangs into what was left of the 
provender, she slipped upstairs to Elfine’s room, and 
helped her to put on her blue going-away suit. Elfine 
was very happy and not at all tearful or nervous. 

She embraced Flora warmly, thanked her a thousand 
times for her goodness, and promised solemnly never 
to forget all the good advice Flora had given her. 
The latter placed in her hands a copy of The Higher 
Common Sense,” suitably inscribed, and they went 
downstairs together affectionately entwined. 

The second aeroplane came down in the Big Field 
opposite the farm, punctual to the second. (Big 
Business had been led away by Micah a few moments 
previously — z, suggestion from some of the blither 
spirits to the effect that he should be left there to 
see what he makes of the aeroplane ” having been 
vetoed by Flora.) 

The second departure was noisier than the first. 
The Starkadders were not used to drinking champagne. 
But they liked it all right. There was a great deal of 

295 



cheering, and some tears from Susan, Prue, Letty, 
Phoebe and Jane and Meriam, and some thimderings 
from Micah warning Dick to be good to his lily- 
flower. 

Flora took advantage of the scrinunage to slip 
back to the kitchen and warn Mrs. Beetle, who was 
sombrely beginning to tidy up, not to open any more 
champagne. 

“ Only in case of illness. Miss Poste,” promised 
Mrs. Beetle. 

When Flora got back to the field the aeroplane was 
just rising from the ground. She smiled up at Elfine’s 
lovely little face framed by the black flying cap, and 
Elfine blew her a tender kiss. The roar of the engine 
swelled to a triumphant thunder. They were gone. 

“ Well, now will you come back and drink a good 
deal more ? ” asked Ralph Pent-Hartigan, showing an 
inclination to put his arm roimd Flora’s waist. 

Flora dodged him, with her prettiest smile. She 
was so wishing that everybody would go home. The 
wedding breakfast seemed to have been going on for 
ever. Except that this was a cheerful occasion and 
the other had been a dismal one, it reminded her of 
the Counting. . . . 

(“ Oh,” she thought, “ and I shall never know what 
it was that Atmt Ada saw in the woodshed. How I 
wish I had asked her about that as well.”) 

In the kitchen the party was at last showing signs 
of breaking up. All the food was eaten. All the 
drink had gone long ago. The pretty ropes of flowers 
were fading in the heat. The floor was littered with 
crumpled paper napkins, cigarette stubs, crushed 

296 



flowers, champagne corks, spilt water. The air seemed 
to sink under its burden of tobacco smoke and mingled 
smells. Only the rose-peonies were unharmed. The 
heat had made them open to their full extent, so that 
they showed their hearts of gold. Flora put her nose 
into one. It smelled sweet and cool. 

She endeavoured to compose her spirits. She was 
conscious that for the last hour they had been agitated 
and melancholy. What could be the matter with 
her ? She wished only to be alone. 

It was with some difficulty that, in saying good-bye 
to everybody at the door of the kitchen, she maintained 
an air of cheerfulness. But she was comforted by the 
fact that everybody seemed to have had a perfectly 
lovely time. Everyone, especially Mrs. Hawk- Monitor, 
congratulated her upon the organisation of the wedding 
breakfast and the deliciousness of the food and the 
elegance of the decorations. 

She received invitations to dine with the Hawk- 
Monitors next week, to visit Mr. Mybug and Rennett 
at the studio (with sink) in which they proposed to 
Uve in Fitzroy Square. Urk and Meriam said that 
they would be honoured if Miss Poste would come to 
tea at Byewaies,’^ the villa which Urk had bought 
out of his savings from the water-vole trade, and into 
which he and Ids bride would move next week. 

Flora thanked them all smilingly, and promised to 
go to all of them. 

One by one the guests departed, and the Starkadders, 
sleepy with champagne and the novelty of enjoying 
themselves in a normal manner, slipped away to their 
bedrooms to sleep it off. The figure of the last guest, 

297 



Agony Beetle, disappeared over the curve of the hill 
on the path that led down to Howling, accompanied 
by the jazz-band. Quiet, which had been driven 
from the farm at six o’clock that morning, began 
timidly to creep out of shadowy comers and to take 
possession of it once more. 

“ Miss Poste. You look done up. Come for a run 
in the old bouncer ? ” said Ralph Pent-Hartigan, who 
was about to start up his eight-cylinder Volupte which 
stood in the yard. 

Flora came down the two little steps leading from 
the kitchen door and crossed the yard to the car. 

“ I don’t think I’ll come for a run, thanks,” she 
said. “ But it would be very kind of you if you 
would take me down into the village. I want to 
telephone.” 

He was delighted. He made her get in beside him 
at once, and soon they were spinning down the hill 
into Howling. The speed made a wind of grateful 
coolness that fanned their flushed cheeks. 

“ I suppose you wouldn’t care to dine with me in 
Town to-night ? Marvellous evening. We might 
dance at the New River, if you like ? ” 

“ I would have loved it, but the fact is I’ve just 
made up my mind to leave the farm to-night. I shall 
have packing and things to do. I’m so sorry. Some 
other time it would be delightful.” 

“ Well . . . but . . . look here, couldn’t I run you 
back ? ” 

The car had stopped outside the post office. Flora 
got out. 

“Again, I’m so sorry,” she said, smiling into his 
agS 



disappointed yoixng face, ** but I think my cousin is 
going to fetch me. I’m just going to see if he is at 
home. We made the arrangement months ago.” 

Fortunately there was only a delay of a few minutes 
to the Hertfordshire exchange. Flora, waiting in the 
stufiy telephone box, was not in the mood to be 
sensible about delays. She had not even started to 
fume when the bell rang, sounding deafening in that 
narrow space. 

She took off the receiver, and listened. 

“ Hullo,” said Charles’s quiet, deep voice, seventy 
miles away. It was made tiny by distance, but not 
less musical. 

She gave a little gasp. 

“ Oh . . . hullo, Charles. Is that you ? This is 
Flora. Look here, are you doing anything to-night ? ” 

Not if you want me.” 

Well . . . coxald you be an absolute angel, and 
come and fetch me away from the farm to-night in 
Speed Cop the Second ? We’ve had a wedding here 
to-day, and I’ve tidied everything up. I mean, there’s 
nothing left for me to do here. And I really am 
rather tired. I would like to be fetched ... if you 
could. . . .” 

“ Pm comingy^^ said the deep voice. “ What time 
may I be there? Is there a big field near the 
house ? ” 

‘‘ Oh, yes, just outside. Can you be here by eight, 
do you think ? It’s nearly five o’clock now.” 

“ Of course. I’ll be there at eight.” 

There was a pause. 

Charles,” said Flora. 

299 



“ Yes ? ” 

“ Charles ... I mean, it isn’t putting you out or 
anything ? ” 

Smiling, she hung up the receiver to the tiny distant 
soiud of Charles’s laughter. 


300 



CHAPTER XXm 


Y oung Pent-Hartigan drove her back to the farm. 

She said good-bye to him and promised to dine 
with him very soon. Then he drove off ; and with 
the retreating noise of his engine the last invader of 
the farm’s quietude was gone. Quiet flowed back into 
the sunny empty rooms like the returning sea. The 
only sounds were the tiny ones of a summer’s day that 
is drawing towards evening. 

Flora went upstairs and changed firom her party 
dress into a tweed suit in which she could fly without 
feeling cold. She brushed her hair and cooled her 
hands and forehead with eau-de-Cologne. Then she 
packed, and labelled her trunk for i Mouse Place. It 
would be sent oflf to-morrow. She took with her only 
the Pens^es, “ The Higher Conunon Sense ” and 
what Chaucer has summed up for all time as “ a bag 
of needments.” 

It was six o’clock when she came slowly downstairs 
again. The kitchen was tidy and empty. All signs 
of the feast had been cleared away. Only the awning 
was left, its stripes of red and white glowing against 
the deep blue siy of early evening. The shadows of 
the bean rows were long across the garden, and their 
flowers were transparent red in the sunlight. All was 
cool, quiet, blessedly peaceful. Flora’s supper was 
neatly laid and of the Starkadders there was not a 

301 



sign. She supposed that they must all be asleep 
upstairs or else gone a-moUocking off to Godmere. 
She hoped they would not come downstairs before she 
left. She loved them all dearly, but this evening she 
just did not want to see them any more. 

She sat down, with a sigh, in a comfortable deep 
chair, and relaxed all her limbs. She would sit here, 
she thought, until half-past six ; then she would eat 
her supper ; and then go out into the Big Field and 
sit on the stile imder the may-tree and wait for Charles. 

Her dreamy musings were interrupted by the distant 
soft janglings of beUs. She recognised the sound : it 
was made by the bells that (copying a heathen foreign 
fashion he had once seen demonstrated on the talkies) 
Adam had hung rovmd the necks of Graceless, Pointless, 
Feckless and Aimless. 

Even as she listened a procession came into sight. 
It wound across the rising path which she could see, 
silhouetted against the blue sky and held as if in a 
frame by the open door, firom where she sat. 

It was Adam and the cows, on their way to Haut- 
couture Farm. 

Adam went first, wearing his ancient hat and his 
age-green corduroys. The liddle mop was slung round 
his neck. His head was lifted to the sinking sun, 
whose strong rays turned him to gold. He was singing 
the bawdy song he had learned for the wedding of 
George I. 

Behind him came the cows in single file, still wreathed 
with their weddiag garlands of wallflowers. They 
swung their heads in lowly content, and their bells 
chimed in time to Adam’s singing. 

302 



Slowly they passed across the frame of the doorway. 
Then they were gone. Nothing conld be seen save 
the green path, rising away into the empty blue of the 
evening sky. The dying sound of the bells came back 
to Flora, softly and more softly, until it was lost in 
silence. 

Smiling, Flora drew. her chair to the table and ate 
her supper. She did not think of anything, except 
that in an hour she would see Charles, and tell him 
about everything she had done, and hear what he had 
to say about it all. 

When she had finished her supper she wrote an 
affectionate little letter for Reuben, explaining that 
her work at the farm was now finished, and that she 
felt she would like to go back to Town. She promised 
to come down again very soon to see them aU, and 
enclosed a pound note and her earnest thanks for Mrs. 
Beetle. 

She left the note open on the table, where everybody 
could read it, and not even a Starkadder could be 
alarmed by it or mysterious about it. Then she slipped 
on her coat, picked up her bag of needments, and 
sauntered out into the cool evening. 

The Big Field was covered with long, fresh grass 
which threw millions of tiny lengthening shadows. 
There was not a breath of wind. It was the loveliest 
hour of the English year : seven o’clock on Mid- 
summer Night. 

Flora crossed the grass to the stile, the cool grass 
swishing against her ankles. She sat down on the 
step of the stile, leaning her back comfortably against 
the gate part, and stared up into the black boughs 

303 



of the may-tree. Beneath, they were in shadow. 
Above, they hdd their white flowers and green leaves 
up into the gold of the last sun-rays. She could see the 
flowers and leaves dazzling against the pure sky. 

The shadows grew slowly longer. A cold, firesh 
smell came up out of the grass and fell from the trees. 
The birds began their sleep song. 

The sun had almost disappeared behind the black 
traceries of the may hedge on the far side of the field. 
Such of his rays as struck through the branches were 
still, heavy and of the softest gold. 

The air cooled slowly. Flowers shut before Flora’s 
very eyes, but gave out fragrance still. Now there 
were more shadows than light. The last blackbird 
that always flies chattering across a summer evening’s 
quiet came dashing down the meadow and vanished 
in the may hedge. 

The covmtryside was falling asleep. Flora drew her 
coat round her, and looked up into the darkening 
vault of the sky. Then she glanced at her watch. It 
was five to eight. Her ears had caught a steady, 
recurrent murmur that might or might not have been 
the beating of her own blood. 

In another moment the sound was the only one in 
the whole of heaven. The aeroplane appeared over 
the top of the may hedge, swooping downwards. The 
under-caurriage touched the earth, and then it was 
taxi-ing comfortably to a standstill. 

Flora had stood up as it came in sight. Now she 
went down the field towards it. The pilot was getting 
out of the cockpit, loosening his helmet, looking towards 
her. He came across the grass to meet her, swinging 

304 



his helmet in his hand, his black hair ruffled by the 
way he had dragged off the cap. 

It was purest happiness to see him. It was like 
meeting again a dearest friend whom one has loved 
for long years, and missed in silence. Flora went 
straight into his open arms, put her own round his 
neck, and kissed him with all her heart. 

Presently Charles said : 

“ This is for ever, isn’t it ? ” 

And Flora whispered : “ For ever.” 

It was nearly dark. The stars and moon were out, 
and the may-trees glimmering. Flora and Charles 
sighed at last, looked at one another and laughed, 
and Charles said : 

“ Look here, I think we ought to go home, you 
know, darling. Mary’s waiting for us at Mouse Place. 
She got back a day earlier. What do you think ? We 
can talk when we get there.” 

“ I don’t mind,” said Flora, placidly. “ Charles, 
you do smell nice. Is it stuff you put on your hair, 
or what? Oh, it is nice to ffiiak what years and 
years we have got in which to find out things like 
that ! Quite fifty years I should think, wouldn’t you, 
Charles ? ” 

Charles said he hoped so ; and added that he did 
not put stuff on his hair. He ako added inconse- 
quently that he was glad he had been bom. 

They were both in rather a state of dither, but 
Charles finally pulled himself together, and began to 
jab purposefully at the interior of the aeroplane, while 
Flora hovered round telling him ail about what she 
had done at Cold Comfort, and also about Mr. Mybug ; 

305 



and Charles laughed, but he said Mr. Mybug was a 
little tick and Flora ought to he more careful. He 
also said she was the Local Busybody, adding that he 
did not approve of people who interfered with other 
people’s Eves. 

Flora heard this with delight. 

“ Shall I be allowed to interfere with yours ? ” she 
asked. Like all really strong-minded women, on 
whom everybody flops, she adored being bossed about. 
It was so restful. 

“ No,” said Charles. And he grinned at her dis- 
respectfully, and she noticed how white and even his 
teeth were. 

“ Charles, you have got heaver^ teeth.” 

“ Don’t fuss,” said Charles. “ Now, are you ready, 
my dearest darling? Because I am, and so’s the 
Speed Cop. We’ll be home in half an hour. Oh, 
Flora, I’m so xmbearably happy. I can’t believe it’s 
true.” He snatched her roughly into his arms, and 
looked longingly down into her face. “ It is true, 
isn’t it ? Say ‘ I love you 

And Flora, unutterably moved, told him just how 
much she did. 

They climbed into the aeroplane. The roar of the 
propeller rose into the exquisite stillness of the night. 
Soon they were rising above the elms, that were faintly 
silvered by the moon, and the countryside lay spread 
beneath them. 

“ Say it again.” 

She saw Charles’s lips move, as the farm dropped 
away beneath them, and guessed what he was saying. 

He was fully occupied with keeping the machine 
306 



clear of the topmost branches of the elms, and could 
not look at her, but she saw by his troubled profile 
that he feared (so fantastically beautiful was the night 
and this discovery of their love) that it might be some 
cruel mistake. 

Flora put her warm lips close to his cap. 

‘‘ I love you,” she said. He could not hear her very 
well, but he turned for a second, and, comforted, 
smiled into her eyes. 

She glanced upwards for a second at the soft blue 
vault of the midsummer night sky. Not a cloud 
misted its solemn depths. To-morrow would be a 
beautiful day. 


THE END 